The Project Gutenberg eBook of The Weserbergland and the Teutoburg Forest,
by Oswald Reissert

This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no restrictions
whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it under the terms
of the Project Gutenberg License included with this eBook or online at
www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the United States, you
will have to check the laws of the country where you are located before
using this eBook.

Title: The Weser Uplands and the Teutoburg Forest

Author: Oswald Reissert

Release Date: August 1, 2021 [eBook # 65973]

Language: German

Character set encoding: UTF-8

Produced by: Peter Becker and the Online Distributed Proofreading Team at
             https://www.pgdp.net (This file was produced from images
             generously made available by The Internet Archive)

*** START OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DAS WESERBERGLAND AND THE
TEUTOBURG FOREST ***

  + ------------------------------------------------- ----------------- +
  | Notes on transcription |
  | |
  | Locked text is shown as ¯locked, antiqua |
  | as ~ Antiqua ~, and subscript as _ {subscript}. |
  | A list of changes can be found at the end of the book. |
  + ------------------------------------------------- ----------------- +


                            country and people

                             Monographs
                             to geography


                            country and people

                             Monographs
                             to geography

                       In connection with others
                      edited by A. Scobel

                                  24

                           Weserbergland and
                           Teutoburg Forest

                                 1909

                         Bielefeld and Leipzig

                     Velhagen & Klasing publisher




                           The Weser Uplands
                                and the
                           Teutoburg Forest

                            by O. Reissert

                        With a geological
                        Overview by H. Stille

               With 123 illustrations after photographic
                  Recordings and a colored map

                            [Illustration]

                                 1909

                         Bielefeld and Leipzig

                     Velhagen & Klasing publisher


                Printed by Fischer & Wittig in Leipzig.




Contents.


                                                            side

     ~ I. ~ Introduction 3

    ~ II. ~ The geological structure of the Weserbergland and the
          Teutoburg Forest. From ~ Dr. ~ ¯H. Silence ¯ 5

   ~ III. ~ Climate and waters 19

    ~ IV. ~ The forest 27

     ~ V. ~ Rural conditions 35

    ~ VI. ~ History 56

   ~ VII. ~ The Weser from Münden to Manufacture. Dransfelder
          Höhenland and Reinhardswald 63

  ~ VIII. ~ Solling, Homburg and Vogler 74

    ~ IX. ~ The Weser from Herstelle to Hameln 78

     ~ X. ~ The trough 84

    ~ XI. ~ Osterwald, Deister and Bückeburg 89

   ~ XII. ~ From Hameln to Osnabrück. Süntel, Weser chain
          and Wiehengebirge 94

  ~ XIII. ~ Osning, Teutoburg Forest and Egge 110

   ~ XIV. ~ Between Teutoburg Forest and Weser 119

         * * * * *

  Literature 125

  List of Figures 126

  Register 128

  Map of the Weser Uplands and the Teutoburg Forest.

[Illustration: Fig. 1. The Hermannsdenkmal in the morning mist.

Verlag of the Hinrichs'schen Hofbuchhandlung (H. Knöner) in Detmold. (To
Page 116.)]




~ I. ~ Introduction.


This book should belong to my homeland. On a hill that does that
wide, like a dry lake overlooks the Weser valley,
where the banks meet the stream before its parting from the mountainous
To wreath the surrounding area for the last time with all its charms, stood
my parents' house. There the little boy who once received the
Overheard conversation of adults about the beauty of the area,
on his admission: “I know what a region is; but
I don't understand what a beautiful region is «, one for being
Age sufficient explanation with reference to the far distance view
from the balcony of the father's house. Later he did not understand
for other attractions of his homeland. On walks through
the high beech forest the gaze rose from the ground where sweet
Berries beckoned to the cathedral vaults of the high tops, and the
Fruit tree plantations, in which some of the neighboring villages are
almost hidden, delighted the palate not only in summer and autumn
with her sweet gifts, but also in the spring the eye with the white
Splendor of their flowers. A stimulating geography lesson taught
the silhouette of the bluish Weser chain, which is in rhythm
moving wavy line swings into the distance, and that in the Teutoburger
Walde over there has its equal counterpart, as an admirable trait
capture the local landscape and the venerable remains
former knight castles, city fortifications and other structural elements
Look at witnesses of the past with devout awe while looking at
School-free days are youthful hiking and daring of high
Crested hilltops, rugged cliffs and dark caves. the
but his first trips brought the young man the experience that neither
those brightly colored folk costumes nor those cozy homesteads in
which showed the rural prosperity of Westphalia and Lippe, and
which he had taken for granted, in the same way
Wise returned in other areas, and this realization fulfilled
him with joyful pride.

Those times in which the idea of ​​home as one
strange piece of earth and the love for this part of Germany
Soil at the same time as man himself, with his physical one
and spiritual powers, developed, lie behind me for a long time. But also
In the later decades I got between some trips to others
Areas of German and non-German land but the wanderlust again
and again to the red earth and to the shores of the friendly
Current led; in spite of all the greater impressions of a sublime nature
I feel the magic of those idyllic low mountain ranges
never been able to withdraw, be it that young beech green the childish
Hill forms delicately clad, be it in the July sunshine the blessing
who let fields flood its golden waves in the light wind, liked
the mountain forest stand there in splendid, yellow-brown autumn decorations, or
liked the tall spruce trees draped in bearded frost
being. Of course, this preference of an individual for one lies in this
Landscape, especially if it was the place of his boys' games
is not yet proof that it is also worth the interest of others
be. The danger, however, that the love of home will turn into "local patriotism"
become - an ugly word! - we best escape when we meet
strive to recognize the real circumstances when we consider the nature of the
to understand individual mountain ranges and valleys, their age and how they became
seek if we are dependent on organic life
Consider the shape of the soil, irrigation and climate, and when we finally do
the human life of the past and the present in his
Condition by the sum of all those natural presuppositions
to study. This book is dedicated to this task, at least
primarily. May it also serve the purpose, interest
of travelers to those regions. With that in mind I would like to
I join the Rintel high school teacher Ludwig Boclo, who
published a "companion on the Weser steamship" in 1844
and already then complained that the speed of travel »in
of recent times "unfortunately has become the idol to which each
Comfort, every enjoyment of nature, every calm conception and contemplation
being sacrificed. “It would be a great, heartfelt joy,” he writes
the undersigned (who is physically-mentally and comfortably
awakening and revitalizing power of travel for 40 years
himself and others) if he has that
Arousing desire and enhancing what is already there, one of the
most German regions of the common fatherland in such a graceful way
Way to get to know '(i.e. to ships)'. 'These words were used in
written a time in which the scenic beauties
that Westphalian-Lower Saxony border area not long ago
had previously been discovered. In 1835, George Osterwald had
his "Gallery of Weser Views" and F. C. Th. Piderit his
"Historical walks through the Weser valley" appear in Rinteln
to let.

At the beginning of Piderit's writing was anonymous as a greeting to the reader
Franz Dingelstedt's poem, which later became so well known, that with the
Verse begins:

    I know a German river
    He is dear to me and dear to everyone,
    Domed by a solemn oak cathedral,
    Greened by cool beech halls.

    It does not have it, like the great Rhine,
    Conjured up the dark spirit of the Alps,
    The peaceful club has it
    Kindred currents born quietly.

Seven years later (Cassel 1842) Dingelstedt gave up, again without
his name, the book "The Weser Valley from Münden to Minden".
In it he makes it his task to solve the "singer's curse",
d. H. that well-known word from Schiller in his German water xenias,
that there is nothing to be said about the Weser, to be refuted. Already in
In autumn 1839 Ferdinand Freiligrath had his enthusiastic introduction
on Levin Schückings, book first published in 1841
"The picturesque and romantic Westphalia," in which he wrote under
praises the beauty of the Porta Westfalica dithyrambically.
The impact of all these books was tremendous, and as of 1844
the Weserdampfschiffahrt, opened the Cöln-Mindener Bahn in 1846
Westphalia and Weser Uplands could be targets for
Pleasure travel seriously come into question.

[Sidenote: delimitation of the area.]

If the title of our book is the subject of this work
Weserbergland and the Teutoburg Forest, we are one
Conscious of certain unavoidable arbitrariness in the formulation of the task. we
understand Weserbergland to mean the hilly landscapes, which from
the confluence of the Werra and Fulda on both sides of the Weser
To accompany north, in the east to the edge of the
Leine traversed the Göttingen depression, in the west to the Münstersche
Bay and in the north to the North German Plain. The Teutoburger
Forest is specially named because it - like that too
Wiehengebirge and its nameless western continuation - stretching far
away from the Weser and protrudes into the area of ​​the Ems. Are the
Boundaries of our mountain country to the west and north by the beginning of the
Plains given without further ado, and one can think of the Leinetal as a
At least let go of the sheath against the eastern foothills of the Harz Mountains,
so the border to the south has something arbitrary insofar as one
the Hessian mountains, the northern continuation of which is the Weser Mountains
form, in many cases the Solling, the Reinhardswald, the Eggegebirge as well
attributed to the Nethegau, but on the other hand at least the Kaufunger
Wald, if not the Meissner, could ask for it, the godfather
to be added, who stand around the cradle of the Weser.

The area thus delimited is roughly a right-angled triangle
is, whose apex is south of Hanover at Bennigsen on
Deister is to be found, while the other two corners are in Münden and
in Bevergern near Rheine. From Bennigsen is the air line
to Münden about 100, to Bevergern 140 ~ km ~. The whole area would be
so approximately 7000 square kilometers in size. In this space the
Diverse terrain forms: elongated mountain ranges, here rugged
sloping, there more gently sloping, further plateaus and flatly rounded ones
Knolls, as well as formal cones, finally narrower and wider river and river
Stream valleys. Fresh deciduous and serious coniferous forests are being replaced
of lush fruit fields. In addition to poorly overgrown and sparse
populated strokes find densely populated areas with rich
developed agriculture or notable commercial activity.

Without pre-empting the individual description or the geological
to go into more detail now, we will have to try to make us
to orientate ourselves in this confusion for the time being. Let's start to the right of
the Weser. There, where the line is just transitioning from the west
in a northerly direction the Werra comes closest - the railway
Göttingen-Bebra crosses the watershed here at Eichenberg
- we can cross the border between Eichsfeld and Weserbergland
accept. The latter begins with one crowned by basalt domes
Plateau without the common common name for which we use the name
Want to accept Dransfelder Höhenland. To the north of it lies the
Sandstone plateau of the Solling. In the east of this mountain range is the
north-south running Muschelkalkrücke upstream of the Weper. in the
The two parallel chains of the Grubenhagener Berge line north,
as well as a little further away the Elfas, the Homburg group and the Vogler,
from southeast to northwest to the central Weser. This is followed by the
rock-famous, elongated ellipse of the Hilsmulde. A broad depression
separates them from Osterwald and Kleine Deister. This is separated by a narrow one
Pass from the actual Deister, the one bent to the southwest, through
the Auetal forms a secluded counterpart to the Bückeberg. A little further
to the south begins with the Süntel that long train, which is called the Weser chain
to Porta Westfalica.

On the left bank of the Weser lies the Dransfelder Höhenland opposite the
Reinhardswald. Its western slope leads over to that elongated,
undulating terrain that extends between the Weser on the one hand and the
Combing the Egge and the Teutoburg Forest on the other hand draws and
can be divided into Warburger Börde, Höxtersches Hügelland (or
Paderborn plateau) and Lippe hill country. The western one
Continuation of this area is then the Ravensberg and
Osnabrück hill country; its southern limit against that
Here, too, Münsterland is formed by the Teutoburg Forest, in the western one
Parts mostly called Osning, and that up to its end near the
Ems near Bevergern, the northern one on the left bank of the river
lying part of the Weser chain, sometimes called Wiehengebirge.

To understand this colorful orographic image in its individual features,
only the geologist can teach us. We'll talk about his first
have listen.




~ II. ~ The geological structure of the Weserbergland and the Teutoburg
Forest.

From Professor ~ Dr. ~ H. Stille-Hannover.


[Sidenote: geology. Faults and erosion.]

The topographical diversity of the mountain and hill country
between the Teutoburg Forest, Leinetal and the North German Plain,
of the Weser Uplands, is closely related to the
Diversity of geological structure. True, the number of
Formations covering more extensive areas are not uncommon
large, and we are mainly concerned with the sediments
of the Middle Ages of the earth, the Mesozoic period, to do; but the
Storage conditions are extremely varied and partial
only difficult to interpret, folds are in alternating directions
occurred and faults penetrate the soil in such numbers,
that it is mixed up in places like a formal mosaic
Flounder appears. Figure 2 shows a system of faults
from the eastern foreland of the Eggegebirge, which is the subsoil there
tears into hundreds of individual clods. To the by tectonic
Forces shifted against each other then have the forces
the erosion or denudation attached to the changeful picture
to conjure up our landscape. Soft material is light for them
fallen victim, hard has resisted and is with it
from the surrounding friable layers to the long drawn out ones
Mountain ridges and more stocky knolls have been carved out today
make up the most defining element of the landscape. In the main
thus causes the changing resistance of the layer complexes
today's relief; complexes sunk in relation to their neighborhood,
like the Hils, can appear as towering mountain ranges as soon as
only resistant material composing them while making the lines
¯geologically¯ highest elevation often enough run in valleys,
if crumbly layers, such as B. Red, lie in them. The amount of
Elevation [1] of the clods and clod complexes is expressed in the
Distribution of the formations at the surface of the day, and it lies on
of the hand that in the areas of greatest importance the oldest,
in the subsidence areas face the younger strata.

[1] The terms "uplift area", "subsidence area", "raised", "sunk"
are not absolute in the following, but only relative in the ¯dem¯ sense
understand that they are the current location of the clods of their neighborhood
should express. It remains unexplained whether z. B. a
"Elevation area" is actually something prominent or something
That remained standing, while the neighboring complexes in the depths
sank. The above terms are therefore only intended to reflect the current situation
express, but not the process that created this state.

[Illustration: Fig. 2. The fault system along the Egge Mountains
between Driburg and Willebadessen, recorded by H. Stille
1903-1904. Scale about 1: 80000.]

[Sidenote: From the oldest period to the Triassic.]

¯Pormermian "basement" ¯ only takes up further areas
just outside of the Weser Mountains in the Harz and Rhenish regions
Slate mountains, but only appears in our area in
three smaller incidents in the area of ​​Osnabrück. here
are the Ibbenbürener Bergplatte, the Piesberg and the Hüggel
coal-bearing conglomerates, sandstones and shale clays of the Upper
or productive carbons composed, and according to the floras that
Enclosing these layers, we have it with the upper parts of the
to do so-called "Saarbrücker level". On the Ibbenbürener Bergplatte
mining is still going on today on seams of the Upper Carboniferous, while
this on the Piesberg came to a standstill a little more than a decade ago
has come, and on the hill the presence of seams so far only
was established by deep drilling.

From the ¯Dyas¯ the lower level, the red lying, is completely missing,
and also certain red-colored layers of the hill that long for
Rotliegend were, according to more recent findings, not to this,
but to be included in the upper carbon. The Zechstein formation, the upper one
Part of the Dyas, is in the peripheral areas of the Upper Carboniferous Islands
Osnabrück present where they are on the hill and the Ibbenbürener Bergplatte
which encloses the Brown and Spateisensteinlager that established the
Georgsmarienhütte, and can also be found in isolated cases
small clods near Bonenburg on the southernmost Egge Mountains and in the
Areas of the Solling. A plaster stick that belongs to this formation,
we find at Stadtoldendorf an der Homburg, where the plaster in large
Fractions is obtained. They belong to the upper part of the Zechstein
Rock and potash deposits in the Leinetale in recent years
have been proven and have become the subject of mining.

The ¯Trias¯, the deepest part of the Mesozoic formation, takes
with its three limbs, red sandstone, shell limestone and keuper, see above
pretty much the whole area between the Teutoburg Forest on the one hand,
Weser chain, Süntel, Ith and Hils on the other hand. The red sandstone
sets the heights of the Solling and Reinhardswaldes and further north
Elfas and Vogler together and also forms the slopes of the Weser Valley
between Münden and Holzminden, near Bodenwerder and further north.
The sandstones of this formation are in the depths near Bad Pyrmont
of the cirque, while the adjoining slopes in their lower parts
formed by the reddish clays of the upper red sandstone
and also at the Teutoburg Forest is the red sandstone formation
often verifiable. The widespread Muschelkalk occurs on
closed between Solling and Teutoburg Forest and separates
here as the "Brakeler Muschelkalkschwelle" the two large Keupermulden
of the area between Teutoburg Forest and Weser, the so-called
Keupermulde von Borgentreich, which is about with the fertile »Warburger
Börde «and the Lippe Keupermulde. The latter takes
almost the entire area between the Weser and its left tributary,
der Werre, one, and only locally, such as B. at Pyrmont, is the Keuper
interrupted by bulges of older triassic layers. In that strong
undulating and very scenic mountain country that the railways
Cut through Hameln-Altenbeken and Hameln-Lage, we'll find them
finest examples of the dependence of the floor design on the
Composition of the subsoil by removing the lowlands from the friable
Marls and clays, the heights of the sandstones and quartzites of the
Keupers are assembled (Fig. 3). Namely the technical one
quite valuable quartzites of the upper Keuper or Rhaet often cover
the mountain peaks, like the Klüt near Hameln, the Lemgoer Mark near Lemgo,
Winterberg, Herrmannsberg and Schwalenberger Wald southwest of
Pyrmont and the Köterberg near Holzminden, one of the highest peaks
between Harz and Rhenish Slate Mountains. Furthermore, the Keuper
between Osning and Wiehengebirge in the area of ​​Melle and Osnabrück
quite considerable spread.

[Illustration: Fig. 3. Keuper landscape near Aerzen, southwest of
Hamelin. The higher mountain level is from the Rhät (Oberer Keuper), the lower
formed by sandstone reeds (Middle Keuper).

After a photograph by H. Stille in 1908.]

[Sidenote: Law.]

The lower and middle sections, the lias, consist of the ¯jura¯
(Schwarzer Jura) and the Dogger (Brauner Jura), predominantly from friable
Tonen, the upper department, the Malm (White Jura), but mainly from
solid limestone, and so it is only natural that the former in general
in valleys and on flat slopes, while the Malm
Forms mountain ranges. The Einbeck-Markoldendorfer basin, which belongs to the Solling
is upstream to the northeast, the Liaspartien in the eastern foreland
of the Eggegebirge and the Herford Liasmulde between Bielefeld and
Herford are examples of low areas of the older Jura strata,
while the long stretching mountain range of the Ith between
Coppenbrügge and Eschershausen, the Kahnstein and the Selter, the
Deister near Springe, the Saupark (Fig. 6) and the Weser chain (Fig. 4)
to be crowned by the White Jura. Mostly it is the so-called
Coral oolite of the White Jurassic, which forms the rocky cliffs on the uppermost slope
of the mountain ranges mentioned, so the Dielmisser rocks,
Hammerslust, Poppenstein and Mönchstein am Ith, the Bielstein am
Deister, the Hohenstein and the Luhdener cliffs on the Weser chain. In
the Weser chain west of the Porta Westfalica, d. H. in the Wiehengebirge,
and also reach a little east of the porta in the predominantly
Dogger hard sandstones (porta sandstones) consisting of clays
considerable thickness and set in places like at the porta
Ridge together, and another solid horizon of the Brown Jura,
the »Cornbrash«, consisting of iron lime sandstone, forms
far away small foothills to the main chain.

In contrast to the fairly considerable thickness of the white
Juras in the Weser chain stands the low development of this
Formation at the Teutoburger Walde, in its southern part, the
Eggegebirge, it is not known at all. Sometimes she likes
Deposition of these layers have not occurred, but are partially
also re-destruction soon after deposition, in part
also the reason of today's incompleteness of the faults
White Jurassic profiles.

[Sidenote: Cretaceous period.]

At the base of the 'chalk formation', the uppermost part of the
Mesozoic formation group, lies in northwest Germany of the
so-called Wealden, the opposite of all overlying him
Chalk layers in the main not formation of the sea, but
such a mainland swamp is. The main link is the
Wealdensandstein, also called Deistersandstein, which is the heights of the
Bückeberge, the Deister, the eastern Süntels, the Nesselberg and
Osterwaldes composed and here surrounds coal seams that z. B.
at Obernkirchen, Barsinghausen and at Osterwalde the subject of
Mining are. In addition to the sandstone, there are also shale clays, and
either only in the uppermost part, as in the Osterwalde and in the south-east
Deister, or in the top and bottom parts, as in the Süntel, in the
north-western Deister and in the Bückeberg.

[Illustration: Fig. 4. Profile through the Weser range and the Bückeberge.

Scale of the lengths approx. 1: 50000, the heights approx. 1: 25000. 1 = Brauner
Law. 2 = White Jura, exclusively Münder Marl and Serpulit.
3 = Münder marl. 4 = serpulite. 5 = Lower Wealden slate. 6 =
Wealden sandstone. 7 = Upper Wealden slate. 8 = Neocomtone.]

The landscape development in the Weißjura-Wealden area is one
different, depending on the sometimes very powerful sequence of
crumbly "Münder marl" between the limestone of the White Jura and the
also predominantly solid rocks of the Wealden are present or
Not. In the first case, which we can call the normal case,
we have two parallel trains, one from White Jura layers, one
other consists of Wealden sandstone and which is predominantly made by
Münder marl-filled lowland are separated. Watch this case
we z. B. in the line Rinteln-Bückeburg (Fig. 4), where the Weser chain
from White Jura, the parallel train of the Harrl consists of Wealden and
the dividing valley in which Bad Eilsen lies, in the underground
the main thing containing the Münder marl, or southwest jump,
where the Saupark of the White Jura, the Nesselberg of the Wealden and that
Put together the Münder marl along the valley between the two (Fig. 5
and 6, western part). Such a longitudinal valley is of course missing where
the mouths marl are not present, and so merge z. B. on
southeastern Deister Weißjura and Wealden into a single train
(Fig. 6, eastern part). The absence of the mouths of Mergel and others
White Jura layers are thereby removed before the deposition of the
Serpulits, the highest member of the White Jura, conditionally, the multiple
discordantly overlaid older layer complexes. Take Bückeburg to the west
the crumbly slate is becoming more and more prevalent compared to the sandstones, and
in connection with this, the tower, which towers further to the east, flattens out
Wealdenzug der Bückeberge and disappears with the Klus near Bückeburg
finally completely under the Diluvium of the North German Plain.

At the Teutoburger Walde we only know Wealden from Örlinghausen
northwestward; especially south of Osnabrück it occupies large areas
and also forms higher mountain groups. That used to be in several places
immediate mining on the Wealdenkohlen of the Teutoburg Forest is
has now come to a complete standstill.

The Neokom, the lower part of the marine Lower Cretaceous, enters
two facies, namely as clay along the north foot of the
Bückeberge and the Deister, am Süntel, Osterwalde and Hils, as
Sandstone at the Teutoburg Forest. The landscape is accordingly
Appearance a completely different one. The underground of
It forms low-lying areas near Bückeburg, Stadthagen and in the
Deistermulde between Deister on the one hand, Stemmer and Gehrdener Berg
on the other hand, towering mountain ranges mark its course along
the Teutoburg Forest from Blankenrode Castle in the extreme south
to Bevergern east of the Ems. As an uninterrupted band, the crowns
Teutoburgerwald sandstone, the one from Altenbeken to the north except
the Neokom still the deepest part of the following level, the Gault,
includes, the eastern steep slope of the Eggegebirge and forms here the
Watershed between Weser and Rhine; the rock needles of the Externsteine
in the case of Horn consist of it, as in the rest of the world, or for the most part
the Stemberg near Berlebeck, the Grotenburg near Detmold, the Tönsberg
near Örlinghausen, the Hünenburg near Bielefeld, the Barenberg near
Borgholzhausen and the Dörenberg near Iburg.

[Illustration: Fig. 5. View from Deister over the valley of Springe
(Lias and Dogger) to the Saupark (middle mountain range, White Jura) and
Nesselberg (rear mountain range, Wealden). Between Saupark and Nesselberg
lies the long valley filled by Münder marl (see Fig. 6). After a
Photograph by F. Schöndorf 1908. (To page 9.)]

The contrast between the sandstone facies of the Neocom on the Teutoburg
Forest and the clay facies in the northeast lying areas
its simple explanation by the fact that in the area of ​​today
Westphalia was a mainland and in its surrounding areas,
d. H. where the Teutoburg Forest rises today, sands and
Scree layers were sedimented while in the more coastal areas
only the finer clayey materials could be transported.

[Illustration: Fig. 6. The Deister Saupark saddle. (To pages 9 and 18.)

Scale approx. 1: 125000. 1 = Middle Keuper. 2 = lias. 3 = Dogger. 4th
= Oxford. 5 = Kimmeridge, Gigassschichten and Plattenkalke. 6 = mouths
Marl. 7 = serpulite. 8 = Wealden. 9 = Neocom. 10 = Diluvium. To the
The abbreviation of the profile is the fault between Keuper and Wealden,
which only penetrates to the southwest of Brünnighausen, somewhat to the northeast
postponed.]

We find the upper part of the Lower Chalk, the Gault, on the Hils
represented at the bottom by the »Hilssandstein«, which here has the ridge
the highest elevation, the "bare cell," and further
by means of "mini clay" and "flame marl"; corresponds to the Hilssandstein
on the southern Egge, such as the Altenbeken tunnel, a glauconite,
sandy clay, on the rest of the Teutoburg Forest the upper part of the
Teutoburg Forest Sandstones, the Minimuston near Altenbeken and further
south of the red-colored »Gaultsandstein«, on the rest of the Teutoburg Forest
the "green sand of the Osnings", and marl of flames is all over the Teutoburger
Forest in a development similar to that of the Hils.

Of the Upper Cretaceous, the Cenomanians and Turon are mainly through
light colored, partly marly limestone, so-called "planes",
represent. These set the Hils at Grünenplan and Kaierde
Heimberg, Idtberg and Fahrenberg together and have their furthest
Distribution in the Teutoburg Forest. There they build in the hinterland of the
Harrow the entire mountain ridge up to the Senne, which is here at height
stay behind the ridge of the Teutoburg Forest sandstone,
while on the Osning the plan in serrated crests often corresponds to him
towered over parallel sandstone to the north. At the base
the plan formation form the Cenomanmergel as a result of the low
Resistance to weathering a long valley between
the mountain range of the Lower Chalk and the Planer Mountains, all of that
Teutoburg Forest as a highly characteristic landscape element
is to be followed (Fig. 7). In it lie the towns by the harrow
Herbram, Schwaney, Buke, Altenbeken, Feldrom, and here it is
shallow storage of the layers a considerable width while it
on the Osning with a steep position of the layers and corresponding
Narrowing of their outgoing less broad, but no less
is clearly traceable.

[Illustration: Fig. 7. The long valley of the Cenomanmergel near Berlebeck im
Teutoburg Forest.

After a photograph by H. Stille in 1908.]

The Senon is in the area of ​​the Teutoburg Forest by the little
resistant "Emscher Mergel" represented, and it is only
of course that in the line Brackwede-Schlangen-Lippspringe-Paderborn,
in which it borders on the tough plans of the Teutoburg Forest, the
Mountains reached its south or east edge and the vastness
Level begins, which is under a sometimes quite powerful ceiling of
Quaternary formations which contain senonic layers.

[Sidenote: Tertiary.]

The tertiary mountains are only found in isolated, mostly submerged clods
known, of which that of Bünde in Westphalia because of its large size
Abundance in Upper Oligocene fossils special celebrity
has attained. Basaltic effusions also fall into the tertiary period
Rocks that we find in the southernmost part of the Weser Mountains, z. Am
the Warburger Börde (Desenberg near Warburg, Hüssenberg near Eißen), on
Reinhardswalde (Gahrenberg, Staufenberg, Sababurg), Solling (Bramburg)
and south of the Solling (Hoher Hagen). The northernmost German
Basalt forms a short and narrow corridor in the Sandebeck Triassic
at the Eggegebirge.

[Sidenote: Ice Age.]

From Detmold to the Weser Valley south of Hameln and further around the northern end
des Iths into the Hilsmulde, around the Kahnstein and around the
Mountains on the left side of the Leinetal up to Freden stretch
in a winding course the southern edge of the ¯diluvial glaciation¯. the
Lippe forest was still outside it while she was passing through the
Cross valleys of the Osnings and partly even beyond them
Penetrated south into the Munster basin. How far the northern
Mountain ranges of the Weser Mountains as islands towered over the inland ice,
may remain open, at least z. B. the Deister completely
buried under ice, like boulder clay with Nordic blocks on top
the height of the small mountains on Bielstein proves, and it was the same
also the case with the Bückeberg. Earlier higher water levels our
River valleys, e.g. B. the Weser valley, indicate the over the today's valley floors
lying river terraces. Huge gravel embankments are the porta
Westfalica in front of the south-east and as paragraphs of the Weser from a
Time has been interpreted in which the inland ice was the Westphalian gate of
The north and dammed up the water coming from the south.

[Sidenote: Dune formation.]

The layers of chalk lie on the Osning and in the Lippe forest
buried deep under dune sands that especially fill the valleys
(Fig. 8), but not entirely lacking in the heights. The southern border of the
Overflows (Fig. 9) can be explained by the location of the Teutoburger
Forest to the diluvial area of ​​the Senne, from which the sands originate, and
the prevailing southwest direction of the winds making the transport
worried.

[Illustration: Fig. 8. Dune landscape in the Lippe forest. After a
Photograph by H. Stille 1908.]

       * * * * *

According to its internal structure, the Weser Uplands can be seen as
to designate a "Schollengebirge" than in it the turmoil of the
The main subsoil into larger and smaller clods
The appearance of the mountain-building forces. It is
but - at least in large parts - it is by no means typical
Schollengebirge, on the contrary, there is a convergence of the layers
to saddles and hollows, d. H. a wrinkling, widely counteracting that
on the Osning, the northern Teutoburg Forest, to the steep position
and overturning of large complexes of layers increases, and some parts,
like the Osning in particular, one would almost like to go through extensive
Fracture formation denote modified small fold mountains.

[Illustration: Fig. 9. South edge of the dune formations at the Teutoburg Forest.

Scale 1: 1500000.]

[Sidenote: painting the mountain ranges.]

The elimination of the majority of the mountain ranges, such as the Ith, Hils and
Selter, Saupark and Deister, Weser Mountains and Osnings, go
predominantly in a Hercynian sense, d. H. from southeast to northwest.
The north-south course of the can only be found receding
Mountain ranges, as in the southern Teutoburg Forest, the Egge Mountains,
or south-west-north-east, as on the Bückeberg mountains. The direction of the
Bergzüge is by the likewise predominantly hercynian going
Strike the strata and faults conditionally, while north-south
directed, so-called "Rhenish" breaks in our area
step back and only a little south and east of it, as in
Leinetale between Eichenberg and Northeim, of great importance
win for the construction of the subsurface. They own them there
more north-northeast direction, which is so characteristic of the
entire large fracture zone is that of the Upper Rhine Valley through Wetterau and
Hessian depression, through the Leinetal and the western edge of the
Harz to the North German Plain is detectable. Not really
The Egge Mountains are "Rhenish", where rather the
General cancellation of the strata and dislocations north-north-west
goes; the Eggegebirge has a middle direction between
the typically Hercynian (southeast-northwest) and typically Rhenish
(South-southwest-north-northeast) direction and is also the result of
Mountain formation in both senses. But while the influence of the
Mountain formation in the Rhenish sense of the Teutoburg Forest from the south
weakened to the north, the Hercynian (northwestern) wins the
Overhand and ultimately alone determines the course of the osning.

The overview of the rather complicated structure of the
Weserbergland is created by following the geological axes
relieved, d. H. those lines along which a particularly high one
Elevation of the layers has taken place. We start in the northwest, im
Osning and Wiehengebirge areas.

[Sidenote: The Osning.]

The Osning is the north, following the north-westerly direction
Part of the Teutoburg Forest, the edge of the Westphalian mountains
Chalk basin. While the layers of chalk on the harrow, the
southern Teutoburg Forest, lie flat and at most below 7 to 9 °
to the west, d. H. towards the interior of the trough, are inclined, forms on Osning
the steep erection of the chalk layers are the rule, and are far away
it even tips over so that older lies above younger, as in that
The cross valley of Brackwede-Bielefeld can be observed. A significant one
The Teutoburg Forest has breadth in its southern part, however
to the extent that the smear of the
solid chalk layers narrowing towards the northwest, decreased
also the breadth of the mountain range, which finally leads to the narrow train
of the Osnings. Close to the chalk of Osnings, from her only through
narrow strips separated from Jura or Keuper, red and red occur
Muschelkalk approach, but are in contrast to the steep ones
Layers of the chalk are stored fairly flat and fall with faint
Slope to the north, where they are covered by Keuper and Jura
(Fig. 10). By and large, the Osning is a saddle, however
one with that deep along the saddle crevice or one
System of echelons sunk south wing that the chalk in
the level of the older Triassic of the north wing reached. Illustration
10 gives a schematic picture of this, showing the area to the east
Bielefeld is based on; in it are to simplify the illustration
the intermediate series between the upper red sandstone and chalk
omitted. The Westphalian chalk basin turns out to be opposite
the triassic layers of the osnings as a subsidence field
Scale, and the northern edge of this depression field coincides with
the »Osning abbruch« along the »Osningachse«, that of the whole Osning
to be followed uplift line of this mountain range (Fig. 11). The pressure,
who created the mountains came from the south, and the back country, d. H. the the
The part of the Osningsattel facing the pressure direction went down,
whereby the sinking [A] stratified tables are when sliding along the
remaining [2] mass of the north wing at its outermost edge
straightened up to the point of tipping over and far below the Osningspalte
Continuation of the horizontal pressure leading to the Osning thrust.
We have here the case of vertical subsidence working together
and horizontal pressure with sinking backland, which E. Sueß as
Called "refolding".

[2] cf. Note on page 7.

[Illustration: Fig. 10. Schematic profile of the osning (under
Omission of the intermediate series between chalk and red sandstone).]

[Illustration: Fig. 11. The uplift lines of the Teutoburg Forest.
Scale 1: 1500000.]

[Illustration: Fig. 12. The Teutoburg Forest near Detmold. The front one
Bergzug consists of shell limestone and contains the »Osning axis«, the
rear (Grotenburg with Hermannsdenkmal) made of chalk.

After a photograph by H. Stille in 1908.]

If the tectonic picture of Osning, as it is in
Figure 10 is given from the area east of Bielefeld, in the
Modified in various ways, it remains as something constant
and step by step to follow the highlighting after a
Hercynically directed, often torn saddle line, the
Osning axis, exist, and also the paleozoic nests of the hill
and the Ibbenbürener Bergplatte are linked to this axis. until
near Detmold, for example, it is very close to the edge of the Westphalian region
Chalk, but then moves something away from it. Form in Figure 12
beyond the city of Detmold, those bulging up after the Osning axis
Shell limestone layers the first mountain range, beyond which the das
Hermannsdenkmal bearing chalk chain becomes visible. Furthermore is
the axis from the author to the foothills of the Egge Mountains east
was pursued by Driburg, where at Herste this most important of all
Elevation lines of the Weser Mountains in a flat saddle of Röt
and wave lime fades away. Here, as further north near Hermannsborn,
Vinsebeck, and in a certain sense also at Meinberg, are interested in that
Jump system bound along the axis of carbonic acid emissions. at
Herste prevent the impermeable red layers of carbonic acid
Exit, unless there are natural crevices or artificial boreholes
create the connection to the depth. Figure 13 shows us one of the
Drilled carbon dioxide from the company Rommenhöller A.-G. to Herste,
who, as it rises, pulls water up with it from the depths.

[Illustration: Fig. 13. Carbon dioxide from the Rommenhöller A.-G.
at Herste.

After a photograph by Otto Liebert in Holzminden.]

[Illustration: Fig. 14. Profile through Falkenhagener Liasgraben and
Köterberg. Scale 1: 40000. (See page 18.)]

[Sidenote: The Wiehengebirge.]

On the red and shell limestone on the north wing of the Osningsattels lie down
north of Bielefeld the layers of Keuper, Lias, Doggers and Malms,
and only insignificant perturbations and foldings modify locally
the picture of a normal sequence of layers from Osning to Wiehengebirge.
The latter owes its character as a mountain range to the high mountains alone
Resilience of the White Jurassic and individual Brown Jurassic layers
against the denudation, which penetrates deeply in the area of ​​the Lias and Keupers.
The Wiehengebirge is thus a "tiered mountain range" on the north wing
of the Osningsattels, not a tectonically independent mountain range, and
also ¯ his line of elevation is the same for part of its extension
Osning axis (Fig. 15). Further northwest, however, appear north of the
Osning axis and parallel to it two new axes (Fig. 10), the one
of the Holter saddle and that of the Piesberg [3], so that we are here
between the Westphalian chalk basin and the Wiehengebirge,
like further south-east, only the one uplift line, the Osning axis,
but have three of them, all of which are heartynically judged, and
of which the Piesberg axis is considered to be the northernmost to the elevation line of the
Wiehengebirge is. From the carbon of the Piesberg lies to the white
Jura des Wiehengebirge a fairly uninterrupted sequence
northward falling strata, the north wing of the Piesbergsattels
forming. A somewhat narrow-minded fault cuts this
Layers to the west, namely the White Jura near Neuenkirchen,
and that ends with the resilience of the Jura layers
conditional Wiehengebirge.

[3] The information about the Piesberg axis and the ending of the
Wiehengebirge are based on E. Haarmann's investigations.

[Sidenote: Egge Mountains. Lippe Keupermulde.]

The strong now lie parallel to the Osning axis and south of it
disturbed foothills of the Eggegebirge further uplift lines, and all
these disappear to the west under the chalk of the Egge Mountains and
Lippe Forest (Fig. 10); the chalk has no part in the harrow
at the bulge following the axes, but lies over it discordantly
the unfolded and shifted clods away.

We have the Egge Mountains due to the resilience of the
Layers as a mountain wall towering the eastern edge of the denudation
Westphalian chalk, which lies flat and undisturbed here. The folding
is on the Teutoburg Forest in pre-Cretacian times from the south, the area
of today's harrow, gone out and in postcretacian (tertiary)
Time, sometimes even after the late Cretaceous period
North, to the Osning, advanced.

[Illustration: Fig. 15. The Wiehengebirge as a layer on the
North wing of the Osning Saddle.

~ Kr ~ = chalk. ~ j_ {3} ~ = Malm. ~ j_ {2} ~ = Dogger. ~ j_ {1} ~ = Lias. ~ Kp ~ =
Keuper. ~ m ~ = shell limestone. ~ bs ~ = red sandstone. (To page 16.)]

In contrast to the disturbance of the layers at the Teutoburger Walde
we have in the wide area between these mountains and the
Weser quite regular storage conditions. Takes the main part
the Lippe Keupermulde, from which the in its core emerges
Made of red sandstone, the Pyrmonter saddle arches out. the
Faults in the depths of the Pyrmont valley basin,
are not significant in terms of jump height, but to that extent
most remarkable than the healing springs of the bath
Get daily surface. In the Hercynian passing away of the Pyrmonter
A shell-lime saddle arches southeast of Vlotho from the saddle
Keuper up, and continues to be omitted in the system of disturbances
along the "Pyrmont axis" from Vlotho to Oeynhausen
traceable jump, which one is in deep layers of the earth's crust
native thermal brine of the bath Oeynhausen opens the way to higher,
from which it is obtained through boreholes. 10 ~ km ~ southwest
from this runs the "spring jump" of Bad Salzuflen, the northern abyss
the Herford Lias basin. The Pyrmonter axis (Fig. 9) is a
Axis parallel to that of the Osnings, and it will be determined later
whether it is as the continuation of the Piesberg axis beyond one
Area may apply more floating storage. The southern part of the
Lippe Keupermulde runs through in a north-west-south-east direction
from pollen to almost the harrow a zone of sunken layers of liass,
the Falkenhagener Grabenzone. It runs a little north of the
Köterberg, which consists of Oberem Keuper (Rhät) at the height, which we
at the Falkenhagener Graben, sunk deep under the Lias.
The demolition takes place in a stepped manner, as shown in Figure 14 in
Altitude of the Rhaet am Bentberge is expressed.

To the southeast, the Weser follows on the left between Höxter and Holzminden
as lying in the Keupermulde gradually lifting out
Layers of the Muschelkalk, which are to the west in the Brakeler
Continue Muschelkalkschwelle, and finally beyond that
Weser the extensive red sandstone layers of the Sollinger
Forest, which is here in many cases by stripes sunk in the shape of a trench
Tertiary mountains are interrupted; to such recessed strips is that
Lignite mining of the Solling bound.

[Sidenote: The mountains to the right of the Weser.]

The geological continuation of the Solling to the south and to a certain extent
only a part separated from it by the Weser valley is that
Reinhardswald. North-east of the Solling, partly through it
the sinking of the lias of the Einbeck-Markoldendorfer basin separated,
a train runs in a saddle-shaped arrangement and at faults
against the neighboring areas of raised red sandstone layers,
which composes the mountain ranges of the Elfas, Homburgwald and Vogler.
We find in it an important uplift line of the Weser mountain region,
which we after the anticline of the Elf, which falls into it, as the
“Elfasachse” and even in the Homburg area
Zechstein layers reach the surface of the day. Against that along
according to the findings of
O. Grupe of the Solling sunk at a Hercynian fracture zone. One
Elevation line of the same tectonic importance, the "Leinetalachse",
follows the Leinetale between Elze and Groß-Freden and brings the
Potash salts from Zechstein in minable depths. Between the Elfas
and the Leinetalachse lies with likewise Hercynian stroke that
Tectonic subsidence composed of layers of Jurassic and Cretaceous
the Hilsmulde. The White Jura stands out sharply in it
Southwest wing the Ith, on the northeast wing the Kahnstein, Thüster Berg,
Duinger Berg and Selter composed. Form the inside of the trough
Chalk layers that form the towering mountain range of the Hils
which the whole hollow is named. From the Ith to the Weser near Bodenwerder
we hike through Keuper and Muschelkalk across their brush and
cross the backs of the solid ones, which are easy to follow in the movement
Layers, initially those of the Rhaetian, the Hasselburg and the
Schecken (Obensburg) near Hameln leads, and then those of the
Shell limestone. Between the red sandstone made of Vogler and
The crumbly layers of reddish form between the shell limestone
the Muschelkalk and Rhätzuges those of the Middle Keuper
and between Rhätzug and Ith those of the lower and the middle
Jura's hercynian depressions. The opposite wing of the
Muschelkalkzuges in the foothills of the Ith we find between Kahnstein and
Leine in the mountain range of the Külf.

Figure 6 on page 10 shows a profile through the mountain ranges between
the northern end of the Hilsmulde and the Hanoverian Plain. In the large
and all in all we have a saddle, the core of which is in the valley of Springe
and its wing from the Deister on the one hand, from the Saupark and
Nesselberg on the other hand. The merging ones
Mountain ranges of the Osterwald, Saupark and Nesselberg belong tectonically
close together and form a deeply shattered hollow of
Wealden and Jurassic layers, of which, however, in the northern parts of the
West wing due to the fault indicated in Figure 6
is cut off.

The Münder Mergel, which is still missing on the southeastern Deister, is found
at about the level of Springe and swell to the west and
Northwest strongly, where from them in the salt pans of Münder and
Sooldorf Sole is obtained. The northwest part of the little one
The main mass of the Deister Mountains consists of falling northwards
Layers of the Wealden, and to the extent that the solid Wealden sandstone
after Bad Nenndorf loses its thickness, it also decreases
the height of the mountains, although there are still all sorts of disturbances
play a role. A narrow depression separates them near Nenndorf
Northwest end of the Deister from the northeast end of the Bückeberge, the
in this outermost part bear the name Heisterberg, and Deister
and Heisterberg arrange themselves symmetrically with their layers
an axis directed north-south in such a way that we consider it strong
can address diverging wings of a saddle. This axis
moves on in the Hercynian direction that the Deister in
followed along its entire length and that continued from the Bückeberg
is taken to the east, and the deviating direction is taken to the east
Bückeberge is based on a purely local bending of the layers in the middle
an otherwise Hercynian saddle system.

We have already seen that the bridge overhangs one through the
Resilience of the Wealden sandstone rock threshold in the
Hanging slopes of the Jura of the Weser mountain range and the south of the Weser
emerging Keupers (Fig. 4). The Weser Mountains
leads east to the Süntel, namely the Weißjura layers in the
Strengthening of the Weser chain, as E. Scholz has recently done in detail
has examined the south wing of the Süntel Syncline, the interior of which is in the
eastern parts of the small mountain range next to the slightly expanded Neokom
which by and large describe the shape of a horseshoe
Layers of the Wealden occupy the subsoil of the highest
Form elevations of the Süntels.




~ III. ~ Climate and waters.


[Sidenote: Climate.]

The climate of the Weser Uplands can be described as moderate.
The mean annual temperature in the main valleys up to the upper reaches of the
As in the upstream flatlands to the north, rivers are above 8 ° ~ C ~,
while it sinks to 6 ° on the heights. The distribution of heat on
the four seasons is much different than in the lowlands.
January shows an average level in the valleys up to Münden
from 0 °, at the heights of -1 °, is colder than on the coast,
where the sea has a warming effect, and warmer than on the neighboring ones
Low mountain ranges, Harz, Rhön, Thuringian Forest with -3 to -4 °. In April
on the other hand, the mean temperature of the mountain valleys exceeds that of the
Flat land, as the higher position of the sun in the south is already noticeable
makes, while near the lake the still wintry cold sea water
adversely affects the air temperature. It is in this time of year
the coastal temperature of about 7 ° that of 8 ° in the valleys of the
upper Weser area opposite. Of course, the heights also have then
on average only 5 to 6 °, but still surpass the Rhön
3 °, the Thuringian Forest with 2 ° and the Brocken with 0.5 °. Have in July
the valleys of the hill country roughly the same temperature as that
Flat land, namely 17 to 18 °, as the opposite effect of the
higher position of the sun in the south and the absolutely higher position
cancel. At higher altitudes, on the other hand, there is a rapid decrease in
Temperature, on the 300 to 500 ~ m ~ high Weser Mountains up to 15 °
(Compare Rhön 13 °, ridge of the Thuringian Forest 12 °, Brocken 11 °). the
October finally shows figures similar to the annual average.

[Sidenote: Temperature and Precipitation.]

The increase and decrease in temperature does not occur uniformly from
Month to month. The fastest increase occurs by 4 to 5 ° from April
for May, the strongest crash from October to November; slowly against it
(around 1 °) is the temperature decrease from July to August and from
December to January, just as slowly the increase from January to February.

Let's call winter the time when the mean daytime temperature in
Average of the years drops below freezing, so is that
Duration in the lowlands of our area to two to four weeks
estimate. On the other hand, on the heights it lasts from the beginning of December to
End of February. Let the remark that the plain country serve as a comparison
on the lower reaches of the Weser does not know any winter in the stated sense that
on the other hand, winter prevails on the Rhön from mid-November to mid-March
and on the Brocken for five months.

[Illustration: Fig. 16. High beech forest on the Blümer Berg near Münden. (To
Page 31.)]

[Sidenote: rainfall.]

In general, the higher places have the larger annual ones
Precipitation, as the rising of the humid layers of air in
higher and colder locations a compression of the water vapors and thus
causes the well-known incline rain. But it has to be taken into account
In addition to the altitude of a location, the question of whether it is on the windward side (i.e.
in our climate west side) of the neighboring mountains or on the
east side facing away from the wind. There is never so much on the latter
Precipitation. In general, the air flowing in from the sea loses
on their way inland more and more of their moisture, so that
Places of the same altitude in the west have more precipitation than in
East. For example, you can find them on the Wiehengebirge and the Teutoburger
Forest already has a rainfall of 700 ~ mm ~ at 70 ~ m ~ above sea level,
while in the Solling up to 175 ~ m ~, im
Harz must rise up to 200 ~ m ~. About 1 ~ m ~ annual rainfall
show only a few high places of the Teutoburg Forest and
of the Egge Mountains, the heights of the Solling come to 900 to 1000 ~ mm ~,
Hilses, Iths and Süntels, also the Köterberg and other parts of the
Teutoburg Forest; the zone from 800 to occupies much larger areas
900 ~ mm ~, while the valleys and
Fill in the slopes from 600 to 800 ~ mm ~.

[Illustration: Fig. 17. Yew ruins near Freudental not far from Münden. (To
Page 28.)]

The rainiest month anywhere is July with 11 to 13% of the population
Annual amount, the wettest season of the summer. This has in the
Valleys of the south 34-38 per cent of the total annual amount of rain.
But the higher the places are, the more the others get
Seasons their share of the rainfall, so that on the
Solling - similar to the Upper Harz - already the winter rains
predominate.

The number of days of precipitation in the valleys is about 150 for
Year; it is greater on the heights. Let it be compared with the fact that
Hanover only 137, Cassel 149, Osnabrück 164 and Schießhaus im
Solling have 173 days of precipitation. It goes within a month
average number not over 18 and not down under 10.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 18. The kiln is "fetching". From the Solling.
(See page 34.)]

One wanted from the distribution of precipitation in the individual
Months and seasons directly affect those in the streams and rivers
the amount of water transported to the valley, so one would think
greatly deceive. It should not be forgotten that the
Times of the heaviest precipitation due to their high temperatures
also are the times of strongest evaporation. As a result, dry up
especially on limestone soil and on crevice-rich sandstone where the water
tends to run underground, the brooks often completely in summer,
such as B. with its characteristic name the Durrbeke near Altenbeken
and the Holzminde drought in Solling; and the Weser itself unfortunately has
their lowest water level just at the time where else for that
Shipping conditions are most favorable. Larger amounts of water,
yes flooding brings mild winter and spring weather when the
accumulated moisture reserves as a result of the snow melt
Hurry down the valley. The floods used to be in the flatter sections of the valley
very feared and disruptive to traffic, so they have been since
better regulation of the course of the river, the deepening of the bed,
the widening of the passages, etc. most of their horrors
lost. Flood disasters like those of February 1909 belong
at least one of the rarities.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 19. Koehlerhütte in Vogler. (See page 34.)]

[Sidenote: The Weser.]

When the Weser enters our area near Münden, it actually has
already two-fifths of their way and almost three-fifths of theirs
in the mountainous country falling behind. Because we will
Werra have to be addressed as the uppermost part of the Weser. Although the
Fulda has a precipitation area that is a quarter larger than the Werra and
In the Eder, along with the Schwalm, tributaries are of one importance,
how they are lacking in the Werra; but she is behind in terms of running length
the Werra in the ratio of three to four. Also speaks
in favor of the Fulda the flow rate, which under normal conditions
which comes at least equal to the Werra, but at high tide it at
far exceeds it, so one could run the same direction for the Werra
and cite the same character as forest mountain stream while
the Fulda, apart from the lowest part, has its own physiognomy
has as a drainage of a gently undulating, open hill country. This
The impression must have already been imposed on our ancestors. Otherwise
if they did not have their own for the river coming down from the Rhön
Name given and would not have been the child of the Thuringian Forest
named with the name of the main stream. But this is actually the case
happen. Because the forms »Werra« and »Weser« are well known
same original form »Wisar-Aha«, d. H. West river, underlying that by a
not unusual alignment of the ~ S ~ with ~ R ~ in Central German
Language area became "Wirraha" and then "Werra", while the
Low German residents received the ~ S ~ and the name only too
"Wesera" and "Weser" were shortened. So if you don't, like earlier
Times it did each of the two names in relation to the whole stream
relate and want to apply one or the other, depending on the situation
if you speak High German or Low German, then you would have to
Lower Saxony name from the language border downwards
use and so the piece of the river from above Hedemünden to
Already attribute the influence of the Fulda to the Weser.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 20. Koehler in Solling on the burning pile.
(See page 34.)]

The valley from Münden to Minden shows a regular change
between narrow, winding ravines and wide, more straight or
flat arched valleys. This change depends on the
geological condition of the site insofar as the
Flow in the valleys of the latter kind generally on rock boundaries
flows along, but in the other case its way through one and the same
Formation breaks through, one after the other through red sandstone,
Muschelkalk, Keuper and Jura. In this way there are seven
Stream sections, the first four of which are approximately the same length
have, namely around 40 to 45 ~ km ~ each, but the last three together
are only half as long as each of the first.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 21. Köhler in the Solling packing manufacturer
Coals. (See page 35.)]

In the uppermost section, the Weser flows from Münden to Herstelle in
narrow crevice through red sandstone, from there on the border between the
two oldest members of the Triassic to the mouth of the Forstbach
in a fairly wide valley. At the forest domain she enters the
Muschelkalk plateau, which it breaks through in a narrow valley.
The fourth section of the valley begins at Ohsen
Lippe villages Erder can count on, and apart from the something
narrow point near Hameln is again quite wide. He is parting
this time the Jurassic Weser chain from the Keuperbergen Lippes. thenthe breakthrough through the Keuper Mountains 
follows from Erder to Rehme;
from Rehme to Hausberge, the Weser flows between the Weser chain and
significant diluvial deposits in a wide valley eastward, and finally
- that would be the seventh section - she breaks through that in the porta
Weser Mountains.

On this run the Weser has a straight line distance of about
105 ~ km ~ covers a distance of 204 ~ km ~ and is 79 ~ m ~
fallen, d. H. average 387 ‰ or 1: 2584, being natural
the upper course generally has a steeper slope than that
lower routes.

[Illustration: Fig. 22. Sattelmeierhof Nordhof near Enger. (To page
45.)]

Stream splits are extremely rare in the Weser and wherever they
occur, caused by deposits of heavy debris that
either more directly from the valley walls or through the intermediary of
Tributaries were fed to the stream bed. Most of the time you have them artificially
eliminated. Only at Hameln and Bodenwerder is there a real one
Island. The river is temporarily divided during floods,
whose flood channels are called "Old Weser" in some places and in
individual cases may really correspond to former river beds.
The width of the stream, measured from bank to bank, is
above Carlshafen an average of 100, below 120 to 140 ~ m ~.
The width of the transom naturally fluctuates and remains around at mean water
about 30 ~ m ~ behind that. It is just as different by location and
Time the depth of the river. Where artificial excavation of the bed is necessary
was, on the so-called "heads," d. H. Swelling of the natural
Underground, one is content with a 25 m wide fairway that
according to regulations at the lowest water level above Carlshafen
80 ~ cm ~, but below it should be 1 ~ m ~ deep. Is in favorable places
the depth is somewhat greater even at low tide, but at medium tide
- apart from a few more preferred places - 2 ~ m ~ and
about it.

[Sidenote: Weser tributaries.]

The Weser receives its tributaries during its course through the hill country
mainly from the left, there on the right the watershed against the line
and later against the floodplain and other flatland brooks too close.
So are even the largest of the brooks that flow from the right, like
the Schwülme from the Dransfelder Höhenland, the Lenne from the Hilsmulde
and Hamel vom Süntel of no great importance. In contrast, would be
on the left to name the Diemel, which from the heights of the Sauerland with
down a considerable slope and in its estuary
Carlshafen used to be seriously considered as a shipping route
the Neihe, the Emmer, the Humme and the Exter,
and finally the Werre, which together with its tributaries Else and
Bega a considerable part of the Lippe and Ravensberg
Hill country drained. As is well known, Else is on top of her
Running piece at Gesmold in a naturally created, but artificial
regulated connection with the hare, which takes a third of its water
Else gives up, while the rest remains with her and later with the
Ems flows in. This is the famous rabbit bifurcation for which the
Local residents use the pretty word Twielbiäke (Zwieselbach).

[Illustration: §. Fig. 23. Franconian homestead in Niederscheden bei
Münden. (See page 44.)]

It may also be mentioned that part of our hill country is in the east and
North-east to the Leine, in the north to the Hunte and thus only indirectly to the
Weser drains; the west and south-west slopes of the Egge-Osning-Zug
on the other hand, some of their rainwater sends to the Lippe and thus to the
Rhine, partly to the Ems. On the plateau of Hartröhren in the Teutoburger
Forest, not far from the Hermannsdenkmal, is the »hydrographic
Junction «, at which the area of ​​the Weser with that of the Ems and the
Rhine collides. And truly, you have the impression that you are here
enough water flowed down from the sky for all three rivers, if one
hears that the Hartröhrer forester has an annual mean of 1042 ~ mm ~ and in years
1894 even measured 1159 ~ mm ~ precipitation.




~ IV. ~ The forest.


If we go into the following section about the plant cover of our
Want to act in the area, we are already entering the border
between physical and anthropogeography. Because today's
Vegetation is only partly a natural result
Conditions, and alongside, if not before them, appear as determinants
Power of man. He not only points out the individual plant and whole
Groups to dwellings and banishes them from others, but he lets
whole families of plants from one country also disappear and
make room for immigrant strangers. How quickly such a
Change even within a human life, this
Observation agreed with the noble singer Walter von 700 years ago
the bird pasture is elegiac, since he is an elderly man in his homeland
returned. He exclaimed plaintively:

    Where once the fir forest rustled in the deep darkness,
    There were golden ears of wheat, nodding cornflowers inside -
    Only you, beloved water, flow there as usual. (Samhaber.)

[Illustration: Fig. 24. Courtyard in Kalkriese near Engter (Osnabrück).
Owner: Farm owner W. Fisse-Niewedde. (See page 45.)]

[Sidenote: Change in the landscape.]

Anyone who returns to the Weser Uplands after a long absence will
make the same observations; yes often he won't even that
find old watercourses again, but instead of the meandering ones
Brooks "straightened" trenches. But with the murmuring spring there is much
lovely little flower fallen victim to the coupling. The stronger one
Utilization of every patch of earth, the paving or gravel
the so-called ruderal flora has the so-called ruderal flora to clear up wild corners
the roadsides, dung sites and piles of rubble to the downfall
consecrated. The bushes made up of oaks and beeches, the special
in Osnabrück and elsewhere in Westphalia between the fields
are sprinkled in and the whole district has the character of a woodland
give, although the proportion of wood in the land cover
is comparatively not so large, they disappear more and more (Fig. 101).
The same goes for the high wall hedges in Westphalia, which are next to
Beech and oak also contain hawthorn and hazelnut bushes, and
the "Kämpe" are transformed into an open field. The church members are
disappeared and turned into a field. This is from the old forest trees
Yew tree almost extinct, and the few specimens that are still growing in the wild
are shown as “natural monuments” (Figs. 17 and 81). The forest is over
the depths of the valleys almost entirely banished. In much higher altitudes
in places the fields have risen; but neither the tender one
The blue of the flax blossom, the lush golden yellow of the rape adorns
more the slopes and the valley widths. Gone are the days in
to those "of the poplars proud families in orderly pomp and grace
marched along magnificently «. The pyramid poplar, also a stranger by the way,
a child of sunny French-speaking countries has that on our military roads
inconspicuous, but nutritious apple tree have to give way because one of their
has recognized unfavorable influence on the adjacent fields, which it
with its widespread roots it deprives food. On the other hand, however
has also dealt with the restriction of home slaughter and home bakery
Need for wooden hollows and with the improvement of rural roads
the need for wooden clogs has subsided, both of which, especially in the
Schaumburgischen, cut or carved out of their soft wood.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 25. Hall in Sudenfeld, Iburg district. (To page
45.)]

[Sidenote: The landscape through the ages.]

The mountains themselves have also changed their appearance. And when we
occasionally in place of a beech tip, on its fine up to the
Details of the modeled surface a thousand lights played,
If we see a seriously uniform spruce plantation, we can look into
to put in the feeling of a mother, that of her son's beloved
Lockenhaupt when he returned home from a foreign country in a fashionable one
"Pen head" sees transformed.

Not all of these interventions in natural relationships have occurred
Proven to be useful. Some also had unwanted and unexpected ones
Disadvantages in the wake. Laying down the hedges and regulating the
Brooks led to the desiccation of the arable land and carried the
Mouse plague. The conversion of forest into field brought where the soil was to
was poor for growing grain, not the hoped-for yields, and so was he
utterly impoverished. Therefore it was necessary to cover the forest many times
to restore and thus to a certain extent the
to approach original conditions again.

[Sidenote: The forest in antiquity and the Middle Ages.]

We are allowed to think of our area as completely covered by the jungle
neither during the beginnings of human settlement nor at the time
think in which the Romans - coming from sunny Italy -
made their exaggerated descriptions of "the Duster Forest".
How could such a land have pasture for the cattle of the nomadic people?
first residents, as well as fields for those since the first Christian
Century can deliver settled tribes? A change from
Woods and forest-free ground will always have been present; but has
The relationship shifted more and more to the disadvantage of the forest.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 26. Homestead in Linnenbeke near Vlotho. (To page
45.)]

[Sidenote: The forest in modern times.]

New settlements, especially those by Christian missionaries and
Monasteries launched before and after Charlemagne, satisfied
their land needs through clearing. Only since the thirteenth century
we encounter the first beginnings of measures to protect the
Forest. In the sixteenth century we find in Osnabrück
the rule that there should be a maximum of two hearths in each courtyard
were allowed, namely the house of the owner and the "body breed" in which
the retirees lived. It was also for full heirs, half-heirs and kötter,
the various levels of peasant ownership, each a maximum
the house size prescribed to the valuable "fruit tree" that for
the pig fattening indispensable oak, not to be unnecessarily decimated.
Later, of course, the Thirty Years' War cruelly cleared ours
Woods on. How the armies ruthlessly take the firewood and lumber
fetched for their purposes, so the communities could also use the forests
do not spare when they need money to raise contributions
and only had theirs by quickly satisfying their demands
Were able to save the place from cremation. As after the war
the population rose again, one looked to raise agriculture
reliant on the forest again. Leaves and pests were brought here as
Litter, grass and cabbage as fodder, and cattle were also left here
graze, which makes the natural rejuvenation of the wood almost impossible
became. So one gave the forest, at least as a high forest, to the downfall
price. Miserable middle or coppice forest took its place.
When the brands were divided in the eighteenth century
often the parcels at all for a sensible economy
small. In the Wiehengebirge and Osning they ran over in narrow strips
Mountain and valley. Since on top of that "heather and pasture" remained together,
the owner was not able to protect his property at all,
and low bush or even heather were the last remnants of the past
Splendor. This condition has been there for long stretches up to the
received today.

The conditions on the upper Weser are more favorable. But also
here the forest has gone through its times of desolation, and
for similar reasons. But there was also the excessive
Claim of the forest by the potash boilers for
Linen bleaching and glass production added. In addition, the Weser and the
Leine had a good opportunity to peel off the wood, and that too was tempting
to cut down.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 27. Floor board of a brick house in Lippe
Heidelbeck. (See page 45.)]

[Sidenote: Today's distribution of the forest.]

That in the nineteenth century, which almost simultaneously for the
Agriculture as well as the beginning of an understanding for forest culture
and careful treatment of nature means restoration
of the forest succeeded better in the south than in the northwest, explains
the ownership structure. State and municipal property together included in
Oberweser and Diemel area around four fifths, not in the Werre area
much more than a third, on the upper and middle Ems and on the Hase
little more than an eighth of the total forest stand. But for afforestation
Long-lived corporations are of course better able than private individuals to
which for several generations a waiver of any income
is expected if they take the place of even the poorest fields or
to plant forest trees in arid willow trees. The annoying secondary users of the
Waldes got rid of the state and community through severance payments, that too
then not felt as too oppressive when they were, like, special
in the district of Rinteln-Schaumburg, passed in parts of the forest itself,
which then fell to reclamation.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 28. Inn in Volksen near Rinteln. (To page
45.)]

With the new afforestation, however, you could often keep the old condition
cannot be easily restored. The impoverished soil was not
more able to feed deciduous forest, and so you had to
Send frugal pine forward as a pioneer of tree growth; mostly but
at least the spruce offered a substitute for what had disappeared
Beech green, which until the sixteenth century still almost all heights
covered. Because this wonderful tree, its slender, silver-gray one
The proudest trunks of the green cross vaults of the German forest
carry, thrives excellently on all types of rock in our climate
of the Mesozoic formations (Fig. 16). But has joined him
although less often in large, closed stands, the oak,
the most valued useful tree of our ancestors, the one in the
Westphalian parts of our area earlier also the
took first place. In the "Bramwaldische Relation" from 1666
Only beech and oak are named there as forming forests. Likewise stood
it in the Solling, and the Reinhardswald was almost exclusively with
Beeches existed, whereas now the beech only occupies 45% of the forest floor
Owns the Upper Weser region.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 29. Motif from Exten at Rinteln. (See page 54.)]

The return of the old conditions, which the nature lover with joy
would welcome, there are many things in the way. Not at all
The beech tree does the job well enough for locations, and the comfortable one does it quickly
Growing spruce supplies the forest treasury as excellent timber
Income that he cannot do without.

The share of the forest in the land cover amounts to
Upper Weser area from Münden to the Porta, excluding the for
Diemel and Werre draining parts of the country 35.3%, but being noticed
it may be that the right bank of the Weser is more wooded than the left. That
The Diemel area has 31.2%, the Werre area 21.6% and the upper and
middle Ems area only 19.3%. The corresponding digits for Prussia
and the German Reich are 23.7 and 25.9%. As high forest in the
Upper Weser area 96.8% cultivated, in the Diemel area 96.7%, in the Werre-
and the upper and middle Ems area only 72.0 and 77.6%. Hardwood covered
77.9% in the Upper Weser region, 75.6% in the Diemel region, 72.4% in the Werre region, im
upper and middle Ems area 52.3% of the forest area.

[Sidenote: Forest use.]

As a cultural and economic element, the forest used to have a larger one
More important than now. Before you get into the black diamond
of our country, especially of Westphalia, accumulated capital
tapped in energy and that is plentiful especially in our area
existing underground potash deposits were brought to light
had, it was the forest, especially the beech forest, which the for
some branches of manufacturing indispensable materials, coal and potash,
had to deliver. In every rural household belonged to thirty
up to the age of forty a "Bükefaß" for the necessary inventory; that was a
large wooden barrel in which the linen with beech ash liquor
treated, d. H. "Bridged" was. This bleaching with the one from the
Wood ash extracted carbonate of potash was found in individual places
commercially operated on a larger scale, for example in Uslar am Solling
and in the neighboring Sohlingen, where there is still a »royal
Pattern bleaching "exists, admittedly with a changed one in the meantime
Mode of operation.

[Illustration: Fig. 30. Peasant family from Meinsen near Bückeburg.
Older type. (See pages 54 to 56.)]

Large quantities of potash were also needed by the glassworks that used to be there
in all wooded parts of our area, on the Solling, on the Egge,
on the Bramwald, on the Hils, on the Deister and Bückeberg and on the Weser chain
numerous existed and in some cases still exist. The forest delivered them
apart from potash also cheap firewood. How much wood from them
one can imagine when one hears that the
small glassworks Amelith in Solling in its most prosperous times
Should have used 20,000 ~ kg ~ potash annually, considering
that 1000 kg of dry wood has about 3 kg of ash and this 3 kg of ash
contain about 1 ~ kg ~ potash.

[Illustration: Fig. 31. Peasant girls from the Nenndorf area. To
a photograph by Gustav Kaulmann in Minden. (See pages 54 to 56.)]

[Sidenote: coal distillery.]

Another product obtained from wood is coal; man
still needs it today for the production of finer types of steel and others
Makes.

It is true that the sensible extraction of charcoal, namely through
Distilling off the volatile constituents, which are used as wood tar,
Wood vinegar, wood spirit, acetone, etc. can be used in many ways
we have already found entrance. In Bodenfelde on the Weser z. Are you
such a factory. But the old one still exists, though
inexpedient, but poetic coal distillery. Especially in the
Bramwald, Solling and Vogler can still be seen steaming the kilns.
Near a cool spring after hot, dusty work
donates the refreshing drink, the charcoal burner has his wigwam
- I wanted to say his kote - built up (Fig. 19). It is a
circular, conical structure made of poles, brushwood and moss. Above
there is a smoke hole from a small umbrella
built over with the same materials. A door with a canopy is on the side
attached, and a comfortable bench is attached to it.
So the whole thing makes a very comfortable impression from the outside. the
Interior with its more than modest furnishings serves at the same time
as a kitchen and bedroom. Because the charcoal burner has to be around at night too
remain of its kiln.

[Illustration: Fig. 32. Schoolgirls from icebergs (Minden district)
going to church. (See pages 54 to 56.)]

If he wants to build a new coal mine, he must first dig the ground
level with the shovel. Then he hits two droughts about 2 m long
Poles close to each other in the earth and stick short ones between them
Pieces of dry spruce wood. This is how the »Quandel«, the
later to be used to ignite the kiln from the middle.
Now around 1 ~ m ~ long beechwood girdles are getting bigger and bigger
are set up in circles, but in such a way that a small one on the floor
The tunnel from Quandel to the extreme edge is left out. this
is »dat Stekelock«, the hole to pin. Two to four floors
of logs are regularly built one on top of the other, and then one becomes
low lattice made of beech branches that will later hold the ceiling
supposed to be shown around; so then the kiln is "fetching", d. H. wood ready
(Fig. 18). But now it must be disguised with a withered beech arbor,
and earth is shoveled over it and pounded on. Quite a few artfully
Logs placed all around in the form of a railing prevent this
Slipping of the upper part of the earth cover (Fig. 20). But already before
when the roof is completely covered, the kiln is lit. Now it is called
watch out! Because fire wants to be "ruled". It must not go out
but also do not flare up with a light flame. To get air,
on which everything depends, to bring it to the right level, serve that
Koehler the "Rumen", d. H. Spaces or holes in the ceiling that he
open with the rod or close with earth, now up, now
can move more downwards. He climbs his every six hours
Pile on a rough ladder made with a single log
notched steps (Fig. 20); he is convinced of that
Goes the charring process and fills the sunken dome with
new pieces of wood. After about eight days, the charcoal is "done".
The kiln is opened by carefully lifting the
"Dirt" cooled, the coals gradually with the iron "reed hook"
(Tear hook) carefully pulled out, after complete cooling in bags
packed and carried away to wagons (Fig. 21).

[Sidenote: Wood recycling.]

A great economic value comes, of course, to this ancient industry
not to. Far more people find their nourishment in the big ones
Wood recycling companies in our forest areas, especially at the
Upper Weser. In Münden, for example, drying barrels, railway sleepers,
Parquet and paving blocks, in Carlshafen barrels and Viennese furniture, in
Bodenfelde, Kaierde and Alfeld shoe lasts, in Lauenförde, Hameln,
Münder and Springe chairs and in some places the Hilsmulde as well as in
Wertheim near Hameln made wood board and paper. From the scope of the
Overall manufacturing is not easy to get a proper term for
make; after all, it might be interesting to hear that the two of them
largest among those works together 31,500 cubic meters of wood, d. H. a
Cubes with an edge length of almost 31½ m ~, process in years.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 33. Peasant girl from Uffeln near Vlotho. Some
fake components (cloths, aprons) penetrate the folk costume.
(See pages 54 to 56.)]

On the other hand, if such figures appear high to us, we will be surprised
to hear that in the two densely wooded districts of Uslar and Münden
only 15.7 and 11.4% of all full-time residents in
Forestry or wood industry find their livelihood. Despite this
limited economic importance of the forest industries
but the nature lover can enjoy their existence. Because they
give the forest administration the opportunity to use the beech wood, which used to be almost
Only used for burning, useful to recycle, and so they provide one
renewed guarantee for the preservation of our wonderful deciduous forests.




~ V. ~ Rural conditions.


The entire Weserberg area is what makes its agricultural
Character matters, farming country; Large estates can be found in
to a remarkable extent only in the southern part of the administrative district
Minden, where the lordship of Corvey belonged to the Duke of Ratibor
alone a huge area covered; Small farms predominate
on the Upper Weser, in the districts of Münden and Hofgeismar. The one there
Low German population is namely strong with Central German
Ingredients mixed and follows the Franconian custom, according to which the
rural property is divided among the heirs with equal rights,
while the farm in Lower Saxony and Westphalia is inherited as a whole.

[Illustration: Fig. 34. Farmer's wife from Hahlen near Minden. (To page
56.)]

[Sidenote: Peasant ownership.]

Here consist of the entire agriculturally used area
around three quarters from holdings of 5 to 100 ha, d. H. the end
Medium-sized companies, among which the smaller ones predominate.
Once the size of 20 ~ ha ~ is exceeded, the owner can
no longer do without third-party work aid. He wins this if
also recently with difficulties, mostly in the form of servants
and maids belonging to the household. Then there are the
Osnabrück and in Minden-Ravensberg since the seventeenth
Century the so-called heuerlings whose the single yard two
or has more. The origin of the hireling system is probably
attributed to the fact that during the Thirty Years War
rundown peasants felt the need to remove parts of their
Lease property to get such a modest pension
to secure. The heuerlings are farmers only part-time. Previously
They were mostly linen weavers and after they went down
the Westphalian hand linen weaving a terrible economic
Had gone through a crisis, in part other industrial work, including
also turned to cigar making. Your peculiar relationship to the
Farm owners insist that they own the house and 1½ to 2 ~ ha ~
Land on which they can keep two cows at extremely low rent
is left, whereas they return for a very low daily wage
have to work as soon as the farmer needs their help. Lower Saxony
knows no real hirelings. But there is also there as in
Westphalia industrial workers who, in order to do some agriculture,
bought or leased some land with a cottage; but they
come to the original owner in no other than a casual one
business relationship.

[Illustration: Fig. 35. Farmer from Hahlen near Minden, father of the previous one.
(See page 54.)]

[Sidenote: forms of settlement.]

Another difference between the two parts of the territory concerns the
Form of rural settlement itself. It is well known that the
Courtyards are mostly scattered in Westphalia, but in Lower Saxony
more in closed villages. A sharp dividing line can be made
of course not pull. Because in the so-called single yard area there is
also closed towns and vice versa in the hamlet of Weiler
and isolated courtyards. It is true that Porta prevails east of the line
Westfalica-Externsteine ​​the village in front of it and to the west of it the courtyard.
But that does not prevent the entire northern foot of the Wiehengebirge
is bordered by villages. The origin of this is still unexplained
different forms of settlement. Because Meitzen's assumption that the
Single farm Celtic, but the village is of Germanic origin,
has found contradiction almost everywhere. In any case, it reveals itself
the village as a joint foundation of a limited number
of fellow tribesmen. When they felt the need, from one
nomadic way of life, in which agriculture is opposite to the
Livestock breeding could only play a very subordinate role
To pass over sedentariness, they gradually took away some
Pieces of land, called tubs, under the plow, putting them against the
Fencing in and in strips of game and grazing cattle
divided among themselves. Gradually adding new tubs grew
the village corridor on an average of 300 to 400 ~ ha ~. But together
The forest remained for pasture and timber use, the marrow between the villages.

[Illustration: Fig. 36. Münden and the Fulda valley. After a
Photograph by Carl Thoericht in Münden. (See pages 63 to 67.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 37. The town hall in Münden.

After a photograph by Karl F. Wunder in Hanover. (See page 64.)]

This state of affairs chained one peasant in his economic system
to the others and created the flaring compulsion, according to which one gain from all
Owners at the same time and with the same fruit
had to. This certainly had its advantages for the old ways of farming,
for the new but almost only disadvantages. As is well known, this system is
only in the nineteenth century through the so-called coupling completely
been eliminated.

The other fates of the villages and peasants also have a lot to do with
over there were by no means always the same. When in
thirteenth century the great ones created by Charlemagne
When the manors were dissolved, the semi-free "Latins" became the old ones
Guelph provinces, as well as Paderborn and Corvey free and came
as "Meier" in a middle position between tenant and owner,
on the other hand got into the in Osnabrück, Minden, Ravensberg and Schaumburg
State of self-sufficiency from which they began at the beginning of the nineteenth
Century, in the Kingdom of Hanover even in the year 1836, liberated
have been.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 38. The market square in Münden. (See page 64.)]

[Sidenote: Farms.]

It is most remarkable that all these changes in the
Agrarian constitution, that wars and economic crises last
of the farms themselves to be touched only to a relatively small extent
have been able to. Both in Lower Saxony and especially in Westphalia there
there are courtyards that boast centuries of existence, and below
certainly some rightly. I remember the famous Sattelmeierhöfe
at Enger, whose owners are still today the descendants of those free
Look at farmers who shared their joys and sorrows with Duke Wittekind
(Fig. 22). Without a title of nobility and without heraldic recognition
enjoy a noble reputation among their compatriots. at
the death of a Sattelmeiers turns into three days in a row
"King's hour" is rung, the corpse is in the church on the choir
and when she is driven to the grave, follow the coffin like
with princes the riding horse.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 39. The suburb of Blume in Münden. (See page 64.)]

Admittedly, it is usually difficult to determine the age of the individual farm
to provide documentary evidence. It is noticeable, however, that the yard sizes
show so little difference in old and new times. Of course without
It was not part of the divisions. How else would you get the
Expressions Vollmeier, Halbmeier (in Osnabrück Vollerbe, Halberbe)
and explain other fractions in the classification of farmers?
Some families also still bear traces of old in their proper names
Court splits: think of Nordmann, Nordmeyer, Nordhof, Ostermann,
Ostermeyer, Osterhof etc. or to Grotkord, Lüttjohann and others. The
Partial farms have not infrequently managed to get out of the market again
to be supplemented, so that sometimes the half-yard, sometimes even the feces,
has become bigger than the Vollhof.

[Illustration: Fig. 40. Bursfelde.

After a photograph by Carl Thoericht in Münden. (See page 70.)]

[Sidenote: Court and Family.]

The court is the pride and, in a sense, the sanctuary of the family.
The owner calls himself after the farm, not the other way around. Even
Statutory ordinances could not prevent the
Farmer who married an heir, at least normally
Life bears the name of his father-in-law and thus of the court.
Often you even know the legal name of an old friend
not and only found out about it by chance, if he was with the court, registry office,
Military authority or parish has something to do. That the courtyard across the street
What is more important to the individual is also evident in the
Marriages. Does the future son-in-law have prospects
taken daughter-in-law for a successful management of the court
and the properties necessary for the economy and also the desired ones
Possession is what the old people will think of in their marriage plans
bother little about the likes or dislikes of the young. I can still see
the indignant face of an old farmer in front of me who once joined
complained to my father about his daughter's stubbornness. As
ridiculous he the girl's resistance to his well-meaning
Found plans is shown by the exclamation with which he enumerated the advantages
the game in question closed. “Niu hannelt et sick man blot still around
de personality, de Saotan doesn't want un stupid! "

[Sidenote: Court and inheritance law.]

The court must therefore be kept "in turn". He must be undivided
transferred to a single heir. This is called the inheritance. the
He has siblings to resign. About the amount of compensation you have
Law and custom determine various things; that the efficiency
of the property would be preserved, was above all the decisive factor
Point of view. Because even the landlord, as long as there was such a man,
and the state had an interest in the presence of interest and
taxable farmer.

Also the introduction of common inheritance law in the nineteenth century
has not been able to destroy the custom of attending. Yes the legislation
himself has partly complied with rural customs again,
by using the right of inheritance as the right of inheritance for the farms
in the small states and in the Prussian county of Schaumburg
binding, optional in Hanover and Westphalia (by registration
of the property in the Höferolle, as it is called in Hanover, or in
the country estate role, as they say in Westphalia). The falls
of course, that the farmer dies without a will or - whatever else
occurs more often - by handing over the farm during lifetime
are rare. And even then the siblings agree
even if division were legally permissible, amicable about the establishment
of an inheritance. The interest of the court is higher than self-interest
the individual. This can also be seen in the fact that the heirs are often with
lower severance payments than they are satisfied by the law or the
Intended will of the testator.

The reason why the farmer likes to "give up" while he is alive is that
he to the grown son and his unused strength, especially
open a field of activity on the occasion of his marriage,
but wants to allow himself rest.

The old people then go on breeding, "up Lieftide," as you would in the
Mindenschen says. In this area, at least on larger farms,
a special breeding house available; otherwise the pensioners live
with the young people, in whose house they have a special chamber and
the best place is left behind the stove. In addition,
give them some benefits in kind, use of land, some pieces
Cattle, right to guard this, haulage, some pocket money, “care and maintenance
in healthy and sick days and a Christian burial ”in the
Usually contractually stipulated.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 41. Monastery church in Bursfelde. (See page 70.)]

[Sidenote: family relationships.]

Anerbe is usually the eldest son, in the absence of sons
the oldest daughter. However, some areas prefer, and indeed
Osnabrück and Ravensberg, as well as most of Minden, den
youngest son or daughter, probably the wish of the fathers
it is crucial to slow down the succession of generations. If the eldest
it is said that the cradle does not inherit from the farm. The siblings of the
In the court from whose possession they are excluded, heirs have
always a backing. They remain regular until they are confirmed
there and receive free maintenance later in the event of illness
and frailty or otherwise at their request when ready
are to help with work. Of course, then they do not apply at all
about as equal to the farmer. I talked in my home village
once the older brother of an owner who worked as a servant on the farm
lived with "Guden Dag, Korf!" - “Guden Dag,” he replied, “awer
corner are not korf; eck sin Korf sin Broer. ”So on the family name
he had no claim; that belonged to the holder of the position; he was
"Blot de olle Hinnak," and I should have known that. Leave the
Siblings of the heir run the court, they do not fall to him at all
The proletariat, as it has been said, is also part of the education process
a valuable part of society. According to one from Spee
reported survey of 4561 severance workers from 1204 Westphalian
19% of the farms stayed on the farms. From the rest of the brothers and
Sisters of the Inheritance, the profession is determined. After that are from
46% to men through marriage, inheritance, purchase or lease
self-employed farmers, 22% self-employed in trade
or trade, 16% have chosen liberal professions (including academic
and seminar-trained teachers, clergy, doctors, lawyers,
Engineers, veterinarians, pharmacists, etc.), 10% are employed
Become a worker, 4% have emigrated. Of the women they have
most married, including 72% to self-employed farmers.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 42. Huguenots from the rest of the conscience. (See page 70.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 43. Carlshafen seen from the Diemeltal.

After a photograph by Alfred Menzhausen. (See page 72.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 44. Helmarshausen and the Krukenburg against the
Solling.

After a photograph by Alfred Menzhausen. (See page 72.)]

[Sidenote: The settlements.]

Whoever travels our whole territory from one end to the other,
he will notice how different the villages look. in the
One cannot, of course, speak of villages as single farm areas. There is only
Farmers who have at most a village-like core. Otherwise
the landscape shows a jumbled open field, called Esch,
and enclosed ridges, meadows and bushes and hidden in between
the farmsteads under old oaks and beeches (Figs. 24, 26 and 101), as well as
apart from these, in turn, the heuerling houses. From the heights of the
Looking down on the Weser chain, on the other hand, one sees closed villages,
whose red roofs are surrounded by trees. But the white that im
Spring takes the place of the tree green, it tells us that it is
not forest, but fruit trees that grow on the farms. if
if we come further up the Weser into the Calenberg region, that predominates
Red in the village picture, the green is more receding. But replaced in the south
especially in the Solling, again the one that is mostly gray with age
Buntsandsteinschiefer (Sollinger Platten) the brick covering, see above
that the villages there will get something dark. By the way, after the
Oberweser, the layout of the settlements is also different. Street wise
lined up house after house. The spacious courtyard with the one in Westphalia
that is downright wasteful is almost entirely absent. Farm implements and
Store the wagons and the beech firewood piled up in high piles
in picturesque confusion on the street, the young cattle and
Poultry, especially the numerous geese, as well as the human
Village youths can take a walk and play area together (Fig. 62).
Row villages can also be found in the north of the area, in
Schaumburgian, but of a much different character. It's the im
Founded in the thirteenth century, even now through many things
Hagendörfer with excellent peculiarities in taste and custom.
They owe their origin to individual princes, most of them Frankish
Colonists from the Lower Rhine settled in the woodlands. They just lie
on one side of a straight road. Behind the house is the garden
and some pasture land that runs into a stream. On the other hand
the road lies in long strips of fields. Is obvious
this form of colonization that of the marching villages on the Weser and
Imitated mouths of the Elbe. But it was also used later,
so in Hessendorf near Rinteln, one of the Hessian in 1660
Landgraves established settlement of Lippe colonists, and the like
the Upper Weser in the Huguenot village of Gewissenruh, which was laid out in 1722 (cf.
Page 70).

[Illustration: §. Fig. 45.Basalt quarry on the Hohen Hagen. (Go to page 73.)]

[Sidenote: village and house forms.]

There is an even greater variety than the village forms
in the field of house forms. Only in the extreme south, near Münden,
the Franconian house rules (Fig. 23). It stands with its gable
the street on which the parlor windows look out. Next to it is the
Entrance into the yard. From here you get through a narrow front door
on the long side in the house. The other sides of the courtyard are from
surround the stables and barns. This type of house penetrates in the south and
East of our area, partly displacing the Sachsenhaus, partly
favoring the emergence of mixed forms.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 46. Trendelburg an der Diemel. (To page 74.)]

[Sidenote: The farmhouse.]

In all other parts of the Weser Mountains, on the other hand, forms the Old Saxon
Farmhouse still the basic form of the older rural dwellings
(Figs. 22, 24 to 28).

[Illustration: Fig. 47. Deer feeding in Reinhardswald.

After a photograph by forester J. von Wangelin in Strelno. (To
Page 74.)]

The essence of this often vaunted by Justus Möser in his
patriotic fantasies and in its Osnabrück history
glorified house is that for everything peasant
Economy belongs, space under a single roof and originally
only one fireplace is created. The plan is in the form of a
elongated square. Let's approach one of the very old houses, like
they in the Westphalian, especially in the Osnabrück part
still appear sporadically in our area, the higher one falls to us
Thatched roof that extends from the elongated ridge to the two
low long walls too evenly. The front gable is
also clad with straw and forms a flat arched hip
at its upper end, interrupted by a triangular opening,
which is framed by two crossed boards, the "wind springs"
(similar to Fig. 24); they are supposed to keep the straw against the storm
protect who would otherwise ruffle it. They usually have that as jewelry
outward-facing carved horse heads or a vertical one
standing ornate rod.

We enter the house through the middle of the front narrow side
located entrance door. It's wide and tall enough to hold you full
to let in the loaded harvest wagon. She leads us to the paved
or a floorboard with a tamped screed on which all kinds of equipment,
Chaff, green fodder and the like lying around (Fig. 25). Dog and
Chickens, young pigs and small children frolic here and go
out and in through the wide open gate. Look over theirs from the left
The cows cribs, the horses come in from the right. Because from the stables
the plank is not separated by walls, but by the oak
Stands that support the roof alone, without the help of the outer walls.
Since the stables do not reach up to the roof, there is still the one above them
Hille, a sloping room, available from the hall on ladders
is climbed. Often it remains open and serves as a storage place for wood,
Hay, fodder or smaller implements; often it is also due to a slight
Wall closed, behind which there are individual chambers. Even
the board itself does not extend to the roof. But is the wooden floor
which closes them off at the top, much higher than the one above the stables.
The sheaves and
Bundles of hay passed up, thrown through the same hatches
Fall again if necessary. At the end of the hall is the stove,
with him the kitchen, which extends across the building to the two of them
Long sides of the house and here two narrow doors after that
Court has. Sausages, ham and sides of bacon hang over the stove
"Wiem" (Fig. 27). At the very end, with the windows facing the back
On the narrow side, the living rooms are mostly on the ground floor
a room and two chambers.

[Illustration: Fig. 48. The town hall in Einbeck.

After a photograph by Prof. W. Nürnberg in Hanover. (To page
76.)]

The whole building is listed in half-timbered houses. The beam is oak.
The filling of the compartments consists of coarse wattle, that with clay
is painted over (Fig. 26).

Let us also mention that there is no chimney, that the
Rather, smoke escapes through the open door and the hole in the gable,
so we still have the main peculiarities of the oldest
Existing house shape exhausted.

This, however, has become extremely rare, although after Justus Möser
no Vitruvius would be able to combine more advantages. New buildings
are no longer listed in this way. But also some old ones
House has had to put up with redesigns, as well as changes
the construction plans of later houses built in the last few decades,
so that the rural dwellings that are emerging in our days with
the old building traditions either only have a loose connection
keep it or give it up consciously.

[Illustration: Fig. 49. Eickesches Haus in Einbeck.

After a photograph by Prof. W. Nürnberg in Hanover. (To page
76.)]

But before we talk about this disappearance of a piece of local peculiarity
complain and join in the allegations that one is inclined to
To make farmers because they like the beautiful landscape of Lower Saxony
want to spoil by erecting characterless useful buildings
we realize that even the oldest house as we did before
let our inner eye emerge, already its story behind
and has taken the place of even older structures. as
our ancestors around the first century of our era
have decided to establish permanent residences on a larger scale
they presumably took the tent as a model for the house. But that
had no long walls yet, and so will probably the first one
House - similar to the sheep stables on the Lüneburg Heath - just one house
had a roof reaching down to the ground and two gable walls.
Gradually the expansion of the room made it necessary to have stands inside
to be attached, which supported the roof and later carried it entirely
(Fig. 25): the single-nave building became the three-nave structure. now
only the side aisles could have their own outer walls. Simultaneously
they were detached constructively from the middle level by creating their own,
received lighter rafters. Now, it seems, there was a division
of the room a fixed one: the aisles belonged to the cattle,
the central space remained free for human work and recreation, above
stored the supplies. But the stands have become so important
that according to the number of departments they have formed, the "subjects",
the houses were divided into classes.

[Illustration: Fig. 50. Bremer Strasse near Beverungen. (See page 79.)]

[Illustration: §. Fig. 51. Two ferrymen, father and son, from Wehrden.
(See page 79.)]

In the oldest times, the human occupants of the
House to sleep with the parts of the flock closest to the herd
Side aisles or with the loft above and for living with
the kitchen, which was not yet separated from the hall, gradually began
the more affluent to a room on the back wall of the house
which gradually grew into a complete housing structure.
According to Jostes, this change certainly occurred at different times
nowhere before the sixteenth century, d. H. so at a time in
which is also felt on the noble seats and in the cities
asserted after greater living comfort. Another type of house
shows the chambers sideways from the kitchen, which are now in place of the two
Side exits are given a rear exit (Fig. 27).

[Illustration: §. Fig. 52. Fürstenberg. (See page 79.)]

Further changes followed. The kitchen was separated from it by a wall
Board separated (Fig. 25) and received a chimney. To her more
To give light, their walls were pulled up and windows were provided. On
The same procedure was followed in other parts of the House, and
so the outer walls also had to help bear part of the roof load.
Therefore the interior of the whole house had to become more solid.
It became a box that had to be stronger, the heavier it was
had to wear. The higher walls required more protection from the wind
and weather: depending on the natural resources of the area that was
Clay wickerwork replaced by bricks or rubble stones. Likewise kicked
Bricks, in the Upper Weser area of ​​red sandstone slate, in the place of the
Roof straw. Such a heavy roof does not need any wind springs.
So often the horse heads and gable pillars disappear when they
not only used as meaningless jewelry or under
reintroduced to the influence of learned friends of homeland security
become. The gable now confronts the builders with new tasks. the
one lets the old hip stand and covers its flat arch
with brick pans, especially in the area of ​​Minden and Hameln;
another creates a flat gable surface, but it is inclined at an angle
at about the same angle as the hips used to be,
and covers them with pans too, at the northern foot of the Wiehen Mountains;
but most of them build the gable vertically and cover it completely or
partly with bricks or Sollinger panels (Figs. 24 and 62), or
they nail it up with boards that are horizontal in Osnabrück, im
Lippischen and Schaumburgischen run perpendicular (Fig. 26 and 28);
or finally they run it as a half-timbered wall with brick filling
up to just below the ridge, so near Osnabrück and Minden (Fig. 22
u. 62). Incidentally, these peculiarities are not always local
limited, but often depend on the ability and taste of the
The master carpenter or the client. Makes the old straw house in his
Form has a venerable and at the same time picturesque impression
newer farmhouse, the farmhouse mainly of the eighteenth and
nineteenth century, through the many externally visible wood of the
Joy of color given new nourishment. Show the brick compartments
either the natural red of the brick and clean white joints,
or they are whitewashed white, less often red or yellow. The bars are
painted brown or black. The Osnabrücker loves the gable boards
Farmer green, in other areas red-brown is preferred. the
Doors show raw, but sometimes not inconvenient, flat ornaments.
Rarely, however, is the bad habit that bars and fans are evenly white too
to whitewash to make the impression of the massive. Only at the southern foot
of the Osnings near Halle I have it in contrast to the tasteful ones
Buildings in the town observed, especially in the Diemeltal.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 53. (See page 80.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 54. Entrance to Corvey Abbey.

Photography and publishing of Otto Buchholtz's bookstore (Ernst Ummen)
in Höxter. (See page 80.)]

What is certain is that inscriptions will only be added when it is removed
of the straw hip became possible or at least common. The name above the door
Builder and builder of the house their names and the year
the establishment. If you are satisfied with this as a rule on the Oberweser,
so the builders in the north and west do not miss it,
add a blessing or a pious saying. Very common
is z. B. the verse: "He who trusts God has built well", also with
the addition: "in heaven and on earth". What prompted the construction
given, reports the following inscription, the Wolf from the district of Halle
communicates: “By glow of fire and a stern hand that is the previous house
burned down, save, O God, this house, from fire, damage, storm and
Braus, you draw in with your blessing, and let it be your order. "With
A "Latin peasant" boasts of misunderstood scholarship by saying
he puts the beautiful word "~ Ora Edla Bora ~" over his front door, against which
the natural wisdom of the following saying is more pleasant: »Man
quickly opens the door when someone knocks; how often does God knock
to the heart, and will not be opened. ”The fight between High German
and Low German immortalized the following inscription from 1609: »Nach
You ask me min God I hafve you don't read me to scand
Dat sik mine Vien will not frowen
Bible sayings before.

[Illustration: Fig. 55. Höxter, seen from the rock cellar.
Photography and publishing of Otto Buchholtz's bookstore (Ernst Ummen)
in Höxter. (See pages 79 to 81.)]

Far more drastic than these forms of the old type are
certain changes in the floor plan. Once you had the room of the
House is made into a solid box, which in all its parts contains the
Roof was evenly supported, so you could also do this at right angles
turn around, or in other words, you could get one from the long board
Make cross board. This is east of the Weser region in Ostfalen
happened many times. However, isolated examples can also be found in all of them
Parts of our territory.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 56.Bevern Castle. (See page 82.)]

Another change is that there are residents and cattle sheds
interchanged with each other (Fig. 28). This was probably the wish
decisive to live closer to the street, from the room the life in the
To be able to overlook the villages. But if we have this peculiar form of the house
especially on the Upper Weser, here as the ruling ones,
so we will probably also apply it to the influence of the neighboring area
have to lead back to his Central German home. That the hallway here
as narrow as possible to accommodate the already excessively separated living room
It goes without saying that we do not tear ourselves apart any more
(Figs. 25 and 27).

[Illustration: Fig. 57. Stratification of the shell limestone formation at
Bodenwerder.

After a photograph by W. Wehrhahn in Hanover. (See page 82.)]

The two-story structure is also such a deviation from the basic form,
which we observe particularly in the south (Fig. 62).

But it goes even deeper than all these changes mentioned so far
in the old house are those who give it the new forms of economy
of the nineteenth century. Coupling and
Common division - stable feeding - artificial fertilizer -
Increase in the number of livestock - larger crops - threshing machines
- each of these words explains changes to the dwelling of the
Farmer. More stables, more bars, have to be created, the former
initially in extensions to the right and left of the hallway, those below
special roof. Threshing as such is no longer necessary;
it becomes a hallway, so narrower and with full walls
the sides. On the other hand, patriarchal coexistence hears from
Lord and servant rise more and more; therefore there will be more living spaces
necessary, and so the rear living area widens. Furthermore, this is
Oak wood can no longer be afforded. Iron, concrete,
Cement pans, and finally even pressed sheet metal and roofing felt cheap
Building material. What wonder if that new, massive farmhouse with
its sober outside only in the wide front door on the
Gable wall retains a certain memory of its predecessors. "It is
the spirit that builds its body, «and that one is just another
become. The thought of the coexistence of all family and
Economic companions along with their livestock and their supplies below
the same roof has now had to be given up, and a new one
aesthetic looking house shape is still missing.

[Illustration: Fig. 58. Polle. (To page 83.)]

[Sidenote: The folk costume.]

With the old house, the folk costume also disappears. For the men it is
they are almost extinct in the whole area (Fig. 35). That she is to women
one will not be surprised when one considers how
the men have much more opportunity to leave their homes than
the women. But even female folk costumes only wear themselves
a narrow stretch of land along the Bückeberg, the Weser chain and
of the Wiehengebirge. In some other areas of Westphalia and
Lippes are at most remnants and hints, e.g. B. in peculiar
Hood shapes, available (Fig. 28 and 29).

[Illustration: Fig. 59. The stone mill. (See pages 82 and 83.)]

The most famous is the colorful so-called Bückeburg costume,
also in some of the Hessian-Schaumburg and Westphalian ones
Parishes to the right of the Weser are widespread (Figs. 30 to 33 and 86).
The men used to wear - here and there some old peasants do it
also - a long white linen smock with lots of shiny ones
Brass buttons and red flannel lining and a fur hat on his head
or a wide-brimmed felt hat (Fig. 30).

[Illustration: Fig. 60. Bodenwerder. Right the royal pinnacle.

After a photograph by Carl Thoericht in Münden. (To page 78 and
83.)]

The women's clothing is particularly characterized by the foot-free,
fiery red kerchief, the fabric of which - maybe after his
Frisian origin - Friesat, otherwise also buffalo or Schierlaken
is called. The women always wear it except at the Lord's Supper, where
a black one takes its place. The cut and the color tone
the coat is different in the individual parts of the country; as well
some other pieces of the suit differ, such as doublet, cap,
Neck scarf, apron and coat. One speaks therefore of a Hessian
or Lindhorst type (Fig. 31), which we e.g. B. in Nenndorf am Deister
can still be observed of a Friller type, north of
Minden rules, and from the actual Bückeburger. With this one
the last we especially like the sturdy hats with the enormous ones
stiff belt loops. The latter are relatively young
Origin. By the end of the seventies the loops were there
still small and not stiffened (Fig. 30). Then you grabbed the cardboard insert
and had now found a remedy, gradually adversely affecting it
to enlarge (Fig. 32 shows the transition). The consequence of this is
of course it was that the cap is now heavy and annoying and
is often not put on at work or at home
(Fig. 33). A particularly valuable piece of jewelry is the "claw",
the amber necklace with silver lock, to which in individual
Parts of the country still come with a silver collar. In general she has
whole costume the character of the ostentatious, but also of the
Solid and real. Would be the single item of clothing or jewelry
not for a human life or even for a succession of generations
made, the costume would certainly have long since disappeared.

[Illustration: Fig. 61. Hehlen Castle. (To page 83.)]

A certain variation of the Schaumburger costume prevails on the left
Weser bank in the Minden area. The main difference is except
in the shape of a hat (Fig. 34) in that the white ruffles and
unfortunately also the red skirts along with other colored components
of clothing have disappeared since the sixties. Man
therefore characteristically calls this costume the "black costume".
Deprived of its main stimulus, it naturally falls even more easily
prey to the egalitarianism and will certainly soon become the
make way for invading urban clothing. But also the
colorful Schaumburg costume goes, although slower, in the manner of a church,
the same way (Fig. 33) and becomes like the old Saxon house
after a few decades probably only as antiquarian
Oddity can be admired.




~ VI. ~ History.


[Sidenote: history.]

To write a history of the Weserland cannot be the purpose
be this book; such a company would also assume
that the region was politically a unit. This is now
but almost never has been the case, and so this will turn out to be historical
Sketch that precedes the description of the individual landscapes
like to set the task, the variegation of today's political
To explain the map and by the way to touch on some events that
takes place exclusively or preferably in the Weserland
to have.

[Sidenote: Antiquity.]

Since the fourth century BC We find almost everywhere there
Teutons except to the left of the Weser, from where the last Celts far
later, if certainly before Caesar's campaigns to the west
have been pushed. At the time of the Roman invasions, they lived on the upper floor
Weser the warlike Cherusci, from Angrivariern, Brukterern and
Chatting bounded in the north, west and south. You and you brave
and sly chief Arminius were in charge of those tribes
in the wars of freedom against the Roman generals Quintilius
Varus and Germanicus; in their territory was the Teutoburg Forest, where
the legions of Varus were destroyed in AD 9, and
Idistavisus, where Germanikus won such a victory that he
the taste of further laurels was spoiled. Idistavisus is
probably to be looked for on the Weser chain, but we don't know where; and
the situation of the Teutoburg will probably never become more irrevocable
Let certainty be ascertained. The assumption has a lot to offer
Clostermeiers (1822), who recently also represented Schuchhardt, that the
Grotenburg near Detmold, on which the monument to Arminius now stands,
the old Teutoburg was. In any case, it is one of the old Germanic
People's castles, as they were used to collect the bid and in times of war
were used as a refuge for humans and cattle in
the only one that can be safely ascertained in our area; because the Hünenburg
near Bielefeld and the Sieburg in the triangle between Diemel and Weser
Carlshafen can also be younger.

A few centuries after those battles is the memory of the
old Germanic tribal names disappeared. Live it
in northern Germany the bold, free Saxons, apart from the
Nordalbingern divided into the tribes of Westphalia, Engern and Ostfalen.
Some historians take a peaceful amalgamation of the
ancient peoples and the gradual expansion of the name Saxony
on the united tribal family, other researchers imagine the
Process less idyllic. Heavy voices speak of an im
third and fourth centuries progressive submission
of the countries between the Rhine and Elbe by those coming from Holstein
Saxony.

[Illustration: Fig. 62. Street in Eschershausen.

After a photograph by Prof. W. Nürnberg in Hanover. (To page
49, 53 and 86.)]

The large number of them testify to their warlike spirit
built castles. There are large fortified camps
inaccessible mountains, often consisting only of a wall.
The unsuspecting hiker who, for example, visited Amelungsenburg
Hessisch-Oldendorf or the Wittekindsberg at the Porta
hardly pay attention to the walls hidden in the beech forest, whereas the
Researchers in them as in many others, e.g. B. the Karlsschanze
Willebadessen, the Iburg near Driburg, the Herlingsburg near Schieder,
the Obensburg near Hameln, the clear features of the old Saxon
Attachment recognizes.

[Illustration: Fig. 63. Adam and Eve on the Ith.

After a photograph by Prof. W. Nürnberg in Hanover. (To page
86.)]

[Sidenote: The time of Charlemagne.]

Despite their bravery, the Saxons succumbed to the Frankish conquerors,
the country with a network of streets, farm yards and castles
overdrawn. We also find remains of their fortifications and recognize them
them by their two-part nature. The smaller pacified room enclosed them
House of the housekeeper or commander, which contained larger ones
the necessary space for tent or barrack camps. To these castles
include, inter alia Altschieder bei Schieder, the Bennigserburg and the
Heisterburg im Deister, the Babilönie near Lübbecke and the so-called
Wittekindsburg near Rulle. These festivals offer in their holdovers
to the inexperienced observer just as little of the strange as that
Saxony camp. Many others, mostly the younger ones, have none at all
Leave traces as they have grown up in villages or towns.
Since Charlemagne, along the streets and Marken, all land is available
Saxon farmers who were subordinate to the state and who were often transplanted,
and for himself and his faithful as well as for spiritual foundations
Weeded out significant goods, which were then sorted out with dependent colonists
were settled in Franconia, he gradually brought them all
important places in the hands of safer people. Of course she was embittered
Establishment of these great mansions, this complete overturning of the
Property relations the Saxons to the utmost. Nevertheless it was
also an incentive to reconcile with the new rule and the
To receive the reward of "loyalty" in the form of rich royal property. So
exchanged after the Engernfürst Bruno already submitted to 775
also had the Westphalian Wittekind ten years later the role of
Peasant general with that of the rich landlord by the grace of the king.

Under Karl and his successors, the political was very close
Conquest linked to the ecclesiastical. Dioceses arose like Osnabrück,
Minden, Paderborn and others Your dioceses and their subdivisions
joined as well as the Franconian court and
Administrative districts, the Gaue, to old ancestral areas and popular ones
Court district on.

Of the three old provinces of Saxony, we are mostly interested in Engern.
Apart from a part of the Hilsmulde, Ostfalen is completely eliminated
from our consideration, and Westphalian is from that on page 4
bounded area only the part of the line Bünde-Brackwede
northwest lies. The old Thingstätte Markloh was in Engern
(i.e. Grenzwald), where the Saxon envoys met.
Most of the main events of the
Saxon-Franconian War, wintering, Reichstag,
Sieges, battles, off. Think of the Eresburg (Marsberg)
Manufacture, Lügde, Schieder, Detmold, Paderborn, the Süntel, Lübbecke.

[Sidenote: The Middle Ages.]

In the Ottonian time it was quiet in the Weserlanden. The political
Heavyweight had shifted to Ostfalen, where it was also under
stayed with the Salians. However, Engern enjoyed more frequent visits
the ruler. Herford and Corvey and, emulating them, Paderborn
and Minden promoted culture; but the Weserland had none
Goslar, no Hildesheim to show. Also from the blooming of the
The Westphalian cities of Osnabrück, Münster, Soest and Dortmund had that
Weserland, the old Engern, little advantage.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 64. On the Rotenstein near Eschershausen. (To page
87.)]

[Sidenote: separation of dialects.]

By the way, in the eleventh century the name Engern gradually disappears.
When, with the fall of Henry the Lion (1180), the Duchy of Saxony,
which shortly before was able to defy the emperor himself,
was cut to pieces, the ties between them were broken
Countries to the right and left of the Weser. Paderborn came to the one below
Archbishop of Cologne standing Duchy of Westphalia. Minden too, that
Bishopric became independent, was later counted as part of Westphalia;
also came through the Maximilian district division (1512)
Schaumburg, while the Guelph lands are the main component of the
Lower Saxony district formed. This sharp divorce seems
to have also been of influence on the development of the tribes.
Because Low German in Lower Saxony points away from Westphalian
significant differences. If it is "mī" and "dī" in Westphalia, so
one says "meck" and "deck" in one part of Lower Saxony; says he
Westphalian "ick sin", that's how you will mostly hear "ick bin" in Lower Saxony.
The differences in vocalism are particularly great, insofar as the
simple Lower Saxony length mostly a Westphalian double sound
faces; compare: Brôd - Bräud or Braud (bread), Brût
- Briut (bride), dûsent - diusent (thousand), Müse - Muüse (mice),
Tîd - Tëid or Tuid (time), spräken - spriäken (to speak), brôken
- bruaken (broken). The pure long â der is also striking
Westphalia, z. B. in Wâter (water), while the Lower Saxony is dull
Wáter says. Since the formerly detailed parts of Westphalia still have certain
Have peculiarities in the dialect compared to Old Westphalian, so is
to assume that the Eastern Greek is derived from the Ostfälischen (= Lower Saxon)
has been absorbed.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 65. Lauenstein. (To page 87.)]

But let's return to our story. After the dismemberment
of the Saxon duchy we see how more and more the little ones
Dynasts rise and pluck the clergymen as best they can.
In the Welfenlande a considerable part of the old property became in 1235 as
Duchy of Brunswick-Lüneburg combined, but was later defeated
manifold large and small divisions until you get out of the jumble
the principalities of Lüneburg, Calenberg, Göttingen, Grubenhagen and
Wolfenbüttel and smaller parts crystallized out. Your
The borders are partly within the borders of the Duchy of Braunschweig
against the Prussian province of Hanover, partly in those of the Hanoverian ones
Get government districts against each other.

[Illustration: Fig. 66. Bückeburg. Photography and publishing by FH
Hespe in Bückeburg. (To page 93.)]

It could well excite us, the fortunes of individual spiritual people too
To pursue territories and some indigenous dynasty families,
their countries in the territorial possession of the surviving states
have risen; from many a bold raid, many a bloody feud,
we would hear of many a pious foundation. But we will
content to mention their traces where we find them. For one
History of the Counts and Lords of Northeim, Dassel, Everstein,
Homburg, Spiegelberg, Schwalenberg, Pyrmont, Sternberg, Schaumburg,
Hallermund, Roden, Ravensberg, Tecklenburg is no place here.
We will not be the more distant fates of our landscapes either
because their history is the history of Germany.

[Illustration: Fig. 67. Seed grain on the Kleiner Deister near Springe.

After a photograph by W. Wehrhahn in Hanover. (Go to page 90.)]

[Sidenote: The modern age.]

A look at the political map will show us that our
Mountain country is under five different rulers. Of the
old small states are Braunschweig, Waldeck-Pyrmont, Lippe and
Schaumburg-Lippe received. Prussia is with the provinces of Hanover,
Westphalia and Hesse-Nassau, the administrative districts of Hanover,
Hildesheim, Osnabrück, Minden, Münster and Cassel involved. Among
the scepter of the Hohenzollern is the county of Ravensberg in
Arrived in 1609, the city of Herford followed in 1647, and the diocese in 1648
Minden, 1702 Ibbenbüren, 1707 Tecklenburg, 1803 the dioceses of Hildesheim
(until 1813) and Paderborn as well as Herford Abbey. Then came 1815
except for those lost in the French era and now regained
Territory of the Corvey monastery with the city of Höxter. Finally were
1866 Hessen-Nassau and Hanover together with those previously acquired by them
Countries, especially the dioceses of Hildesheim and Osnabrück, the
Subject to Zollernkrone.

[Illustration]




~ VII. ~ The Weser from Münden to Manufacture. Dransfelder Höhenland and
Reinhardswald.


Before we start our Weser trip from Münden, we are
climbed to Tillyschanze, that stone tower on top of one
Edge of the Reinhardswald. The historical fact that this
Place her name is given to us with realistic fidelity
Memory evoked by the war antiquities set up inside
and the lively relief by Prof. Gustav Eberlein: »The defense
of the city of Münden in the Thirty Years' War. «How different than in those
terrible days of Pentecost of 1626, where those of 3000 corpses
the full city was surrendered to the greed of imperial soldiers,
is the sight that the delighted eye now enjoys from the deck!

[Illustration: Fig. 68. The Lutheran Church in Bückeburg.

After a photograph by FW Kuhlmann in Bückeburg. (To page 94.)]

    O home, you appear to me
    So youthful and beautiful;
    You are a Tempe of Germany [4],
    How I haven't seen one
    A fountain from which always emerges
    Refreshed my thirsty heart,
    When I'm from your heights
    Looking down into the valley.

    How beautiful are you in May
    In the glory of spring
    From white flowering trees
    Do you stand like covered in snow?
    And ringing church bells
    Into the blooming valley
    Then you are all beauty
    Perfect ideal.

[4] The expression comes from Goethe.

We will be happy to adopt Eberlein’s judgment as our own
at the foot of the mountain, in the face of the hometown, its cozy, from
made a guarded home for a great stone boar. In close
Basin, surrounded all around by the lovely shapes of beech green heights,
surrounded by orchards with dainty country houses, this looks at us
friendly red towards the tiled old town; and rises above it
a number of massive stone buildings in venerable gray, among them
the old fortification towers raised for the purpose of shot production,
"The hail towers" are particularly noticeable (Fig. 36).

[Illustration: Fig. 69. The new town hall in Bückeburg.

After a photograph by FW Kuhlmann in Bückeburg. (To page 94.)]

[Sidenote: Münden and the Weser shipping.]

Those in their original form the thirteenth century
Churches belonging to St. Aegidia and St. Blasien - on the former
is the tombstone of the famous ~ Dr. ~ Eisenbart -,
the clumsy castle of the Calenberg dukes Erich ~ I. ~ and ~ II. ~
and that of the heyday of Lower Saxony, the beginning of the seventeenth
Century, originating from the Renaissance town hall (Fig. 37), all of them
testify to the importance of Münden in ancient times. But also the
Private houses with their reminiscent of Hessian and Thuringian cities
Wooden architecture, with its many projecting storeys, yours
delicate frame work and the pointed, well-articulated roofs
tell us about the past (Figs. 38 and 39). Political and
linguistically belonging to Hanover, namely shows the area of ​​Münden
in urban and rural house construction, in village complexes and in rural areas
Peculiarity of Central German character (Fig. 23). Gau and tribal divisions,
whose successors are the current provincial borders of Hanover,
Hessen-Nassau and Saxony collided here, but suffered
also occasional shifts. Münden itself is considered to be original
Frankish place attested; it was a Carolingian »~ villa ~«,
at the same time probably a bridgehead against the Sachsenland. But the castle is
probably by Otto von Northeim, a dynast from Lower Saxony,
thus it was founded as a bulwark against Hesse. After the fall
Henry the Lion passed the city to the Landgraves of Thuringia
towards the middle of the thirteenth century under the Guelph rule
to return. The origin of the settlement can be explained if one
takes a look at the map by itself. Werra and Fulda were for
the tiny proportions of medieval traffic were significant
Waterways, Münden junction of shipping traffic, transshipment and
Stacking location. Caused jealousy and enmity against the Hessians
in the beginning of the fourteenth century gradually the Guelphs
Landlords to issue, then Mündener citizens to sneak out
of privileges that were in effect until the nineteenth century and in
their entirety known under the name of the Mündener stacking right
are. After that, all goods upstream and downstream of the city were allowed
left, can only be transported by Mündener Schiffer; also had to
you unload all transit goods and at Casseler market price three
Hold for sale for days. Münden did not become more important
The reason is that the banks of the three rivers are few for valley roads
presented favorable quality. So preferred the one from the Upper Rhine
the Hessian valley coming overland traffic, as far as it goes to Hamburg
and Liibeck was striving towards the Leine valley, to which the railroad now as well
to Hanover, as far as he tried to reach Bremen, the dining
and Diemeltal. The building of the railways has, as everywhere in
Münden at first smashing, then building on the economic ones
States wrought. The city has become more and more of an industrial location.
The forest in the area supplies wood for various processing (cf.
Page 35) and tan for the tannery, the soil brown coal, clay and
Millstones. Others of the industries there (tin goods, tobacco, rubber)
are less dependent on local raw material production. But also that
Shipping traffic has increased tremendously, especially in the last one
Time, including the canalization, which was opened to traffic in 1895
which Fulda to Cassel has particularly contributed. Finally want
we also note that Münden currently has 11300 inhabitants, one
Kgl. Forest academy with about seventy students houses and as
Summer resort and tourist city is sought more and more.

[Illustration: Fig. 70. Hameln against the Süntel. After a
Photograph by H. Blesius in Hameln. (See page 94 ff.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 71. The Pied Piper House in Hameln.

After a photograph by H. Blesius in Hameln. (To page 98.)]

[Illustration: §. Fig. 72. Hämelschenburg Castle near Hameln. (To page
98.)]

We walk to Tanzwerder, which is undeveloped due to the risk of flooding
remaining outermost corner of the alluvial delta between Werra
and Fulda, so to speak the birthplace of the Weser. It says
the Weserstein, unfortunately! Was it necessary to give the Weser a monument
erect? it really needed a "beautification" of the landscape
through verse? and these even had to be carved in stone as one
"~ Monumentum aere perennius ~"? We climb the spacious and
comfortable steamer "Kaiser Wilhelm" and go through it regularly
monotonous pounding of the wheels lulled into sweet dreams, comfortable
there and leave the intimate images of the green banks on ours
Glances past. We will do well from our memory
all memories of a Danube or
Banish Rhine journey; we don't want to compare, not them
The loveliness of one landscape in the grandeur of the other
measure, but enjoy without prejudice. We don't care about that either
disturb the multilingual swarm of hasty travelers. Our ship
besides the country folk of the riverside areas mostly undemanding
Tourists from Northwest and Central Germany. Occasionally noticed
one among them were some Dutch leisure travelers. Far behind
is the time when the first steamer sailed on these tides; it was
the first ever steamer. Its builder was the learned Huguenot
Dionysius Papin from Blois, since 1687 professor of physics in Marburg.
From Cassel he drove on the means of transport he had devised
down the Fulda to reach England with it. But already in Münden
smashed the envious members of the privileged boatmen's guild
the devil's vehicle. Since that unfortunate September day of
In 1707, over 111 years passed before the next steamer -
his name was "Duke of Cambridge" - from March 9 to March 20, 1819 the
Made trip from Bremen to Münden; yet the machine proved itself
too weak, the fairway too difficult, and so were
the journeys do not continue. Only in 1843 drove again
Steamer on the Oberweser, and since 1844 the »Vereinigte
Weserdampfschiffahrtsgesellschaft «with the one built in Paris
»Hermann« and the »Wittekind«, who soon followed, made regular trips. the
current passenger shipping operates between Münden and Hameln
Wesermühlen-Aktiengesellschaft zu Hameln with five stately ships,
who carried around 112,000 passengers in 1908 (in 1905
about 60,000).

[Illustration: Fig. 73. Chapel at the Wangelist poorhouse (Hameln).

After a photograph by H. Blesius in Hameln. (To page 98.)]

[Sidenote: From Münden to Carlshafen.]

The Weser valley is narrow and from Münden to Carlshafen-Herstelle
sparsely populated. The current flows in the red sandstone, an old one
Following fault crevices of this rock. Through millennia
The river bed has deepened to such an extent that the wooded heights have gnawed
right and left - there Blümer Berg (Fig. 16), Bramwald, Kiffing,
here called Reinhardswald - the valley floor often up to 230 ~ m ~
tower above. The layers of these mountains fall on both sides after that of the
Streams facing away from one; the watersheds are near the river,
the slopes are rugged, the valleys mostly short and steep. Just right are
Schede, Nieme and Schwülme larger brooks, the, the hinterland of those
green mountains, namely the valley between red sandstone and shell limestone
that the latter have gnawed through in pretty valleys.
We have to do without listing all the pretty villages
whose youth the arrival of our ship at, and even better in that
Water awaits while the geese are abundant everywhere
Loud protest chatter in a genteel train leaving the river bed.
In general, the Weser forms the border between Hanover and
Hesse. But this also spills over to the right bank. The population
but is Low German on both sides.

[Illustration: Fig. 74. Rinteln against the Taubenberg. After a
Photograph of the local beautification association. (Go to page 99.)]

On the left is Veckerhagen (1500 inhabitants), which is his now
surviving small clay industry and the Casseler factory
Braun (Umbra) as well as the ironworks operated from 1666 to 1903
neighboring tertiary mineral resources. The opposite
Hemeln emerged from an old Carolingian imperial court,
which, as so often, had been laid out under an old people's castle.
We shall see the later residence of their noble lord in the
Bramburg have to be recognized, whose ruin is gloomy right out of the forest
towers; it later belonged to the Lords of Stockhausen and was
because of their robberies twice by the in the fifteenth century
Brunswick sovereigns destroyed. The Hilwartshausen domains
and Bursfelde are former monasteries; the latter is on the
Scree cone of the Nieme (Figs. 40 and 41). Is church history
it is known as the place of origin of the Bursfeld Congregation, one in the
fifteenth century association of Benedictine monasteries
for the preservation of ecclesiastical discipline, art-historically through his
beautiful Romanesque basilica restored in 1903. In
the widened valley at the influence of the sultry have the spots
Lippoldsberg (900 inhabitants) with a beautiful old monastery and Bodenfelde
with a small transshipment point (see page 34) some significance. A
The Huguenot colonies are of particular interest
and peace of mind. You are around at about the same time as Carlshafen
Created in 1700 when Landgrave Karl von Hessen took over the
Edict of Nantes expelled fellow believers of the economic
Sought to make the uplift of his country subservient. Were in peace of mind
twelve families settled, each of which used a strip of woodland
Reclamation received (see page 44). French inscriptions on the
Houses and the little church [5], French family names such as
Jouvenal, Don, Héritier, Volle, Seguin (pronounced: Zeckink) and some
black-eyed and dark-haired heads are the only remnants of alien
Essence in the little village (Fig. 42).

[5] ~ 1 Août 1799. Gen. XXVIII. V. 16. Certes, L'éternel est en ce lieu
et ie nan sauoie rien. ~

[Illustration: §. Fig. 75. View from Bückeburger Chaussee into the
Rinteln Valley. (See page 77.)]

[Illustration: §. Fig. 76. Dankerser Mühle near Rinteln. (See page 77.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 77. Vlotho against the Amthausberg and that
Wiehengebirge.

After a photograph by Cramer's art institute in Dortmund. (To page
100.)]

[Sidenote: Carlshafen.]

This has become even more blurred in Carlshafen, although still here
Preached in French by Pastor Guillaume Suchier until 1825
has been. Carlshafen is a purely artificial foundation (Fig. 43).
It is true that the geographical position is influenced by the greatest left
Tributary into the Weser extremely cheap and has two early
Arranges settlements. But because the subsoil at the mouth
was too wet itself, one of them is 2 ~ km ~ in the Diemeltal
up, the other 2 ~ km ~ down in the Weser valley. That is
Helmarshausen (1300 inhabitants) with that of the pious in 998
Friends, Emperor Otto III and Pope Gregory V.
Benedictine abbey, for whose protection Archbishop Engelbert of Cologne
Built the Krukenburg up there in 1220 (Fig. 44); this is that of
Charlemagne built a factory where he spent the winter of 797/98
and founded a church. Manufacture was to a permanent store and
determined permanent base of his government; at times even came
the establishment of a diocese in question. Now Helmarshausen is a
mainly inhabited by quarry workers and cigar makers
Town, the Krukenburg the most beautiful ruin in the Weser region,
Create a Westphalian village overlooked by a monastery and
a modern castle. With the building of Carlshafen or how
it originally after the old Volksburg above (see page 57)
was called, Sieburg, was started on September 29, 1699. Landgrave
Karl wanted here with all means of the enlightened despotism
Force the creation of a trading and port city; the traffic should
bypass the annoying Mündener pile and on the canalized Diemel
and Esse to Hofgeismar and then overland to Cassel
Canal but may be continued as far as the Lahn to Marburg.
French and German settlers received cheap housing and
all kinds of perks. The city offers a bird's eye view of
seen the Hessian cliffs, the picture of perfect symmetry: in the
In the middle of the now unused harbor, next to it two stately buildings, then
same apartment blocks, their houses - except for the somewhat larger corner buildings
- five front windows, two floors and one single window
Have dormer windows. Charles's far-sighted plans sank with his
Death by itself into nothing. Now it has 1900 inhabitants
Towns as sources of income Stone, clay pipes and wood industry, in addition
Cigar production and a small brine bath; there is a disability house
since the days of the noble landgrave; also beckons the delightful
Location, next to the Mündens certainly the most attractive in the Wesertal,
numerous summer visitors come here.

Of the landscapes on the uppermost part of the course of the Weser, the
to the left attract the hiker more. On the right is the red sandstone zone
narrow, and only in it is there a contiguous forest, so special
in the Bramwald (Totenberg 406 ~ m ~), which one admittedly in places
also notes that up to 40 years ago 1700 cattle, 7500 sheep, 3200
Pigs and countless geese went to his guests. That pretty
Lewenhagen, located on the Nieme, is a modest climatic health resort.
The Dransfelder Höhenland to the east, which is mostly the
Belongs to shell limestone, is surmounted by picturesque basalt domes,
like the promising Hohen Hagen (506 ~ m ~) and the Dransberg,
whose quarries also mainly serve the 1400 inhabitants of the old,
maintenance of the high town of Dransfeld (station 301 ~ m ~)
(Fig. 45).

[Illustration: §. Fig. 78.Exten at Rinteln. (Go to page 100.)]

[Sidenote: The Reinhardswald.]

The Reinhardswald to the left of the Weser is for nature lovers
more rewarding hiking area. It consists of an almost 30 km long
an average of 10 ~ km ~ wide red sandstone block of about 400 ~ m ~
Height, on the basaltic peaks like the Gahrenberg (464 ~ m ~) and
the Staufenberg (472 ~ m ~) are attached. At her foot are found
tertiary deposits, from which inter alia. on the Gahrenberg lignite
is mined. The interior of the forest is almost uninhabited.
Beberbeck is a royal main stud with extensive stud farms
Mountain pastures on which about 350 noble horses (half-bloods) can be found in freedom
romp around, the picturesque Sababurg (in the vernacular is the original
Name Zappenburg received) a built in 1490, now half disintegrated
The hunting lodge of the Hessian landgraves, Gottsbüren, the only one
by the way, very old village of the inner forest, in the fourteenth century
through his pilgrimage chapel, now through a church organ factory
famous. The picturesque farm town towered over by a castle
Trendelburg an der Diemel (650 inhabitants) is already outside the
Mountain range (Fig. 46). In this itself the forest reigns all around,
uninterrupted forest. The Reinhardswald is an old imperial forest that was
but in 1018 by Emperor Heinrich II., the last Saxon,
his friend, Bishop Meinwerk of Paderborn, for the diocese
given. After multiple division and exchange of property, he came up
by the sixteenth century gradually turned entirely to Hesse.

[Sidenote: Reinhardswald and Solling.]

The fate of the forest, which is not exactly encouraging for the forester
as such, about which the necessary information has been said on pages 30 to 32
have a variety of the that captivates the nature lover
Landscape. Except for the actually down-to-earth
Beech forests are wide, park-like with isolated old oaks
Passed bare bones that used to be used for hat purposes. In many cases, too are
the oaks were later supported by young beech trees. In the
The sixties were to avoid the nakedness of the cattle pasture
withdraw them, but at the same time use them for forestry purposes
make circular squares from 4 to 6 m ~ in diameter at 14 m ~
Triangular bond surrounded by small drainage ditches and with each other
connected. The raise served to increase the space, each with 25
Piece of young spruce was planted. These have now grown and
form the striking appearance of the "lumps". Take their place
Recently it has gradually become a real spruce forest, the one in the Gahrenberger Revier
already covered 22% of the forest area (against 3% a hundred years ago).
In places, however, the acidic and prepares on the plateau
deepened soil of afforestation difficulties.

In the Middle Ages it was still a playground for thousands of wild boars, impoverished
the Reinhardswald later gradually in relation to its wild life, and
when hunting was even allowed in the revolutionary year, counted
Soon afterwards (1852) only 8 red deer, 14
Wild boar and 14 roe deer around 98, 86 and 76 five years earlier.
Now an area of ​​8000 ha has been gated since 1866, and it
a moderate population of red deer and wild boar is kept there
(Fig. 47). Capercaillie also occurs occasionally. Takes place every fall
the academic Hubertus hunt took place in the forest district of Gahrenberg, according to the
the booty carried through Münden under torchlight, one in the market
Speech held and the hunting court held at the Kommers.




~ VIII. ~ Solling, Homburg and Vogler.


Similar character as the Bramwald and the Reinhardswald also shows
the Solling, that large red sandstone ellipse that follows the confluence
the Schwülme in the Weser the main stream the westerly direction
of its tributary. However, the basaltic tables are missing here
Breakthroughs, if we do not see the sultry on three sides
surrounded mountain group, which culminates in the 461 ~ m ~ high Bramburg,
still want to count towards the Solling. The Bramburg is the northernmost
trained dome made of basalt Germany at all. The breaks there
above are equipped with all kinds of mechanical aids. they
are the most important in the area and have the top of the mountain,
which grants a magnificent view, has already been completely redesigned.
The chief engineer and a number of workers live upstairs, others
in the neighboring towns. When extracting the stones comes
The main thing is to get the material that has just broken behind quickly
To hide straw walls or under sheds and close as soon as possible
to process. As long as it's still fresh, it's easy to do
split and cut into rectangular blocks; but as soon as the sun
has shone on it, it shatters into irregular shapes under the hammer
Pieces, and instead of paving stones, only gravel can be extracted. So
often costs an unexpected sunshine, before the freshly broken one
Stones could no longer be saved, which works a lot of money.
The cause of the "burning" of the stones is not yet clear
detected. The ancient spot is at the southern foot of the Bramburg
Adelebsen (1500 inhabitants), in which the noble family of the same name
has its ancestral castle with an enormous keep. At the north foot is
Volpriehausen is an old village, but a very young industrial site.
Apart from the fact that it is the train station for the Bramburgbruch
is (an operating railway connects this with it), it owes its
Significance of the large potash works, which from depths of 400 to 600 ~ m ~
that mineral so important for agriculture at the same time as pure
Rock salt carried up. The one in the vicinity serves as the operating resource
lignite mined near Delliehausen; but their camp is almost
exhausted.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 79.Varenholz Castle. (Go to page 101.)]

[Sidenote: The Solling.]

The Solling is usually not an attractive sight at its edges,
as it gradually rises and the fields wide on its slopes
climb up. The Weser only has it at Carlshafen and Fürstenberg
gnawed so that the steamer glides under steep rocks.
Differs from the red sandstone areas discussed so far
the Solling by a larger extent and its approximate
circular shape. Since the layers of rock are horizontal, so
drainage from the middle of the plateau is difficult, and it is formed
high moors like on Moosberg, which probably got its name from there.
Streams flow on all sides in the form of rays, which are rather narrow,
Gradually deeper, scenically very attractive meadow valleys
have gnawed at the edges of the plateau; from those flows the
Ilme zur Leine, the eels zur Schwülme, the Rottmünde and the Holzminde
to the Weser. The broad ridges standing between the valleys
have approximately the same height and grow to the eye one further away
standing viewer together to form a single plane. Even the peaks
among which the great nakedness with 528 ~ m ~ the highest mountain between
Harz and Sauerland are, so little tower above the area that in front of the
Publication of the Prussian measuring table sheets always the Moosberg (513 ~ m ~)
as the most important crest of the mountains, as the king of the Solling,
was called. So this is how Prussian officers have this king
dethroned. The silhouette of the Solling appears under these circumstances
extraordinarily monotonous. What makes the mountains so attractive is
the uninterrupted forest for hours (Figs. 18, 20 and 21). Famous
In addition to a few splendid ponds, there are also some around the middle of the
Oak avenues planted in the eighteenth century. Otherwise, however, is
the forest - now mostly spruce stands - a result of the newer ones
inform forest culture (page 30 ff.).

The interior of the mountains is poor in settlements. That theirs earlier
the church ruins prove, as we do theirs
in the Schwülmetale near Adelebsen and in the deserted Friewohle not far
Volpriehausen can find two still stately while looking at others
Just place the foundation walls under the leaves and grass.
In contrast, the mountains are surrounded by villages and towns
surround. We already have Carlshafen, Adelebsen and Volpriehausen
mentioned. On the Ottbergen-Northeim railway line, which is an old one
The trade route to Harze follows, Uslar (2500 inhabitants) is still located
in the midst of fertile grain and beet soil with ironworks,
Fruit wine production and carpet weaving and Hardegsen (1300 inhabitants)
at the breakthrough of the Espolde river through the desolate Muschelkalkzug der
Weper, surmounted by the tall, gloomy "Mushaus", the remnant of one
very old castle that was temporarily owned by the dukes of Brunswick.
The old Nienover Castle near Bodenfelde is structurally interesting
and the Romanesque basilica of the Fredelsloh monastery.

[Sidenote: Einbeck.]

North-east of the Solling and separated from it by the mountain range, the
the ruins of the old former Welfenburg Grubenhagen bears (293 ~ m ~),
the former is located on the edge of a fertile Keuper and Lias basin
Hanseatic city of Einbeck (8,700 inhabitants), famous from time immemorial
their linen weaving and even more with the beer that was already Herzog
Erich ~ I. ~ von Calenberg a jug at the Worms Reichstag Luthern
donated. In addition to other branches of industry, e.g. B. the
Sugar manufacturing and the bicycle industry, still a major one
in the work of the residents and supplies especially pasteurized
Bottled beer for export to the tropics. Major churches, one
stately town hall and beautiful carved wooden houses from the
Renaissance times attest to the city's former prosperity (Figs. 48 and 49).
While Einbeck used to be at the intersection of two major streets,
namely the one from Göttingen to Hanover, which at this point is the
narrow, damp Leinetal avoided, and which becomes the Weser near Bodenwerder
it is now unaffected by the continuous railway line. It is up to
a side railway that goes up in the Ilmetal to the town of Dassel
(1500 inhabitants) leads. That this was once the seat of a mighty one
Counts were - just think of Ludolf, the redbeard's chancellor
- can no longer be recognized by visible traces. Is more interesting
the neighboring castle built by Duke Erich ~ I. ~ von Calenberg in 1530
Erichsburg.

To the north is Stadtoldendorf, a Brunswick town
Town with 3500 inhabitants, Kreiensen-Holzminden railway station
(Berlin-Cologne). The Zechstein hides here, especially after the
neighboring Homburg to, a mighty plaster stock, which in several
Fractures is exploited. In some factories, therefore, plasterboards are used
produced.

[Sidenote: Elfas. Homburg.]

The places on the western edge of the Solling may later be with one
continued consideration of the course of the Weser. Before
if we had a word about the red sandstone range Elfas-Homburg-Vogler
accept. The lack of a common name shows us that we
it despite the geological togetherness of these mountains with three
separate groups to do. The Elfas kick the least
(380 ~ m ~). The Homburg group is more important in both of them
Main peaks towering 400 ~ m ~. It is striking - especially in contrast
to the softness of the lines in the neighboring Solling area - the
in this formation so rare picturesque dome shape of the mountain,
who bears the ruins of the old dynasty castle. It's not much of
you receive. Because already a hundred years after 1409 the last
of the Lords of Homburg, as the legend reports, under the hand of one
Eversteiner Count had bled to death at the altar at Amelunxborn, they left
Brunswick dukes fell into ruin and built the castle out of the stones
the new office building in Wickensen. But the Pallas is along with some
Remnants of the vault in the middle of the green beech forest can still be seen. The visit
the rubble and the view from the stump of the crumbled keep
the town at your feet will surely make the hiker for the trouble
reward of the climb.

[Sidenote: Vogler.]

The best way to get to Vogler is from Stadtoldendorf
take through the lovely Hoop Valley; that's the name of the top piece of
the forest stream washed into the plateau. Surprised soon
us here the sight of the Amelunxborn monastery, hard up on the edge
the rugged valley wall. We find one here as well
obtrusive observation confirms that the Cistercian monks were not
only first-rate agricultural practitioners, but also people
from an excellent understanding of scenic beauty
must have been. In 1129 by Count Siegfried von Northeim
donated to the building of the Homburg, albeit perhaps
not the first to be traced back, it is the oldest monastery founded
that order in Lower Saxony. The beautiful Romanesque-Gothic
Double church now serves the domain and the neighboring villages as
House of worship.

[Illustration: Fig. 80. Möllenbeck against the Weser chain (Papenbrink,
Long wall, Luhdener Klippe). After a photograph by W. Siekmann
in Rinteln. (Go to page 101.)]

Of the three mountain groups, the Vogler is the most extensive. The comb
draws about ten in a flat arc open to the east
Miles away, sends out many strong branches on both sides
and culminates in the 460 m high boar neck, one of the most magnificent
Lookout points of the Weser area. The abundance of beautiful beech forest,
the strong development of easily surveyed valleys that rich
Outline, which is also evident in the noble silhouette of the mountains
Expression, give this mountain group a very special one
Charm. Only two poor people can be found almost hidden in the settlements
Lumberjack village. The name of one, Heinrichshagen, has together
with that of the mountain range itself gave rise to the legend that King had here
Heinrichs Vogelherd confessed. At its north-west end, the king's pinnacle,
the Vogler reaches the Weser in a steep fall near Bodenwerder, their
From now on we have to follow the run from the manufacturer (Fig. 60).

[Illustration: Fig. 81. Süntelbuche on the sheep pasture near Hülsede.

After a photograph by W. Wehrhahn in Hanover. (Go to page 101.)]




~ IX. ~ The Weser from Manufacture to Hameln.


[Sidenote: The Weser Valley.]

Below Carlshafen, at Herstelle, the Weser leaves the pure
Red sandstone area and occurs through the cliffs of Hanover
right, from the Hessian cliffs and their western continuation
gate formed on the left in the second of pages 24 and 25 mentioned
Sections of the valley. The impression of the open landscape becomes
apart from the greater distance of the valley walls also by their
Created gaps that are located at the mouths of the tributaries,
but to the meaning of waters like the Nethe, the Holzminde, the
on the right-hand side of the Beverbach and the Forstbach are disproportionate. The
Contrast between the two youngest members of the Triassic, ours
Tal partes, we have ample opportunity to observe. Gently raises
to the right of the Solling; the fields rise far on its slopes
up, so that often only a strip of the forest can be seen
and the summit height of the sandstone mountains is underestimated. Left falls
the Höxtersche Höhenland steeply. In contrast to the rounded one
Shape of the pendants that we observed at Reinhardswalde
the Muschelkalk angled falls, the steepest point at the top
of the plateau, while below there are cones of debris piled up in places
soften the steepness. This form of the mountain profile is repeated at
all projections of the plateau, which are like a backdrop in front of each other
push, and reminds of the northern edge despite the smaller proportions
the Swabian Alb (Fig. 55). We have as the reason for this phenomenon
to see the fact that in the case of sandstone more the mechanical, in the case of
Lime has had more of an erosive effect on the chemical forces of water.
This leads the lime dissolved or in such small particles to the valley that
almost nothing remains on the embankment itself, while the
rubble torn from the sandstone is deposited wherever that
weaker gradients reduce the vital force of water.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 82. The Hohenstein against the Süntel. (To page
28 and 102.)]

At settlements we first turn right into the Hanoverian village
Lauenförde, on the left the Westphalian town of Beverungen an der Bever (2400
Residents) notice that earlier from Manufacture only with a detour
was accessible via the right bank while since the forties
Bremer Strasse, which was much admired at the time and is still beautiful today
leads there at the top of the mountain (Fig. 50). We also mention this on the left
Schlößchen Blankenau and the village of Wehrden with stately noble houses
(Fig. 51). But even from afar we protrude to the right on a high sandstone rock
the village and the former castle Fürstenberg (180 ~ m ~) opposite
(Fig. 52). In his older memories of the Counts of Dassel and
Everstein going back, we are only interested from the point in time
where Duke Karl von Braunschweig-Wolfenbüttel, seized by the
Porcelain fever prevailed in the mid-eighteenth century
the "arcanist" Benckgraff, who had been alienated from the Höchst factory
introduced the manufacture of those noble pot ware here. The factory since
Privately owned in 1853, it was a long time ago in the previous century
limited to the production of artless mass-produced articles,
but has recently started working again according to the previous decades
eighteenth-century models, some of which are
possess high artistic value.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 83. Tower of the Schaumburg against the Paschenburg.
(See page 102.)]

If it can be made possible, we will do a short one in Fürstenberg
Make a stop and enjoy the view we have of the
Enjoy the terraces of the inns on the valleys of the Weser and Nethe
be able. Soon there will also be friendly Höxter along with the nearby one
Corvey reached.

[Sidenote: Höxter.]

Höxter is originally a Carolingian royal court and will be his
The origin of the Saxon people's castle on the Brunsberge is to be owed
like so often the Franconian courts are close to such old ones
Go to the fortifications. Here Ludwig the Pious poured it out
Corbie in Picardy Benedictine immigrants who are seven years
previously a subsidiary in an undetermined place called "Hetha"
founded, but given up because of the inhospitable nature of the place
822 had the land for a new settlement; This is
Corvey, which was so famous in the Middle Ages. It owes its fame
the rapid growth of its convent and its possessions, the zeal
its inmates for their pioneering work in the interests of culture and the
handsome number of men eminent in art and science who
have lingered within its walls. We only remember Hrabanus Maurus,
the later abbot of Fulda and archbishop of Mainz, to Anschar, the
Apostles of the North, to the painters Theodegar and Anderedus, to the
Master builder Luitolf, to the historian of the Sachsenland
Widukind and the first German Pope, Gregor ~ V. ~ It is known that
the otherwise lost five first books of Tacitus' annals in the
1514 was found again in the local monastery library
are. The heyday of the monastery is of course already with the eleventh
Century came to an end. It has its imperial immediacy in 1803
lost; later it has become a class rule that itself
owned by the Hohenlohe family since 1834, currently
of the Duke of Racibórz.

Not much of the old buildings has survived. The most interesting
is the western porch of the church, the oldest surviving structure
Westphalia, with columns in early Christian (pre-Romanesque) style.
Most of the buildings are from the new building erected around 1700
of the abbot Florentius v. Velde, whose Italian builders in
the neighboring Lüchtringen still some black-eyed descendants
should have left behind. At sights are still shown
a gallery with the portraits of the sixty-five abbots who are in theirs
Significance mostly very overestimated library of 60,000 volumes and that
Grave Hoffmann von Fallersleben, who worked here as a librarian in
Died in 1874 (Figs. 53 and 54).

The Westphalian town of Höxter developed partly under the
Influence of the monastery, partly as a bridge place on the trade route from
Rhine to Braunschweig and Magdeburg. She shared the political
Fortunes Corveys. Now it counts 7700 inhabitants who do their work
In addition to agriculture, it is also found in some industries (including cement).
In terms of church and secular monuments, she still has some pretty ones
Old pieces preserved (Fig. 55).

[Illustration: §. Fig. 84. The Arensburg. (Go to page 103.)]

[Sidenote: Holzminden.]

Holzminden is less preferred due to the scenic charm of the location
(9900 inhabitants), which with Höxter in the position as a place of transition
shares, but superior to it as the main stacking place for the Sollingen sandstones
is. The importance of this industry is enough
from the fact that in the Brunswick district
Holzminden 22½% of the working population with extraction and
Processing of stones and earth are busy in Hanover
District Uslar but 13.9%. Most and best fractions are just there
the west and north sides of the Solling. The sandstone is found in two
different shapes, namely as a block or as a plate. The blocks
are used as building and work stones, for troughs, cribs, drains
and the like processed; the panels, on the other hand, are used as tiles
Covering the floors in kitchens and hallways, as pavement flooring and
especially used as roof tiles. Hewing the blocks that
Making the containers, cutting and smoothing the slate
For the most part happens on the spot before the goods are on the ship
or shipped by rail.

[Sidenote: Bevern.]

From the castle that the Counts of Everstein once owned here,
no trace has been preserved. But you can still find your master castle on the
rugged shell limestone ridge of the castle hill, 10 ~ km ~ northeast of
Holzminden, can still be recognized by the ramparts and ditches. Exercised from here
this sex, whose possession with its extinction (1408) to the
Welfen passed his rule over large parts of Lower Saxony up
into Göttingen and the Eichsfeld. At the foot of the mountain
Bevern am Beverbach (2200 inhabitants) deserves a visit
for its magnificent Renaissance castle; it was from 1603 to 1612
built by a gentleman from Münchhausen and temporarily served the
Dukes of Braunschweig-Bevern for residence (Fig. 56).

[Sidenote: Ohsen.]

At the Forst domain, the Weser now enters the Muschelkalk plateau,
which it only leaves completely at Ohsen at the mouth of the Emmer. Temporarily
admittedly, the river near Bodenwerder approaches the red sandstone of the
Voglers and further down the Keuperberge from Grohnde. In general
but the character of the narrow breakthrough valley remains through the
Muschelkalk exist, in the turns of which we can see old crevices
like to have. The layers of the rock are excellent
observe where the river washes the rock immediately, and where only the
modern technology has created space for streets (Figs. 57 and 59). Soon
the rock stands bare, only with a few underbrush and colorful blooming
Overgrown lime plants; but in places some trees have
so on the Breitenstein near Rühle the tough yew tree, that otherwise almost
extinct forest tree, can gain a firm foothold.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 85. The Weser chain near Rinteln (Lange Wand,
Luhden cliff). (Go to page 103.)]

[Sidenote: Polle. Brevörde.]

The next more important place is on the left Polle (1000 inhabitants), von
»Where a valley filled with liases provides easy access from the
Weser to the plateau enables «(Guthe). The spot is under that
Protections of an Everstein castle emerged, the ruins of which on a
small mountain cone hard on the bank is a special ornament of the Weser Valley
form (Fig. 58). Soon you will also reach Brevörde, where there is an art road
comes down from the plateau in many serpentine turns, and the
famous old stone mill, formerly Jackdaw Mill, which is one of the
The rock face of a bubbling spring drifts (Fig. 59). With the picturesque
In the village of Rühle we come to the Vogler, which is quite steep
We keep the beech slopes on our right as far as Bodenwerder.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 86. Porta Westfalica from the south. (Go to page 103.)]

[Sidenote: Bodenwerder.]

That Bodenwerder (1600 inhabitants), like its name (~ Insula Bodonis ~)
says that is on an island, very few of the travelers will
notice who are approaching this pearl of the Weser valley, as the left arm
the Weser gradually narrows down to a tiny size. the
Place seems to have been founded in the eleventh century by the Lords of Homburg
whose legacy almost coincided with that of the Eversteiners
fell to the Guelphs. The importance of the place lay in the fact that the von
Lenne, which joins here on the right, has a natural access in its valley
to Hilsmulde, as well as to Alfeld, Einbeck and Northeim. So
Bodenwerder was the given place of transshipment for goods from Bremen that were sent to
the middle and upper lines were intended. The new railroad
Emmerthal-Vorwohle and the port at the mouth of the Lenne are also included
determined to restore the old conditions to some extent
(Fig. 60).

[Sidenote: Kemnade.]

The subsequent village of Kemnade still owns one in the tenth and
Benedictine nunnery founded a beautiful 11th century
flat-topped pillar basilica with simple and slender shapes (1046
consecrated). In it lies the one known for his dressing up
Baron von Münchhausen († 1797), who owned an estate in Bodenwerder,
to bury.

[Sidenote: Hastenbeck. Hameln.]

On the further journey we will see the renaissance castle of the
Count Schulenburg in Hehlen (Fig. 61) and the pretty spots
Grohnde stand out, also at the mouth of the Emmer the villages of Hagenohsen
and Kirchohsen, and finally the manor Ohr under the steep
sloping Ohrberg, a popular excursion destination with a beautiful,
Park rich in exotic plants. The lush fruit plain too
on our right, surmounted by the limestone back of the piebald with the
Old Saxon Obensburg, the battlefield of Hastenbeck is on
which on July 26, 1757 Hanoverians and French quarreled with each other.
The broad valley of the Humme opens to the left. But they are already waving to us
Towers of Hameln; the ship glides on the mirror-like, through which
Defend the pent-up tide there, and while we are in the magical
Deepen sight of the old city at the foot of the green mountains with
The steamer seems to grow higher and higher in its towers
just above the bridge next to the stately Bonifatius cathedral.
We have reached the goal of our journey.

[Illustration: Fig. 87. The Kaiser Wilhelm Monument at the Porta
Westfalica.

After a picture by court photographer C. Colberg in Oeynhausen. (To
Page 104.)]




~ X. ~ The support trough.


[Sidenote: The Hils. Eschershausen.]

During the journey we made on the neat steamer down the valley,
we are below Holzminden on the right side of the Weser,
when the nearby hills or the Voglergebirge look into the distance
not completely blocked, noticed some mountains, their shape and
Height aroused our interest. It was the Ith's jagged crest and
the woody height of the Hilses. Both belong to the mountain system of the
Hilsmulde, about their strange geological structure on page 18
Necessary is said. We just remember that a hike from the
Leine or Weser up to about according to Grünenplan over a number of rings
surrounding mountains and valleys, each of which leads
the following zone represents a later form of the earth's crust than that
preceding from the oldest formations of the Triassic to the youngest
the chalk. A railway leads us from the Weser into the Hilsmulde
into it, the line Emmerthal-Vorwohle. She crosses the stream
near Bodenwerder (see page 83) and then follows the long valley of the
Lenne, whose western edge is formed by the red sandstone of the Vogler
is, while in the east behind a low shell limestone chain
the Ith rises. We will soon reach Eschershausen (1900 inhabitants),
a Brunswick town in the eleventh and twelfth centuries
by Flemish immigrants, if not founded, then at least
mainly populated (Fig. 62). It used to be a crossing point
the streets Alfeld-Holzminden and Einbeck-Bodenwerder a certain
Had meaning. Now, along with the near excitement, it is the seat
a vibrant cement and asphalt industry. The raw material of this
the latter is a limestone soaked up to 15% with pitch, the
partly by opencast mining, partly in tunnels and pits, and
from which both rammed asphalt and mastic asphalt in fairly considerable amounts
Quantities is produced.

[Illustration: Fig. 88. Minden. Published by Julius Bleek in Minden. (To
Page 104.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 89. Interior of Minden Cathedral. (See page 106.)]

[Sidenote: The Ith.]

Seen from Eschershausen, the Ith appears to us as it were
a crenellated wall. The jagged ridge stretches to 439 ~ m ~
ascending, to the northwest 20 ~ km ~ passlessly; because the two
Country roads that cross it climb up to the ridge height.
Then suddenly he turns to the east. This southwest wall
corresponds to a similar, much longer one without the overall name in the
Northeast, only that this dissolves more into individual mountains and through
two streams, the Glene and the Wispe, is broken through. Gapes in the north
an opening about 5 ~ km ~ wide between the east and west walls,
which flows out of the hall. In the south, the outer ring is not at all
closed; but the Hilshöhe (see page 88) settles here, if
not even completely, into the gap. The whole ellipse of
almost 40 km in length and 10 km in width consists of formations of the white
Jura, the strata of which are quite steep towards the inside of the hollow
come in and the wanderer who wants to take them from the outside,
Oppose rugged, looming dolomite cliffs. Some of them
have the shape of clubs or needles, like the famous ones
Stones "Adam and Eve" near Coppenbrügge (Fig. 63). The comb lifts and
continually descends and is extremely narrow, especially on the Ith.
A tightrope walk is therefore quite arduous; because even that
Beech forest, which only thrives poorly, does not always provide sufficient
The shade. But what a pleasure, from the Rotensteinfelsen
Eschershausen (Fig. 64), from the Dielmisser Felsen, from the Mönchstein
near Lauenstein or from Kahnstein near Salzhemmendorf, high up
standing on the edge of the vertical wall, on the fertile foreland
to look down in which the villages are tightly closed and brick-red
like on the map from the yellow, brown and green drawn area
lift up. It is, of course, even more arduous to make your way through the rocky wilderness
to work through the outer slopes of those mountain ranges
accompanied. But that is also worthwhile, especially when we are so interesting
Go to places like the Teufelsküche near Coppenbrügge, where the
huge thread diaper or rocking stone rests on a narrow base, or
the chamber stones on the Selter near Freden with their cave.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 90. Bergkirchen on the Wiehengebirge. (To page
107.)]

The basin enclosed between those mountains is also rich
in good arable soil, but also contains many usable minerals,
such as lime, gypsum, clay, lignite and iron ore. That's how it was
Also worth it, a standard gauge small train from Voldagsen on the line
Hameln-Hildesheim to the ironworks near Delligsen in the Hilsmulde
to push in. She first touches the lovely Lauenstein
(1200 inhabitants), which is almost in the above-mentioned kink of the Ith
nestles in and is surrounded by beautifully wooded hills (Fig. 65).
The place is under the protection of one of the Lords of Homburg and
in its remains a castle that was still preserved was built, as on the other
Side of the mountains of the Flecken Coppenbrügge its origin of a fortress
which seems to owe the Count of Spiegelberg, which is now called the Amthaus
serves.

Salzhemmendorf (1300 inhabitants) at the foot of the Kahnstein has its saltworks
Died in 1873, but still has its small saltwater bath, albeit one
the huge limestone quarries almost entirely turned the spots into industrial sites
threaten to make. Duingen (1100 inhabitants), on the other hand, has been around since
in the 1970s gradually expanded into its old, down-to-earth earthenware industry
fading away from the competition with the cheap enamel dishes
the duration cannot withstand. The tertiary tone that is there
found in isolated nests, was made by independent masters,
of which currently only four continue the trade on the
Turning wheel processed by hand into pots, bowls, jugs, etc.
and burned in small stoves with straw. In place of generation
of pot ware has now partly entered the market. Man
lets them come from outside, z. B. from Bunzlau, and drives them into the
Villages around, where the peasants buy them directly from the wagon.

[Illustration: Fig. 91. Königl. Kurhaus in Bad Oeynhausen.

After a picture by court photographer C. Colberg in Oeynhausen. (To
Page 107/108.)]

A popular spot nearby is the famous one
Lippoldshöhle, a presumably very old residential and fortification complex,
which, perhaps using natural caves, in the coral limestone
of the Reuberges at Brunkensen has been worked into. She is on
the breakthrough valley of the Glene, which serves a paper mill here
is made, and probably had the purpose to close this bottleneck. this
becomes all the more likely, as the castle once stood on the Reuberge
Hohenbüchen was in the family of its owners, the gentlemen
von Rössing, the name Lippold was not uncommon. But the legend has it
old cave turned into a robber's nest, which in a certain sense too
is not incorrect; she knows of Lippold's outrageous acts
Telling tales and deservedly let him himself on the
Raven stones end. Often the schools in the area look for the romantic
Place on. The young hikers then like to climb the
swaying ladder to the robber's "room" and "chamber", crawl
with the wax stumps in hand through the low, narrow one
Walk to the »chimney« and go through this to the »kitchen« and
down to the "horse stable" while the more level-headed companions are in the
Shadows of the rocks on the babbling Glene enjoy the rest and
let the magic of the fairytale environment work its magic on you.

[Sidenote: Ith and Hils.]

In the south-eastern part of the discussed Jura ring there is now a
Smaller ring switched on, so to speak, that of the chalk formation
listened to; it is the actual Hils himself. It surpasses the Jura train
in height, since in the large sole and in the bare cell it is up to 471 and
477 ~ m ~ increases. On the map he resembles a human right
Ear; it only shows an opening in the east, and this is made possible by the
Valley of the Wisp formed. You climb up to a bare part of the
broad Hilsrücken, you overlook a woodland of genuine, harsh
Low mountain character. Because extensive ones thrive on the Hilssandstein
Spruce forests and only on the younger formations, especially that
Planer, says Buchenwald. There are no rural settlements here
entirely. In the midst of these small but natural beauties
particularly preferred mountain group lies deep in the Grünenplan basin,
a very young start-up. Because the core of the Brunswick village
forms a mirror glass factory because of the cheap firewood
was laid out in 1740, and it appears to have been in place
older, abandoned huts. Who would want to believe this
Village is home to many well-traveled and linguistic men! There are
Bird traders who bring the little feathered singers from the Upper Harz,
especially as canaries, and then relate them overseas
Countries, especially to South and Central America. To this
The foreign industry has recently entered the industry. Because green plan
is becoming more and more popular as a summer retreat.

[Illustration: Fig. 92. Osnabrück as seen from the Gertrudenberg.

After a photograph by JH Evering Wwe. In Osnabrück. (To page
108/109.)]




~ XI. ~ Osterwald, Deister and Bückeberg.


[Sidenote: The Easter forest.]

North of the Hilsmulde and separated from it by the broad one
Lower Saale, through which after overcoming the Scheckenpass
at the old Sachsenfeste Obensburg the railway Hameln-Hildesheim
Towards the leash at Elze, it rises up to a height of 419 m
rising, gently arched back made of Wealden sandstone, in his
eastern parts of Osterwald, called Nesselberg in the western part. It is
despite the rich forest cover a somewhat monotonous landscape
Area. On the other hand, his coal and his are economically important
fine-grained sandstone, highly valued by architects, the
z. B. has been used for the Berlin Reichstag building. money
and stone are found in numerous quarries and several pits at that
won the high village of Osterwald. The one in the north is more attractive
adjoining Jurassic chain, its dolomite cliffs, the white
Stein, the Barenburg with its old wall remains, the Drakenberg and the
romantic landgrave cuisine, steeply sloping down towards the plain.
One therefore likes to visit these points from Hanover, preferably those
idyllic wood mill in a cross valley of this train and the Saupark
at Springe, in which the emperor hustle and bustle every year in late autumn
to keep wild boar, and where at other times the
black cousins ​​of our domestic pig at the feeding places peacefully
can see feasting (Fig. 67).

[Sidenote: Saupark. Deister.]

The Saupark, also called Kleiner Deister, forms with the Ebersberge,
which already belongs to the actual Deister, the two goal posts
the Deisterpforte, a strategically important pass through which the
Hanover-Hameln railway runs through it (Fig. 5).

The Deister is also a popular excursion destination for the Hanoverians
its uniformity. Its main attraction is when we don't
Bennigserburg and the Heisterburg (page 58) with professional interest
look at, in the magnificently thriving beech forest, which almost everything
covers, mostly even the evenly stretched, wide crest that
400 ~ m ~ towering above only in one place, but everywhere the gentle northern
and the steeper south-facing slopes, as well as the flat, straight ones
Washout valleys, which the northern slope in a large number of so-called
Share »Brinke«.

Similar to the Osterwald, the Deister also consists of a core
of Wealden sandstone with an upstream white Jura belt (for details
Page 9). But this is in the south, not like there in the north.
As a result, in contrast to the Osterwalde, the exploitation of the
Coal deposits and sandstone banks have been started from the north, and the
The north also has its rail connection first on the Weetzen-Haste line
Receive.

[Illustration: Fig. 93. The market in Osnabrück with the town hall,
Stüve monument, Ratswage and Marienkirche.

After a photograph by Karl F. Wunder in Hanover. (Go to page 110.)]

Other settlements on the Deister are Springe (3100 inhabitants),
the former capital of the
County Hallermund, which still owns a few carpet factories
to name the following: on the northeast side Barsinghausen, the center
of coal mining and tourist traffic, with a beautiful, old one
Monastery church, on the north-west corner of Nenndorf with quite a significant one
Bath that has the strongest sulfur springs in Germany, and tight
including the town of Rodenberg (1700 inhabitants) with a saltworks.

[Sidenote: The Bückeberg.]

The Rodenberger Aue separates the Deister from the Bückeberge, which is different
deletes as the Deister, but belongs to the same formation and also
scenically resembles it to a certain extent. Of course he has here
Beech forest has to give way to the spruce plantations for long stretches.
The sandstone quarries are located here in higher elevations than on the Deister
and Osterwald, namely on top of the ridge, so that the rubble heaps
Make the mountain range recognizable for miles. The stones are in the
As a rule, the top is only roughly hewn and then transported to the valley on wagons. On
They are not inferior to any other excellence and therefore also have
for some famous buildings like the Antwerp City Hall, the castle and
the stock exchange in Amsterdam and the Cologne Cathedral, the material supplied.
However, the coal seams are deeper here than on the Deister. Opposite to
The majority of the tunnel operations there are therefore shafts here.
They are located at the northern foot of the mountains in the area of ​​Obernkirchen;
the coals can usually be placed directly on the stations of the railway
Rinteln-Stadthagen are loaded and for the most part arrive in
Rinteln to ships.

[Illustration: §. Fig. 94. Tecklenburg. (To page 114.)]

[Sidenote: The Wealden coal.]

The Wealdenkohle, which not only on the last three discussed
Mountain ranges, but also on the Süntel, on the north side of the Wiehengebirge
and occurs in Amte Iburg near Osnabrück, increases according to age and
Condition a middle position between the actual hard coal
the carbon age and lignite. The best is the one on the Bückeberge,
which is almost equal to the Westphalian in terms of heating power; this stands the
Deisterkohle after, and the Osterwaldkohle is even lower.

The oldest works are those on the Bückeberge; because sure has there
a regular operation already existed in 1520; fewer
flawless news even leaves the mining industry down to that
go back fourteenth century. Duke Julius laid down at Osterwalde
of Braunschweig-Lüneburg in the eighties of the sixteenth
Century the first pits to the salt pans of Hemmendorf with
To fire hard coal; am Süntel, which we will talk about below
and mining operations started at the Deister at the time
of the Thirty Years War, although it should be mentioned
that at that time there was already talk of abandoned tunnels on the Deister,
old people wanted to remember the former company.
The actual upswing of the mining industry only begins with
the establishment of the Hannover-Lindener Industrie in the second quarter
of the nineteenth century. For them it was the presence of the
Deister coal is a prerequisite.

The ownership of the various works is partly in private hands, partly
in those of the state. The coal fields on the Bückeberg are also exploiting Prussia
Schaumburg-Lippe together. The entire promotion of the discussed
Area, excluding Osterwald and Süntel, was almost one in 1907
Million tons, the workforce around 6300 men.

[Sidenote: Stadthagen.]

In contrast to the Osterwalde and Deister, the Bückeberg is not complete
uninhabited. No, there is a small one at the highest point
Settlement of quarry workers and officials formed. At the north foot
is Stadthagen (6700 inhabitants) with pretty schaumburg-Lippe
Castle. The place, formerly Grevenalveshagen, d. H. Count Adolfs (des
Fourth) Hagen, is originally mentioned on page 44
Hagen colonies from the thirteenth century, of which the
Neighborhood still Krebshagen, Wendhagen, Kathrinhagen and others. to call
are.

[Sidenote: Obernkirchen.]

Obernkirchen (4200 inhabitants), which is the origin, is much older
of his former Benedictine convent to the time of Ludwig des
Pious seeks to be traced back. The well restored Gothic
Hall church is worth seeing. The inhabitants of the place find in the
Quarries and pits, as well as in the important glassworks
Schauenstein employment.

[Illustration: Fig. 95. Iburg Castle. (To page 114.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 96. Ravensberg Castle in 1839.

After a photographic reproduction (property of
Beautification Association in Halle i. W.) by H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (To
Page 114.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 97. Ravensberg Castle.

After a photograph (property of the Beautification Association in
Hall i. W.) by H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (To page 114.)]

[Sidenote: Bückeburg.]

As a western continuation of the Bückeberg is the low train
of the Harrl, which at the valley of the Bückeburger Aue at the
lovely sulfur bath Eilsen begins and at Bückeburg, the
pretty capital of the Schaumburg country, reached its end
(Fig. 66). The old counts of the Schaumburgers, before theirs
Sharp swords as both Danes and Saracens trembled, has been since 1640
extinct, and the Lippe dynasty that now sits there has
only a small piece of the vast land holdings of their predecessors
able to maintain. But the ruler, that of the royal city, you
Has impressed, is Prince Ernst, the penultimate Schaumburger,
been. »The remains of the artistic creations of this still existing today
Princes, "says Haupt," ... breathe in such a passionate love
the most splendid and exuberant means of the Renaissance style, so
convinced, irresistible storming on the way of the transmission
Italian art into the Nordic region that one can only fully appreciate here
can what glorious, blossoming national art through the
most unfortunate of all wars
the little-known, magnificent interior decorations of the Bückeburger
Castle and the Lutheran town church, the sweeping facade
same (Fig. 68), the castle church, the gate of the castle square and
the beautiful bronze figures of Adrian de Vries in the palace garden. the
uniform artistic character of the town, including new buildings like that
stately castle of the princess mother and the new town hall (Fig. 69)
have preserved, the lack of noisy industry, the pretty location on
At the foot of the beech-green Harrl, the charm of the colorful folk costumes in the
Surroundings have Bückeburg (5700 inhabitants) to a popular resting place
made by retirees and retirees.

[Illustration: Fig. 98. Street in Halle i. W.

After a photograph (property of the local beautification association)
by H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (To page 114.)]




~ XII. ~ From Hameln to Osnabrück. Süntel, Weser range and Wiehengebirge.


[Sidenote: Hameln.]

A hike over the Weser chain naturally takes its from Hameln
Exit (Fig. 70). The city (20,700 inhabitants) is located on one of
determined by nature itself to be the place of bridges, transshipment and mills
Job. The area exposed to the floods is very here
narrow, narrower than above and below the city. Further lead
apart from the Weser valley itself, from the right the valleys of the Hamel
and Remte, from the left the old streets of the Emmer and Humme
and recently railways closed. But the Weser is through an island
and a rocky reef not yet completely gnawed by the waters
dammed up, which made the construction of mills easier, but the boatmen
forced to reload. What was unfavorable in these circumstances has
modern technology victoriously overcome. The dreaded »Hameler
Loch «has lost its horror after the construction of spacious locks.
But the great millings that are now in bloom are still in bloom
Weser-Mühlen-Aktien-Gesellschaft belong to. The two mill works
are operated by 16 turbines with around 1500 horse power and
can grind about 6000 quintals a day. In addition, the weirs give
Opportunity to catch salmon, which has been practiced there since ancient times,
but since the middle of the last century by the installation of
Made salmon hatcheries near town much more profitable
has been. We stand on the iron bridge, which the Mühlenwerder
connects with the two banks, so we can see the fishermen
watch them move back and forth into the heavy square mesh
lower the moving tide and then pull it up on a clumsy wooden lever.

[Illustration: Fig. 99. Chain of the Teutoburg Forest near Halle with
View of the Ravensberg.

After a photograph (property of the Beautification Association in
Hall i. W.) by H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (To page 114.)]

[Illustration: Fig. 100. Idyll from Amshausen near Halle i. W.

After a photograph by H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (To page 114.)]

Not to be compared with the traffic conditions of a time that
is not long behind us, the movement of goods is on the
Weser as it has developed in recent years. Became
through the Hamel lock to Berg and zu Tale in 1881
48,256 tons were transported through it, so it was already possible in 1891
155540, in 1901 on the other hand 311309 and finally in 1907 even
Note 491,368 tons. So the traffic has increased over the course of 26
Years tenfold. With the ever increasing production of
Potash, currently the Weser’s main export product, is likely
a large increase can also be expected in the subsequent period. Of
but had all transshipment points from Cassel to Minden inclusive
in 1906 the port of Hamel with a quarter of a million tons
greatest traffic.

[Illustration: Fig. 101. View of Bielefeld. After a photograph
by H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (See pages 28 and 114.)]

Gone are the days when the so-called Bremer »bucks« from 15 to
20 horses by means of a rope attached to the mast under endless
"Huh!" And "Hoh!" The drivers were towed upstream and the
smaller »backside« next to the even smaller »bulls« behind you
moved here. Three ships united in this way were called "one mast".
Downstream the boatmen let their craft drift and made
by a loud harmonic triad the ferrymen from afar
her coming attentively so that the tightrope gets into the stream on time
could be lowered. Does the writer of these lines have that kind of
Even in his boyhood he saw traffic, so it will be with him and
probably also difficult for the reader to put himself in the place of that time when himself
the towing train with horses was a novelty, which in places with
alten Verboten zu kämpfen hatte. Im Jahre 1815 bestand ein solches
allerdings nur noch auf der lippischen Strecke, wo selbst damals nur
mit Menschen getreidelt werden durfte.

[Illustration: Abb. 102. Burg Sparenberg (Bielefeld) vom Johannisberg
aus gesehen.

Nach einer Photographie von Ernst Lohöfener in Bielefeld. (Zu Seite
114.)]

Kehren wir nach dieser Abschweifung noch einmal zur Stadt Hameln
zurück! Was ihren baulichen Charakter anlangt, so reichen sich
hier Mittelalter und Neuzeit die Hand. Da bewundern wir das
ehrwürdige Bonifatius-Münster, dessen Ursprung vielleicht noch auf
die Karolingerzeit zurückgeht, dessen älteste erhaltene Teile der
Spätblüte des romanischen Stiles und dessen Umbauten der gotischen
Zeit angehören. Da erfreuen wir uns an den Renaissance-Schöpfungen
jenes unbekannten Meisters, der in dem Hochzeitshause einen Bau für
allgemeine städtische Zwecke, in dem sogenannten Rattenfängerhause ein
behagliches Patrizierheim und in den benachbarten Schlössern Schwöbber
und Hämelschenburg Edelsitze nach dem neuen Geschmack von 1600
herzustellen wußte (Abb. 71 u. 72). Umgeben ist die Stadt von einem
Kranz zierlicher Landhäuser. Und wahrlich man kann es verstehen, wenn
wirtschaftlich unabhängige Menschen sich diesen Wohnplatz aussuchen.
Lockt der Ort doch auch Jahr für Jahr einen immer stärker werdenden
Schwarm von Touristen herbei, die hier teils die Dampfschiffahrt in
die Oberwesergegenden antreten, teils zu Fuß oder im Motorboot die
beliebten Punkte der Umgegend aufsuchen. Zu diesen gehört außer dem
Seite 84 erwähnten Ohrberg der Klüt, ein unmittelbar über der Stadt am
linken Weserufer ziemlich schroff aufsteigender Berg, im achtzehnten
Jahrhundert von dem Fort George, jetzt von einem steinernen Turme
bekrönt. Unvergleichlich ist der Blick von dort oben auf die schmucke
Stadt, das fruchtbare Tal und die gegenüberliegenden Bergketten.

Von Hameln nach Minden fehlt es an einem regelmäßigen
Personendampferverkehr. Nur Sonntags im Sommer fährt ein Schiff
stromabwärts. Das Tal ist bis Erder zu breit, der Wasserspiegel
zu tief, um immer eine freie Umschau zu ermöglichen. So benutzen
wir denn lieber die Bahn Hameln-Löhne, die das fruchtbare, von
schön profilierten Bergen umrahmte Tal durchzieht (Abb. 80). Hier
hat Fischbeck von seinem alten Augustinerinnenkloster, das jetzt
als adliges Fräuleinstift weiter besteht, noch eine flachgedeckte
romanische Basilika von hervorragender Schönheit. Es folgen
Hessisch-Oldendorf (1900 Einwohner) und Rinteln (5300 Einwohner), zwei
Städte, deren hübsche alte Fachwerkshäuschen großenteils noch nicht
von der entstellenden Tünche befreit sind, mit denen Ungeschmack und
Großmannssucht sie im vorigen Jahrhundert bekleidet hat[6].

[6] Wie in den vierziger Jahren selbst die Gebildeten jedes Verständnis
für die behaglichen alten Bauformen verloren hatten und nur für lange,
weiße Mauern schwärmten, dafür enthält das in der Einleitung erwähnte
Buch von Boclo zwei charakteristische Stellen. An Hameln weiß der
»Begleiter auf dem Weserdampfschiff« nur das Gefängnis(!) zu rühmen. Er
bittet, »nicht zu übersehen, wie großartig-modern Hameln sich ausnimmt,
in dem Moment, wo man es zuerst erblickt. Die großen neuen massiven
Korrektionsgebäude maskieren nämlich die ganze übrige, ältliche nicht
eben schöne (!) Stadt ... und lassen vermuten, Hameln wäre nach diesem
modernen Stile eben gebaut worden.« Von Rinteln heißt es: »Die Straßen
Rintelns würden viel länger, die Stadt viel schöner sein, wenn nicht
bei weitem die meisten Häuser mit der Giebelseite nach der Straße
gerichtet wären. Der Grund mag darin liegen, daß Rinteln ... früher
eine Ackerstadt war. Man sieht dies noch daraus, daß viele Häuser statt
der Türme hohe Tore haben.«

[Illustration: Abb. 103. Haus in der Oberntorstraße in Bielefeld.

Nach einer Photographie von Ernst Lohöfener in Bielefeld. (Zu Seite
114.)]

[Sidenote: Rinteln.]

Rinteln ist die Hauptstadt des preußischen Kreises Grafschaft
Schaumburg, d. h. des nach dem Aussterben der einheimischen Herrscher
an Kurhessen gefallenen Teiles von dem Schaumburger Erbe (Abb. 74).
Das Dorf Rinteln lag ursprünglich auf der rechten Seite der Weser,
die Stadt wurde im dreizehnten Jahrhundert vom Grafen Adolf ~IV.~, dem
Dänenbesieger, auf dem linken Ufer gegründet, hat aber in den letzten
Jahrzehnten mit ihrer jungen Industrie die alte Heimstätte wieder
mit in Beschlag genommen. Im Jahre 1621 gründete hier Fürst Ernst
(Seite 93) eine Universität, die König Jerome im Jahre 1809 zugleich
mit Helmstedt eingehen ließ. Dem Königreich Westfalen blieben ja
noch die Hochschulen zu Marburg, Göttingen und Halle, mehr als genug
für die wissenschaftlichen Bedürfnisse des Königs »Loustic«. Während
der kurfürstlichen Zeit war Rinteln als das »hessische Sibirien«
verschrien. In diesen entlegenen Teil des Staates schickte man gern
unfähige oder auch allzu steifnackige Beamte. Früher war die Zahl der
Behörden größer. Aber auch die jetzigen erhalten ihre Beamtenschaft in
der Regel aus dem Hauptteil des Regierungsbezirks Cassel. So ist denn
hier in der westfälischen Bevölkerung ein hessischer Einschlag immerhin
bemerkbar.

[Illustration: Abb. 104. Rathaus und Theater in Bielefeld.

Nach einer Photographie von Ernst Lohöfener in Bielefeld. (Zu Seite
114.)]

[Sidenote: An der Lippischen Porta. Vlotho.]

Unterhalb Erder verengert sich das Tal. Der Fluß windet sich wieder
durch ein Stück des Keupergebirges hindurch und bildet die sogenannte
»Kleine« oder »Lippische Porta«. Das mit ihr beginnende Durchbruchstal
ist nur kurz, es mißt kaum 10 ~km~; aber innerhalb desselben vollführt
die Weser einen ihrer schärfsten Knicke. Bei dem westfälischen
Industriestädtchen Vlotho (4700 Einwohner), das sich malerisch unter
seine alte Dynastenburg auf dem Amthausberg schmiegt, geht sie aus
der westlichen plötzlich in die nördliche Richtung über (Abb. 77).
Hier verläßt die Bahn das Wesertal, um auf die linksseitigen Höhen
nach Oeynhausen und Löhne hinaufzusteigen. Die Weser aber tritt in das
breite Tal ein, das bereits die Werre in ostwärts gewendetem Laufe
durchfließt. Dieser Richtung folgt sie selber und erreicht alsbald die
Westfälische Pforte.

[Illustration: Abb. 105. Grabmal Wittekinds in der Kirche zu Enger. (Zu
Seite 116.)]

[Sidenote: Der Süntel. Die Weserkette.]

Diesem Zielpunkte wird der rüstige Wanderer lieber auf anderen Wegen
zustreben. Vielleicht wird er von Hameln aus das linke Weserufer
verfolgen; er wird über den aussichtsreichen Taubenberg gehen, das
uralte Dorf Exten (Abb. 29 u. 78) an der forellenreichen Exter
besuchen, die dort einer alt eingesessenen Stahlwarenindustrie
dienstbar gemacht ist, und die ansehnlichen Baulichkeiten
des tausendjährigen Klosters Möllenbeck (Abb. 80) sowie das
Renaissanceschloß Graf Simons ~VI.~ zur Lippe in Varenholz
bewundern (Abb. 79). Der Hauptstrom der Touristen aber folgt der
nördlichen Weserkette, deren schöne Wellenlinie zwar vom Tal und den
gegenüberliegenden Höhen aus besser zu beobachten ist, deren kühle
Buchenhallen aber nebst manchen sehenswerten Punkten einen Besuch
des Gebirges selbst fordern. So sind wir denn an dem östlichen Ende
jenes etwa 115 ~km~ langen Zuges angelangt, der früher in seiner
ganzen Ausdehnung von der Hamel zur Hase den Namen Süntel führte.
Jetzt begegnet uns diese Bezeichnung zunächst in seinem östlichen
und höchsten Stück, das sich aus Wealdensandstein aufbaut und bis zu
437 ~m~ ansteigt. Am Nordostfuße liegt Münder (3300 Einwohner) mit
Solbad, Stuhlfabriken und Kohlengruben (vergl. Seite 92), von wo eine
Eisenbahn durch die Senke zwischen Süntel und Deister nach Nenndorf
führt. Steigen wir von dort statt von Hameln zur Höhe hinan, so werden
wir hier und da einer nur noch in kleineren Beständen vorhandenen,
interessanten Baumform begegnen, der Süntelbuche, die sich außerdem nur
am Jura in geringem Maße vorfindet; sie wächst völlig krumm und ist
daher anders als zu Heizzwecken nicht zu verwenden (Abb. 81). Von dem
Süntelturm aus, an dessen lohnender Fernsicht wir uns lange erfreuen,
sehen wir unseren Weg deutlich vor uns. Zwei bis drei Tage lang werden
wir, wenn wir die Porta zu Fuß erreichen wollen, der Bergkette zu
folgen haben, die wir hier in der Verkürzung erblicken. »Auf eine
Kette von niederen Vorbergen gestellt, zieht das Hauptgebirge von dem
eigentlichen Süntel aus gegen Abend bis zur Porta Westfalica, zumeist
scharf und steil gegen das Tal abfallend. Die schöne Scheitellinie
der Bergwand ist wellenförmig gewunden, und häufige, symmetrisch
wechselnde, flach eingeschnittene Buchten bezeichnen eine Reihe der
ausgezeichnetsten Berge, welche ebensowohl durch ihre malerischen
Formen und namentlich ihre grotesken Felsenhäupter, als durch die
herrlichen Aussichten, welche man von ihnen genießt, die ganze
Aufmerksamkeit des Wanderers in Anspruch nehmen« (Franz Dingelstedt).
Der Übergang vom Süntel zur eigentlichen Weserkette macht sich wenig
bemerkbar, nur daß der Fichtenwald vom Buchenwald abgelöst wird.
Daß wir uns auf dem Gebiete des Weißen Juras befinden, verraten uns
erst die Klippen, auf die wir am Hohenstein (332 ~m~) unerwartet
heraustreten. Großartiger noch und massiger, von tieferen Kaminen
zerklüftet als am Ith, fallen hier die Dolomitfelsen in das waldige
Vorland ab. Als dunkele Flecken heben sich die vielhundertjährigen
Eiben an unzugänglichen Standorten von dem lichtgrauen Gestein ab
(Abb. 82). Von einsamen Waldtälern ist der mächtige Steinklotz auf
drei Seiten umschlossen. Tiefe, nachdenkliche Stille umgibt uns hier
oben. Gern wollen wir es glauben, was die Überlieferung behauptet, daß
der vereinzelt vorspringende Fels, der heute den Namen Teufelskanzel
führt, einst ein altgermanischer Opferaltar gewesen sei, und immerhin
annehmbar erscheint uns die Hypothese, daß die Namen der benachbarten
Hochfläche, des einen Tales und seines Wasserlaufes sowie des einen
Dorfes im Tal -- Dachtelfeld (= Prügelfeld), Totental, Blutbach,
Weibeck (= Kampfbach) -- an den Sieg Wittekinds über die Franken im
Jahre 782, wenn nicht gar an Idistavisus erinnern sollen.

[Illustration: Abb. 106. Waldchaussee von Detmold zum Jagdschloß
Lopshorn.

Verlag der Hinrichs'schen Hofbuchhandlung (H. Knöner) in Detmold. (Zu
Seite 116.)]

Durch frische Täler und über buchenbewachsene Hügel geht es fort
zur Paschenburg, zur Schaumburg und zur Arensburg. Die erste ist
ein hochgelegenes Gasthaus (336 ~m~), das wegen seiner Fernsicht
berühmt ist. Lassen sich doch von dort oben angeblich 23 Windungen
der Weser und 136 Ortschaften zählen. Die Schaumburg, der Stammsitz
des gleichnamigen Grafengeschlechtes, liegt unmittelbar darunter auf
einem Vorberge. Von dem Schloß sind noch eine Anzahl teils bewohnte,
teils halb zerfallene Baulichkeiten ohne großen Kunstwert vorhanden
(Abb. 83). Die Lage aber und der Blick auf das am Berge hängende
Dörfchen Rosenthal ist von zauberhafter Schönheit. Auch die Arensburg,
welche auf kleinem Hügel den Paßübergang von Rinteln nach Obernkirchen
beherrscht, ist ursprünglich eine Ritterburg gewesen, jetzt aber
ein Lustschlößchen des Fürsten von Bückeburg mit wohlgepflegten,
geschmackvollen Parkanlagen (Abb. 84). Das nahe Steinbergen wird als
Sommerfrische viel besucht.

[Illustration: Abb. 107. Donoper Teich bei Detmold.

Verlag der Hinrichs'schen Hofbuchhandlung (H. Knöner) in Detmold. (Zu
Seite 116.)]

[Sidenote: Die Porta Westfalica.]

Von der Schaumburg bis zur Porta Westfalica führt der Touristenweg
nicht über die Kämme der Einzelberge, die sich in regelmäßigem Wechsel
erheben und bis zur Höhe der südlichen Vorberge herabsenken, sondern
auf einer Zwischenstufe, auf der Grenzlinie des Weißen und Braunen
Juras (Abb. 85). Von den Gipfeln sind viele bis obenhin bewaldet; ihrer
schönen Fernsicht wegen werden hauptsächlich die Luhdener Klippe mit
steinernem Turm, der oben kahle Papenbrink, die Nammer Klippe und der
Jakobsberg besucht, der bereits einen der Torflügel der Porta bildet.
Seinen Namen hat der Berg durch Friedrich den Großen erhalten. Bei
einem Besuche der Gegend fand er dort einen seiner Kriegsinvaliden,
namens Jakob, der ihm selbstgezogene Trauben[7] vorsetzte. Dies
veranlaßte den König, den bisherigen Tönniesberg in Jakobsberg
umzunennen.

[7] Weinbau wurde auch sonst an der Weser getrieben. Bei Höxter ging er
zu Anfang des achtzehnten Jahrhunderts ein. Wie bei Höxter gibt es auch
bei Lübbecke einen »Weinberg«.

In die Porta blicken wir von der auf dem Gipfel errichteten
Bismarcksäule oder von der benachbarten Jakobsklippe wie aus der
Vogelschau hinab. Durch ein Felsentor von nur etwa 800 m Breite strömt
friedlich der blanke Fluß dahin; keine Stromschnelle, kein Strudel
zeugt mehr von der Arbeit, die das Wasser hier verrichten mußte,
als es diese Bergkette in demselben Maße, wie sie sich hob, langsam
durchnagte (Abb. 86). Landstraßen geleiten den Fluß auf beiden Seiten;
auf dem rechten Ufer freilich ist der Raum für sie und die Eisenbahn
erst durch Felssprengungen gewonnen worden. Das fortwährende Rollen
der Züge verrät uns, daß wir uns an einer echten Völkerpforte, einem
der wichtigsten Tore zwischen Rhein und Elbe, befinden. Der Flecken am
Südfuße des Berges, 200 ~m~ unter uns, ist Hausberge, genannt nach dem
»Haus am Berge« (auch als Schalksburg bezeichnet), das die edlen Herren
vom Berge dort besaßen; sie waren angeblich Nachkommen Wittekinds, und
ihnen gehörte auch der gegenüberliegende Hof Wedigenstein.

Dieser war wohl der Herrenhof zu der Volksburg oben auf dem
Wittekindsberge, der den westlichen Torflügel der Porta und den Anfang
des Wiehengebirges bildet. Von dem alten Ringwall ist kaum noch
etwas zu sehen. Die kleine graue Wittekindskapelle, der Rest eines
ehemaligen Klosters namens Margaretenklus, sowie die merkwürdig hoch
gelegene steingefaßte Wittekindsquelle fallen als Zeugen der frühen
Besiedelung mehr in das Auge. Die Hauptzier des Berges aber ist das
Denkmal, das die Provinz Westfalen durch Kaspar Zumbusch und Bruno
Schmitz dem Gründer des Deutschen Reiches hat errichten lassen. Unter
hohem steinernem Hallenbau, dessen Fernwirkung aufs beste berechnet
ist, steht des alten Kaisers ehrwürdige Gestalt, die Rechte zum Segnen
erhoben (Abb. 87).

Leider ist dieser durch Natur und Kunst ausgezeichnete Platz wenig
geschont worden. Gerade mitten an der schmalsten Stelle des Tales
liegt ein garstiges Eisenwerk, das die in der Nachbarschaft gefundenen
Erze ausbeutet, und die Talwände sind durch Steinbrüche verunziert.
In ihnen wird der wertvolle grobkörnige Portasandstein gewonnen,
während der benachbarte Hügelzug Bölhorst, nördlich vom Wittekindsberg,
Wealdenkohlen birgt.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 108. Berlebeck. (Zu Seite 116.)]

[Sidenote: Minden.]

Eine Wegstunde stromabwärts liegt die Regierungsbezirks-Hauptstadt
Minden (25400 Einwohner), deren Ursprung auf die Zeit Karls des Großen
zurückgeht (Abb. 88). Dieser gründete hier für das Engerland ein
Bistum, das bis zur Zeit des Dreißigjährigen Krieges reichsunmittelbar
blieb. Trotz des Ausmündens der Weserstraße und der Wege vom Rhein und
von der Ems (Eisenbahnlinien Cöln-Hannover und Rheine-Hannover) hat
sich Minden unter der Ungunst politischer Verhältnisse nur langsam
entwickeln können. Immerhin hat es als Umschlagshafen an der Weser
jetzt die zweite Stelle eingenommen. Die Industrie des Ortes hat
keinen einheitlichen Charakter. Erwähnen möchten wir aber hier einen
Gewerbezweig, der sich über ein weites Gebiet auf beiden Seiten der
Weser bis nach Osnabrück, Bielefeld und Detmold, ja bis nach Höxter
und Carlshafen ausdehnt und von größter sozialer Bedeutung ist. Das
ist die Verarbeitung des auf der Weser eingeführten Bremer Tabaks.
Vielfach ist die Zigarrenmacherei an Stelle der Weberei getreten,
die um die Mitte des vorigen Jahrhunderts zugrunde ging, und wird
wie sie als Hausindustrie gepflegt. Meist sind die Arbeiter kleine
Grundbesitzer und Pächter, Heuerlinge, die neben der Arbeit für
den Verleger auch etwas Landwirtschaft betreiben, und die an ihrer
Lohnarbeit auch die Familienglieder teilnehmen lassen. Nach einer
Schätzung der Mindener Handelskammer zählen die genannten Bezirke
abgesehen von den Oberweserorten rund 27000 ansässige Tabakarbeiter.
In den Kreisen Minden, Lübbecke und Herford sind 3500 Häuser im
Besitz von Zigarrenmachern, und allein in dem Herfordischen Amte
Gohfeld-Mennighüffen wird in 1400 von 3400 vorhandenen Häusern
Zigarrenarbeit getrieben.

[Illustration: Abb. 109. Detmold gegen das Hermannsdenkmal. Verlag der
Hinrichs'schen Hofbuchhandlung (H. Knöner) in Detmold. (Zu Seite 116.)]

[Illustration: §. Abb. 110. Das Fürstliche Schloß in Detmold. (Zu Seite
116.)]

Von der Vergangenheit Mindens erzählt uns hauptsächlich der Dom, dessen
ehrwürdig plumper Turm aus der romanischen Zeit in einem merkwürdigen
Kontrast zu den edlen und freien Formen seines gotischen Schiffes steht
(Abb. 89). Besonders berühmt sind die »überaus prachtvollen, in dieser
Art für Westfalen unerreicht und überhaupt vielleicht unübertroffen
dastehenden Fenster« (Lübke).

Nach diesem Abstecher kehren wir zu unserer Gebirgswanderung zurück,
deren größter Teil noch vor uns liegt; denn etwa 70 ~km~ trennen die
Porta von der Hase. Aber es mindern sich die Reize des Gebirges links
der Weser mehr und mehr. Die Gliederung ist einfacher, sie geschieht
fast nur durch einige tief einschneidende Quertäler. Die Klippen aus
Korallenkalk fehlen ebenso wie die malerischen Vorberge, die wir in
der eigentlichen Weserkette beobachtet haben. Mißt der Wittekindsberg
277 ~m~ über den Meeresspiegel, und erreichen zwei Berge bei Lübbecke
noch 320 ~m~, so nimmt das Gebirge weiterhin an Höhe und Breite ab
und endigt westlich von Bramsche in Hügeln, welche die Diluvialebene
kaum noch überragen. Daß die Bewaldung nur dürftig ist, wurde Seite 30
bereits erwähnt. Von Osterkappeln ab tritt Nadelwald an Stelle der
Buchen.

[Sidenote: Das Wiehengebirge.]

Der Name Wiehengebirge (vielleicht = Wittekindsgebirge) kommt der Kette
im Volksmunde nur bis in die Gegend von Lübbecke zu; weiterhin gibt es
auf eine längere Strecke hin keinen volkstümlichen Gesamtnamen; und
erst im Osnabrückischen wird wieder die Bezeichnung Süntel gebraucht.

Als einheitlicher, ungegliederter Wall zieht sich das Gebirge von der
Porta bis zu dem Passe, den man nach dem hoch auf dem Sattel reitenden
Dorfe Bergkirchen (163 ~m~) zu benennen pflegt (Abb. 90). Bald folgt
ein etwas tieferer Paß, die Wallücke; Eisengruben haben hier zur Anlage
einer Kleinbahn nach Löhne Veranlassung gegeben. Weitere Erwähnung
verdient höchstens noch das Städtchen Lübbecke (4000 Einwohner), das
bereits in den Kriegen Karls des Großen eine Rolle gespielt hat, und
das Solbad Essen.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 111. Donopbrunnen in Detmold. (Zu Seite 116.)]

[Sidenote: Oeynhausen.]

Wollten wir von Minden die Bahn nach Osnabrück benutzen, so würden
wir anfangs dem Laufe der Werre und Else entgegenfahren, dann dem
der Hase folgen (vergl. Seite 26). Die Weser überschreiten wir bei
Rehme, dem übertausendjährigen, und erreichen dann eine der jüngsten
Städte Westfalens, das Solbad Oeynhausen (3400 Einwohner). Die
ersten Bohrversuche durch den Berghauptmann v. Oeynhausen, nach dem
der Ort genannt ist, gehen auf das Jahr 1830, die Anlage der ersten
Bäder bis 1845 zurück. Später nahm der Staat die Ausgestaltung der
Anlagen in die Hand. Jetzt besitzt der Ort, der sich seit 1885 der
Stadtrechte erfreut, verschiedene warme und kalte Solquellen, die
jährlich rund 15000 Gäste zu dem freundlich gelegenen, geschmackvoll
und behaglich eingerichteten Bade locken und außerdem zur Gewinnung
von Kochsalz dienen (Abb. 91). Das tiefste Bohrloch ist bis auf
707 ~m~ hinabgetrieben. Löhne ist ein bedeutender Eisenbahn-Knotenpunkt
mit verschiedenen industriellen Anlagen, Bünde (5000 Einwohner) ein
reizloses Städtchen, bekannt durch seine Zigarrenfabriken, seine Würste
und seine Missionsfeste, Melle (3200 Einwohner) ein bescheidenes Solbad
inmitten äußerst fruchtbaren Ackerlandes.

[Sidenote: Elsetal. Piesberg. Osnabrück.]

Nicht mit zum Wiehengebirge oder zum Süntel können wir aber die Berge
rechnen, die sich zwischen jener zusammenhängenden Bergkette und der
Else-Hase-Rinne, vielfach gegliedert, von Ost nach West ziehen. Sie
sind stellenweise, so bei Melle und in der Gegend von Schledehausen,
gut bewaldet und entbehren des landschaftlichen Reizes nicht. Ein
besonderes Interesse beansprucht der nordwestlich von Osnabrück
gelegene Piesberg wegen seines im Jahre 1899 leider eingegangenen
Kohlenbergwerkes, das eine ausgezeichnete Anthrazitkohle förderte, und
wegen der mächtigen, noch jetzt von etwa 1000 Arbeitern ausgebeuteten
Steinbrüche. Der dort gewonnene Kohlensandstein ist außerordentlich
hart, aber recht grobkörnig. Er wird besonders als Pflaster- und
Schotterstein verwendet. Zum Werkstein eignet er sich nicht; wohl aber
wird der ausgewaschene Splitterkies mit Zement zu einem Kunststein
namens Durilith verarbeitet, den man in Osnabrück vielfach zum Bau
monumentaler Fassaden benutzt.

[Illustration: Abb. 112. Das Hermannsdenkmal.

Nach einer Photographie von H. Baumann in Bielefeld. (Zu Seite 116.)]

[Sidenote: Osnabrück. Der Osning.]

Daß Osnabrück (60000 Einwohner) eine sehr alte Siedelung ist,
vielleicht die älteste unseres ganzen Gebietes, dafür spricht
mancherlei; so das Vorhandensein zahlreicher Steingräber, wie sie
sonst in unserem Gebiete nicht vorkommen, ferner aber auch der alte
germanische Name Osnabrück selbst, der vermutlich als Götterbrücke zu
deuten sein wird, wie Osning als Götterberg (s. Seite 110). Schwanken
auch die Annahmen über die Entstehungszeit der Steingräber oder Dolmen,
deren wir in den Karlssteinen am Piesberg ein treffliches Stück
besitzen, so fällt sie doch wohl kaum später als in die Mitte des
letzten vorchristlichen Jahrtausends. Die Gründung des Bistums erfolgte
wohl bald nach dem entscheidenden Siege der Franken über Wittekind an
der Hase (783), jedenfalls aber noch vor 787. Osnabrück ist also das
älteste und wohl auch das bedeutendste sächsisch-karolingische Bistum
gewesen. Um die Domfreiheit, die -- wahrscheinlich schon vor der
Gründung der ersten Kirche -- von Bauern, später Ackerbürgern, bewohnt
war, bauten sich Handwerker und Gewerbetreibende an. So erlangte der
Ort, der später dem Westfälischen Städtebunde, sowie auch der Hansa
beitrat, eine große Bedeutung als Handelsstadt und betrieb einen
schwunghaften Export von Erzeugnissen der Landwirtschaft, besonders
der Viehzucht, wie Schinken, Häuten und Wolle, sowie von Leinwand und
Tuch. Die Tuchmacherei, die im Jahre 1600 noch über 300 selbständige
Meister beschäftigte, erlag in der Folgezeit der englischen Konkurrenz,
während sich die Leinweberei zwar länger hielt, aber infolge der Wirren
des Siebenjährigen Krieges und infolge des Überganges vom Handbetrieb
zum Maschinenbetrieb schwere Krisen durchmachen mußte. Die heutige
Regierungsbezirks-Hauptstadt, deren schnelles Wachstum erst seit dem
großen Kriege von 1870 beginnt -- denn im Jahre 1868 zählte sie noch
19600 Seelen gegen 59600 im Jahre 1905 --, ist nach ihrem industriellen
Charakter in erster Linie Metallstadt. Erster Arbeitgeber in diesem
Gewerbezweige ist der Georgs-Marien-Bergwerks- und Hüttenverein,
der außer der Georgsmarienhütte am Fuße des Dörenberges südlich von
Osnabrück noch in der Stadt selbst das Eisen- und Stahlwerk, außerdem
aber Erzfelder am benachbarten Hüggel, am Schafberg bei Ibbenbüren
(s. Seite 110), an der Wallücke (vergl. Seite 107) und bei Werne in
Westfalen besitzt. Auch der Piesberg gehört ihm. Im ganzen beschäftigt
er weit über 6000 Arbeiter und erzeugte im Jahre 1907 über 300000
Tonnen Roheisen, Halb- und Fertigfabrikate. Als Gegenstände des
Osnabrücker Gewerbefleißes sind besonders Eisenbahnbedarfsartikel wie
Schienen, Schwellen, Weichen, Wegschranken, ferner aber Drahtröhren,
Maschinen allerart, Brücken, Dachkonstruktionen, Kochherde, Kraftwagen
und Musikinstrumente zu nennen, die in einer großen Anzahl von Fabriken
erzeugt werden. Stark ist der Gegensatz zwischen dem modernen und dem
mittelalterlichen Osnabrück, die noch nebeneinander bestehen. Niemand,
der vom Gertruden- oder Westerberg das malerische Städtebild auf sich
wirken läßt, wird sich diesem Eindruck entziehen können (Abb. 92). Zwar
hat der Bischof, der seit dem Westfälischen Frieden seine Landeshoheit
in der merkwürdigen Weise mit dem Welfenhause teilen mußte, daß
abwechselnd ein katholischer Prälat und ein protestantischer Prinz das
Fürstentum regierte, seit 1803 seine Reichsunmittelbarkeit verloren.
Aber doch werden wir noch einen Begriff von der einstigen Bedeutung
dieses kirchlichen Mittelpunktes empfinden, wenn wir den wuchtigen
spätromanischen Bau des Domes und die schönen gotischen Gotteshäuser,
die Johannis-, Marien- und Katharinenkirche, betrachten. Anderseits
zeugen das stattliche spätgotische Rathaus nebst der Ratswage (Abb. 93)
und die hübschen Wohnhäuser aus dem sechzehnten Jahrhundert von dem
stolzen, tüchtigen Bürgersinn, der aus Osnabrück das gemacht hat, was
es ist, und der auch bis jetzt nicht geschwunden ist.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 113. Die Externsteine. (Zu Seite 118.)]




~XIII.~ Osning, Teutoburger Wald und Egge.


[Sidenote: Teutoburger Wald.]

Das 100 ~km~ lange, schmale Gebirge, das mit dem niedrigen Huckberg
unfern der Ems beginnt und bei Horn in Lippe in dem Velmerstot gipfelt
und endet, hat im Mittelalter den Namen Osning, auch Osnegge, geführt;
diese Bezeichnung umfaßte zugleich den südlich anschließenden Zug vom
Velmerstot bis zum Diemeltale, der heute kurzweg Egge genannt wird.
Egge, hochdeutsch Ecke, bedeutet soviel wie Schneide, enthält also eine
ähnliche Bildvorstellung wie der Ausdruck Kamm. Asen-Egge ist also
der Götter-Bergkamm. Jetzt wird der Name Osning besonders der Strecke
von Örlinghausen bis Osnabrück beigelegt. Der aus Tacitus' Annalen
stammende Name Teutoburger Wald wurde erst im neunzehnten Jahrhundert,
nach den Befreiungskriegen, auf unser Gebirge, und zwar zunächst
auf den sogenannten Lippischen Wald bezogen, seitdem der Detmolder
Archivrat Clostermeier unter Hinweis auf die alte Befestigung der
Grotenburg und auf deren mittelalterlichen Namen Teut den Nachweis zu
führen versucht hatte, daß dort der Ort der Varusschlacht sei.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 114. Die Kreuzabnahme, Hochrelief an den
Externsteinen. (Zu Seite 118.)]

Ohne auf die geologische Erklärung des Gebirges (s. Seite 12 ff.)
zurückzugreifen, möchte ich nur daran erinnern, daß wir es mit mehreren
-- zwei oder auch stellenweise drei -- parallelen Ketten zu tun haben.
Dazwischen ziehen sich schmale Längstäler hin. Aber auch an Quertälern
fehlt es nicht, die in der Regel bis auf den Grund des Gebirges
hinabgehen. Zu ihnen gehört die Brochterbecker Schlucht, durch welche
die Eisenbahn Ibbenbüren-Gütersloh hindurchgeht, ferner die Pässe von
Iburg, Borgholzhausen und Bielefeld, die Dörenschlucht und mehrere
kleinere Einschnitte.

Sehen wir von den inselartig aus der Diluvialdecke des Flachlandes
links der Ems auftauchenden Hügeln ab, so haben wir das nordwestliche
Ende des Osnings bei Bevergern am Dortmund-Ems-Kanal zu suchen.

Die Reise über diesen Bergzug aber werden wir am zweckmäßigsten in
Ibbenbüren beginnen. Der Ort (5500 Einwohner), die Hauptstadt der
ehemaligen Grafschaft Ober-Lingen, liegt nicht unmittelbar am Osning,
sondern am Fuße des nördlich vorgelagerten Schafberg-Plateaus, das uns
insofern interessiert, als es neben dem Hüggel und dem Piesberg bei
Osnabrück allein in unserem Gebiete die paläozoischen Formationen, und
zwar das obere Karbon, vertritt. Es liegen dort sieben abbauwürdige
Flöze, die von etwa 800 Bergleuten meist für Rechnung des Staates
ausgebeutet werden.

[Sidenote: Osning-Wanderung.]

Eine Kammwanderung von Ibbenbüren zunächst bis Bielefeld erfordert drei
bis vier Tage. Ihre Reize bestehen hauptsächlich darin, daß von den
geologisch verschiedenen Parallelketten bald die eine, bald die andere
die Führung übernimmt. Folgen wir stets der höchsten, so genießen wir
immer wieder wechselnde Landschafts- und Vegetationsbilder. Anfangs
schreiten wir auf der Sandsteinkette dahin. Sie hat hier trotz ihrer
geringen Höhe etwas Ernstes, Starres. Ihre Flora ist noch ganz die
der benachbarten Heide; Birke und Kiefer bilden den spärlichen Wald,
Hülse und Wacholder ein niederes Buschwerk, und Heidekraut und
Preißelbeere bedecken den Boden. Nur vereinzelt ragen nackte Felsen
aus dem sonst abgerundeten Rücken hervor und bringen es uns zum
Bewußtsein, daß wir nicht mehr auf Dünen oder auf den Geschieben der
Eiszeit dahinschreiten. Unter jenen Steingebilden sind die Dörenther
Klippen wegen ihrer grotesken Formen berühmt. Ungehindert aber schweift
der Blick über die flacheren Landstriche im Norden und Süden und
besonders hier weit hinein in die Münstersche Tieflandsbucht. Von
Tecklenburg ab werden wir dagegen auf den buchenbedeckten Plänerhöhen
wandern, die uns nur hie und da einen Ausblick aus dem Waldesschatten
erlauben, dafür aber auch zuweilen einen recht lohnenden, wie der
Große Freden (210 ~m~) bei Iburg. Hier umfaßt das Auge einen weiten
Horizont waldiger Höhen. Es sind außer der parallelen Sandsteinkette
noch einige besondere Gruppen, die im Norden vorgelagert sind. Unter
ihnen überragt der viel besuchte, wuchtige Dörenberg (331 ~m~),
zwischen Iburg und Georgsmarienhütte gelegen, den Osningzug selbst um
ein beträchtliches. Nach einer längeren Wanderung durch einförmiges
Stangengehölz, das bei Borgholzhausen endigt, haben wir zwischen dem
Ravensberg und Halle die Wahl, ob wir auf der Südkette im Buchenwalde
oder auf der Nordkette über kahle Sandsteinhöhen dahinschreiten wollen.
Von Halle ab bilden die letzteren unbestritten den Hauptkamm. Äußerst
lohnend ist ein Spaziergang über diesen an sich öden Rücken bei kühlem
Herbstwetter, wenn der scharfe Südwestwind uns am Lodenmantel zaust,
und wenn zwischen den jagenden Wolken immer neue Landschaftsbilder mit
stets wechselnden Beleuchtungen in den beiden so grundverschiedenen
Landschaften, dem fruchtbaren Ravensberger Hügellande und der sandigen
Münsterbucht, vor unseren Blicken auftauchen. Freilich den würdigen
Abschluß erhalten diese Genüsse erst, wenn wir vom Dreikaiserturm,
den man in die alte Hünenburg (s. Seite 57) eingebaut hat, oder vom
Schützenhaus auf dem Johannisberge auf das freundliche Bielefeld zu
unseren Füßen hinabschauen.

[Illustration: Abb. 115. Lemgo. Nach einer Photographie von Clemens
Bolzau in Lemgo. (Zu Seite 121.)]

Vergessen wir aber nicht, unterwegs den interessanten menschlichen
Siedelungen gebührende Beachtung zu schenken. Da sind zunächst die drei
stolzen Hochburgen zu nennen, die der Sage nach einst ein mächtiger
Sachsenfürst aus Wittekinds Geblüte für seine Töchter Thekla, Ida und
Ravenna erbaut hat. Tecklenburg, Iburg, Ravensberg. Von der Feste
Tecklenburg, deren fehdelustige Insassen über einen ausgedehnten
Länderbesitz verfügten, stehen nur noch die Ringmauern. Im Jahre 1701
starben die Grafen aus, und ihr Schloß gab man dem Verfalle preis.
Wohl aber liegt das malerische Städtchen (1000 Einwohner), das einst
im Schutze der Burg entstand, noch heute auf seiner luftigen Höhe
(200 ~m~) und lockt durch die Reize seiner Lage zahlreiche Ausflügler
herbei (Abb. 94).

Der gleichen Gunst erfreut sich Iburg (900 Einwohner), dessen Burg
auf einem 142 ~m~ hohen Einzelhügel einen wichtigen Paß beherrscht.
In dem Benediktinerkloster, das die Osnabrücker Bischöfe im Jahre
1070 hier gründeten, haben sie sechs Jahrhunderte hindurch ihre
Residenz gehabt und damit wohl ebensosehr ihren strategischen Blick
wie ein tiefes Verständnis für die landschaftlichen Reize dieses
Fleckchens Erde bewiesen. Von den ursprünglichen Gebäuden ist infolge
wiederholter großer Brände nicht viel auf unsere Tage gekommen, und
die Ersatzbauten, die jetzt die Spitze des Hügels krönen -- sie dienen
zu Verwaltungszwecken -- wirken im Landschaftsbilde weniger durch
künstlerische Formen als durch ihre imponierende Massigkeit und ihre
bevorzugte Lage (Abb. 95).

Trauriger noch waren die Geschicke der Burg Ravensberg (Abb. 96, 97
u. 99). Wohl ragt noch der gewaltige alte Bergfried und bietet uns
ein köstliches Luginsland. An ihn aber lehnt sich eine bescheidene
Försterwohnung anstatt des Schlosses, das im Jahre 1673 von dem
Bischof von Münster, Bernhard von Galen, zusammengeschossen worden
ist. Eine Stadt schließt sich an den Ravensberg nicht unmittelbar an.
Borgholzhausen (1300 Einwohner) liegt eine halbe Stunde nördlich,
Werther (2100 Einwohner) mehr östlich und das saubere, altertümliche
Halle (1800 Einwohner) etwas weiter südlich (Abb. 98 u. 99).
Erwähnenswert ist, daß hier wie in dem an derselben Bahnstrecke
Osnabrück-Bielefeld liegenden Dissen (2000 Einwohner) die Herstellung
feiner Fleischwaren fabrikmäßig betrieben wird. Man ist darin uralten
westfälischen Überlieferungen treu geblieben. Denn es ist bekannt, daß
Westfalen schon seit dem elften Jahrhundert seine Schinken und Würste
weithin versandte, und daß sich in Cöln, Frankfurt und Mainz Markt-
und Stapelplätze für diesen wohlschmeckenden Handelsartikel befanden
(Abb. 100).

[Sidenote: Bielefeld.]

Bielefeld (72000 Einwohner), der Hauptort der Grafschaft Ravensberg,
die durch Erbschaft 1346 an Jülich, 1514 an Cleve und 1609 endlich
an Brandenburg fiel, wird im Anfang des elften Jahrhunderts zuerst
erwähnt (Abb. 101 bis 104). Es verdankt einerseits seine Entstehung
der wichtigen alten Straße vom Rhein zur Weser, die wie auch jetzt
die Cöln-Mindener Bahn das Gebirge hier in einem bequemen Passe
durchschneidet, anderseits seine Stellung als Hauptstadt dem
schützenden Bergneste Sparenberg, das, geschmackvoll ausgebaut, noch
jetzt das reizende Stadtbild wirksam belebt. Dort steht auch das
Standbild des Großen Kurfürsten inmitten der von ihm oft und gern
bewohnten Baulichkeiten, aus deren Fenstern er auf sein geliebtes
»Spinn- und Linnenländchen« herabzuschauen liebte. Das Leinengewerbe,
dem auch er seine Förderung durch Anlage von staatlichen Leggen
angedeihen ließ, hat recht eigentlich den Weltruf Bielefelds
begründet. Mindestens seit dem sechzehnten Jahrhundert ist das
Spinnen und Weben von Flachs im Ravensbergischen heimisch. Wie diese
Beschäftigung aus den bescheidenen Anfängen eines landwirtschaftlichen
Nebengewerbes herangewachsen ist, wie sie sich aus einem ländlichen
zu einem städtischen Gewerbe, vom Handwerk zur Fabrikation
exportfähiger Ware entwickelte, wie sie nach schweren Krisen der
allgemeinen wirtschaftlichen Verhältnisse und der besonderen ihres
Produktionszweiges durch Anpassung an die veränderten Umstände zu neuer
Blüte hinaufstieg, ist hier nicht der Ort zu erzählen. Erwähnt mag nur
werden, daß die erdrückende Konkurrenz der Baumwolle und der Maschine
um die Mitte des neunzehnten Jahrhunderts glücklich überwunden wurde
durch Anlage mechanischer Spinnereien und Webereien. Gegenwärtig sind
die Ravensberger Spinnerei und die Bielefelder mechanische Weberei die
größten Werke ihrer Art in ganz Deutschland. Aber mit ihnen wetteifern
am Orte zahlreiche andere Firmen, die auch verwandte Gewerbe, u. a.
Seiden- und Plüschweberei und vor allem die Wäschefabrikation und die
Konfektion betreiben. Für diese letzteren Betriebe war die Herstellung
von Nähmaschinen zunächst ein Hilfsgewerbe. Doch bildete es den
Übergang zur Metallindustrie, die jetzt in Fahrrad-, Automobil-,
Maschinen- und anderen Fabriken bereits ein größeres Arbeiterheer
beschäftigt als die Gewebeindustrie. Von der Blüte des modernen
Bielefeld legt der stattliche Rathaus- und Theaterbau von 1903 ein
beredtes Zeugnis ab (Abb. 104).

[Illustration: §. Abb. 116. Marktplatz in Lemgo. (Zu Seite 121.)]

[Sidenote: Bielefelds Umgebung.]

Zum Einflußbereiche der Stadt gehören auch die neuerdings zu
beträchtlicher Größe angewachsenen Nachbardörfer, von denen u. a.
Schildesche mit altem, berühmtem Kloster 7700, Brackwede 9600 Einwohner
zählen. Bei letzterem Orte liegen auch die großartigen Krankenanstalten
von Bethel, die, im Jahre 1866 aus den Liebesgaben christlicher
Freunde gegründet, sich unter der Leitung des unermüdlichen Pastors v.
Bodelschwingh zu nie geahnter Ausdehnung entwickelt haben (Abb. 101 im
Vordergrunde). Die ganze Siedelung zählt etwa 5000 Seelen, darunter
4000 Kranke, meist Epileptiker, und arbeitet mit einem jährlichen
Budget von drei Millionen Mark. Um dies zu verstehen, dürfen wir
nicht vergessen, daß die Grafschaft Ravensberg von jeher ein Land
äußerst regen religiösen Lebens gewesen ist, wie auch die großartige
Missionstätigkeit daselbst beweist.

[Sidenote: Herford.]

Die zweitgrößte Stadt Ravensbergs ist Herford (28900 Einwohner), am
Einfluß der Aa in die Werre gelegen. Im frühen Mittelalter wegen
seines hochberühmten, bis 1803 sogar reichsunmittelbaren Stiftes der
Nachbarstadt Bielefeld weit überlegen, hat das »heilige Herford« in
wirtschaftlicher Entwicklung nicht völlig gleichen Schritt halten
können. Immerhin sind seine Spinnereien, seine Möbel- und seine
Zigarrenfabriken von Bedeutung; die alten Kirchen und Bürgerhäuser
erfreuen noch heute den Kunstfreund. Wie Herford, so birgt auch der
auf Seite 39 erwähnte Flecken Enger Erinnerungen an den Sachsenherzog
Wittekind, dessen schönes, allerdings späteren Zeiten entstammendes
Grabdenkmal sich in dem ehrwürdigen Kirchlein des Ortes befindet
(Abb. 105).

[Sidenote: Lippischer Wald.]

Die weitere Bergwanderung vom Sparenberge nach Südost bietet uns
zunächst ähnliche Eindrücke wie vor Bielefeld. Bei dem hochgelegenen,
von Sommerfrischlern geschätzten Dorfe Örlinghausen überschreiten
wir die Grenze des Fürstentums Lippe; dahinter auf dem Tönsberge
besuchen wir die Reste des ehemaligen befestigten Sachsenlagers, das
in den Kriegen gegen Karl den Großen eine Rolle gespielt hat. Später
müssen wir vielfach tief durch den aus der benachbarten Senne in die
Schluchten des Gebirges hereingewehten Sand stapfen, bis wir an der
sogenannten Dörenschlucht den eigentlichen Lippischen Wald erreichen
(Abb. 8).

Hier sind wir an dem reizvollsten Stück des Gebirges angelangt. Die
Gliederung des Berggeländes ist mannigfaltiger, die Gipfel höher,
die Täler bedeutender geworden. Näher aneinander drängen sich die
verschiedenen Landschaftsformen. Frischer Buchenwald, hochstämmige
Fichtenbestände, lichte Parks stattlicher Eichen und echte Heide mit
Kiefern und Wacholderbüschen wechseln je nach der Beschaffenheit des
Untergrundes (Abb. 1 u. 106). Dabei werden die Forsten, die meist
Staatsgut sind, sorgfältig gepflegt und weisen in den eingehegten
Teilen einen stattlichen Wildstand auf. Noch anziehender aber wird die
Landschaft durch mächtige Felsen wie die Externsteine und durch hübsche
Wasserflächen wie die an ihrem Fuße aufgestaute Lichtheupte (Abb. 113)
und den Donoper Teich (Abb. 107).

[Sidenote: Detmold.]

Welcher aber von den vielbesuchten Orten ist der Glanzpunkt
des Gebirges? Ist es Berlebeck, das hübsche Dorf, das sich im
waldumschlossenen Talkessel bis in das Herz des Gebirges hineinzieht,
hier überragt von dem Schloßhügel der ehemaligen Falkenburg, dort
von dem modernen Pensionshause Johannaberg? (Abb. 7 u. 108). Ist es
Detmold, die schmucke Residenz mit dem ansehnlichen Renaissanceschloß,
mit den geräumigen Plätzen, sauberen Straßen, schattigen Gärten und
Spaziergängen und den zahlreichen freundlichen Landhäusern? Detmold
(13200 Einwohner) ist zwar ein uralter Ort -- denn schon im Jahre 783
besiegte Karl der Große die Sachsen bei Theotmalli, d. h. bei der
Volksgerichtsstätte --, aber in seiner heutigen Erscheinung ist es
durchaus modern (Abb. 12 u. 109). Residenz ist es seit 1511. Einzelne
Bestandteile des Fürstenschlosses gehen allerdings auf das fünfzehnte
Jahrhundert zurück; seine heutige Renaissancefassade aber gab ihm
der Umbau von 1557 (Abb. 110). Da die natürlichen wirtschaftlichen
Hilfsquellen Detmolds nicht groß sind, so mußte der Staat und der
Hof der Stadt geben, was sie zu dem bedeutendsten Platze des Landes
machte. So legte der prachtliebende Graf Friedrich Adolf um 1700 die
schönen Parks und Promenaden an, und so vermehrten spätere Zeiten
die öffentlichen Gebäude und Denkmäler, unter denen der niedliche
Donopbrunnen von Hölbe (Abb. 111) erwähnt werden mag.

[Sidenote: Hermannsdenkmal.]

Die eigentliche Sehenswürdigkeit von Detmold ist aber doch die
Grotenburg (388 ~m~) mit dem Hermannsdenkmal (Abb. 1 u. 112). Von
dem Großen Hünenring, der alten Befestigung, die früher den Gipfel
des Berges umzog, und in der Clostermeier und neuerdings Schuchhardt
die altgermanische Teutoburg erkennen wollen, ist nur wenig erhalten
(vergl. Seite 57). Mehr fällt dem Touristen die am Fuß des Berges
gelegene, wohl erst aus der sächsischen Zeit stammende Wegschanze
auf, die man den Kleinen Hünenring nennt. Das Denkmal Armins, das
die Kuppe des Berges noch um fast 54 ~m~ überragt, besteht aus einem
besteigbaren steinernen Rundtempel, der eine herrliche Umschau gewährt,
und der aus Kupfer geschmiedeten Kolossalfigur des Cheruskerhäuptlings
darüber. Es ist Ernst v. Bandels Lebenswerk, dessen Vollendung ihm erst
nach fünfzigjähriger Arbeit und nach einer schier endlosen Kette von
Enttäuschungen im Jahre 1875 gelungen ist.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 117. Erker mit Laube am Rathaus in Lemgo. (Zu
Seite 121.)]

[Sidenote: Die Externsteine.]

Wie diese Stätte ist noch eine andere durch Natur und Kunst in gleicher
Weise ausgezeichnet. Ich meine jene gewaltigen Sandsteinfelsen, die
am Nordfuß des Gebirges bei dem Städtchen Horn (1100 Einwohner)
gleich Riesensäulen phantastisch aus dem Boden emporsteigen und unter
dem Namen Externsteine bekannt sind (Abb. 113). Der eine der Felsen
birgt in seinem Inneren eine Kapelle nebst einigen Nebenräumen. Sie
ist im Jahre 1115 von einem Paderborner Bischof geweiht, und man
hat lange Zeit geglaubt, daß die Mönche des Klosters Abdinghof in
Paderborn, die im Jahre 1093 die Gegend käuflich erwarben, auch die
Schöpfer der Grotte seien. Demgegenüber weist Anton Kisa auf ein in
den Boden gemeißeltes Becken hin, das er nur aus der Benutzung bei
heidnischen Opfern glaubt erklären zu können. Ebenso sei die Anlage
einer zweiten Kapelle oben auf dem Nachbarfelsen nur in der Weise zu
deuten, daß dort ein heidnisches Heiligtum bestanden habe, an dessen
Stelle die Abdinghöfer, dem sonstigen Verfahren der Kirche getreu,
ein christliches gesetzt hätten. »Die Externsteine weisen demnach die
drei charakteristischen Merkmale altgermanischer Kultusstätten auf,
das Grottenheiligtum, das obere Heiligtum und den am Fuße des Felsens
vorbeifließenden Bach.« An dem Ufer dieses letzteren haben die Mönche
ein »heiliges Grab« angelegt. So war denn das Ganze zum Wallfahrtsorte
geworden. Aus dieser Bestimmung erklärt sich auch der merkwürdigste
Bestandteil der mittelalterlichen Anlage, das kolossale Hochrelief,
das in die Außenwand des Kapellenfelsens hineingearbeitet worden
ist, ein Werk einzig in seiner Art, das bedeutendste frühchristliche
Skulpturdenkmal Norddeutschlands überhaupt (Abb. 114). Da sehen wir
staunend die lebensgroßen Gestalten des Nikodemus und des Joseph von
Arimathia, wie sie den Heiland vom Kreuze heben; daneben stehen Maria
und der Evangelist Johannes. Gottvater aber schwebt darüber mit der
Siegesfahne und hält die Seele Jesu in Kindesgestalt auf dem Arme,
während Sonne und Mond mit Schleiern ihr Antlitz kummervoll verhüllen.
Darunter befindet sich noch eine stark verwitterte symbolische
Darstellung des Sündenfalles, ein kniendes Menschenpaar, in die
Windungen eines abenteuerlichen Drachen verstrickt.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 118. Fürstliches Schloß in Pyrmont. (Zu Seite
121.)]

[Sidenote: Egge.]

Der Lippische Wald endet mit dem 468 ~m~ hohen, aussichtreichen
Velmerstot. Da der südwärts gerichtete Zug der Egge, der allmählich
breiter und flacher wird, weniger landschaftliche Reize besitzt
und uns an ihm nur vereinzelte Siedelungen, wie der bedeutende
Eisenbahnknotenpunkt Altenbeken, das kleine Stahlbad Driburg (2700
Einwohner) unter der ehemaligen Sachsenfeste Iburg und das Dorf
Neuenheerse mit seiner romanischen Stiftskirche interessieren würden,
so nehmen wir hier auf der luftigen Höhe Abschied vom Teutoburger Walde
und überschauen das weit vor uns ausgebreitete Hügelland von Lippe,
Pyrmont und Südwestfalen, dem unsere letzte Reise gelten soll.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 119. Inneres der Kreuzkirche in Lügde. (Zu Seite
121.)]




~XIV.~ Zwischen Teutoburger Wald und Weser.


[Sidenote: Das Lippische Hügelland.]

Da wir in den letzten beiden Abschnitten den zusammenhängenden
Bergzügen gefolgt sind, haben wir ein interessantes Gebiet bisher fast
umgangen. Es ist das Hügelland zwischen Teutoburger Wald und Weser, das
sich von der Talfurche Bielefeld-Porta im Nordwesten bis zum Diemeltale
im Südosten hinzieht und durch die Emmer und die Nethe in das Lippische
Hügelland, das Höxtersche Höhenland und die Warburger Börde geteilt
wird. Wir haben es hier mit einem äußerst mannigfaltig gegliederten
Gelände zu tun, dessen Oberfläche hauptsächlich von den verschiedenen
Gesteinen des Keupers (Abb. 3), im Süden und Osten auch von Muschelkalk
gebildet wird, wogegen Buntsandstein nur an der Umrandung des Pyrmonter
und des Driburger Kessels zu finden ist. Im Süden zeigen sich auch
einzelne basaltische Durchbrüche. Einige Teile dieses Gebietes sind
nur als flachwellig zu bezeichnen, wie z. B. die Gegend an der unteren
Werre und Bega, das Dreieck zwischen Bielefeld, Herford und Lage, sowie
die Börde im Süden. Stattlichere Höhengruppen weist der Norden Lippes
zwischen Bega und Weser auf, wie den Bornstapel, die Lemgoer Mark, die
Sternberger Höhen, den Hohen Asch und den Taubenberg, deren zwischen
300 und 400 ~m~ hohe Gipfel wegen ihrer Fernsichten geschätzt sind.
Einen tiefen Talkessel mit schroffen, über 300 ~m~ hohen Rändern bietet
das Emmertal bei Pyrmont und Lügde, ein vermoortes Hochplateau der
Schwalenberger Wald (446 ~m~), den man auch als das Mörth bezeichnet,
eine einsame kegelförmige Hochwarte der Köterberg (497 ~m~), endlich
steilrandige Muschelkalkhöhen das Gelände längs der Weser und der
Nethe. An sogenannten landschaftlichen Sehenswürdigkeiten ist dieses
Gebiet verhältnismäßig arm, und da es auch in bezug auf die Bewaldung
den anderen Teilen unseres Gebietes nachsteht, locken nur wenige Punkte
einen größeren Touristenschwarm herbei. Das aber, was man als intimere
Reize einer Landschaft bezeichnet, wird der Wanderer, wenn er sich
Zeit läßt, in lauschigen Tälern, malerischen Dörfern und Gehöften,
interessanten Hausformen und Volkstypen in reichem Maße finden (Abb. 26
bis 29, 78 u. 122). Mit Recht singt daher der lippische Poet Stockmeyer:

    Voll Gottes Segen und voll Fleißes Frucht
    Ist unser Land, ein Land voll Lieblichkeiten,
    Wo Berg und Auen um den Vorrang streiten.
    Ja, welcher Wandrer hätte es besucht
    Und dächte nicht der freundlichen Gefilde
    In diesem frohen, lebenswarmen Bilde,
    Das Anmut, Reiz und Schönheit uns bereiten!

[Illustration: Abb. 120. Schwalenberg.

Verlag der Hinrichs'schen Hofbuchhandlung (H. Knöner) in Detmold. (Zu
Seite 122.)]

[Sidenote: Lemgo.]

Ihren Anfang mag unsere Reise von Salzuflen (5800 Einwohner) nehmen,
dem altertümlichen Salinenstädtchen mit dem kleinen Solbade und
der weltberühmten Hoffmannschen Stärkefabrik, die an Größe auf
dem europäischen Festlande ihresgleichen nicht hat. Über Lage
(5500 Einwohner), wo sich die beiden Bahnen des Lipperlandes,
Bielefeld-Hameln und Herford-Altenbeken, kreuzen, geht es nach Lemgo
(9000 Einwohner), dem man mit freundlicher Übertreibung den Namen des
lippischen Nürnberg gegeben hat (Abb. 115 bis 117). Tatsächlich ist
es die älteste und vormals bedeutendste Stadt des Fürstentums. Welche
Rolle es in Altwestfalen spielte, ersehen wir aus dem Umstande, daß es
zur Taxe der Hansa mit weit höheren Beiträgen als Hameln und Bielefeld
herangezogen wurde. Von dem ehemaligen Wohlstande zeugen eine Menge
älterer Bürgerhäuser, deren spitze, straßenwärts gerichtete Giebel noch
das Formprinzip der Gotik verraten, während die in Holz oder Stein
geschnittenen Ornamente bereits dem Geschmack der Renaissance huldigen.
Die gleiche Stilmischung beobachten wir an dem neben den beiden
Hauptkirchen bedeutendsten Bauwerke Lemgos, dem herrlichen Rathause,
während das nahe Schloß Brake ein reiner Renaissancebau ist.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 121. Das Rathaus in Schwalenberg. (Zu Seite
122.)]

[Sidenote: Pyrmont.]

Der Vollständigkeit halber erwähnen wir noch die Städtchen Barntrup
(1700 Einwohner) und Blomberg (3600 Einwohner) mit ihren alten
Schlössern und wenden uns zu dem Bade Pyrmont (3900 Einwohner), das
den Hauptort einer waldeckischen Exklave, einer ehemals selbständigen
Grafschaft, bildet (Abb. 118). Die kohlensauren Stahl- und Solquellen
scheinen von alters her bekannt gewesen zu sein. Doch beginnt der
eigentliche Aufschwung erst mit dem sechzehnten Jahrhundert. Die
heilkräftigen Wasser und die liebliche Umgebung des Talkessels, dessen
Wände überall bis zu 200 ~m~ relativer Höhe emporsteigen, lockte
besonders die vornehme Welt, während das nicht allzuferne Bad Meinberg
immer einen etwas bescheideneren Besucherkreis hatte. Im siebzehnten
und achtzehnten Jahrhundert strömten Fürstlichkeiten und Adlige,
aber auch Künstler und Gelehrte aus ganz Europa in Pyrmont zusammen.
Merkwürdig mutet es uns an, daß in diesem Bade, das jetzt in erster
Linie bleichsüchtige Damen aufsuchen, Männer wie der Große Kurfürst,
Peter der Große, Friedrich der Große und Blücher den Eisengehalt ihres
Blutes glaubten verstärken zu sollen.

[Sidenote: Lügde.]

Das Emmertal ist uralter Kulturboden. Lügde (2700 Einwohner), das noch
jetzt ein ausgezeichnetes romanisches Kirchlein (Abb. 119) besitzt,
ist eine alte karolingische »~villa~«, Schieder, unterhalb der
altsächsischen Skidroburg gelegen, der zugehörige Reichshof, in dem
Karl der Große vermutlich im Jahre 784 das Weihnachtsfest gefeiert hat.

[Sidenote: Schwalenberg.]

Bis in die Karolingerzeit reicht auch die Geschichte Schwalenbergs
oder wenigstens seines Grafengeschlechtes zurück. Das Gebiet dieses
Herrscherhauses war im Mittelalter weit ausgedehnt; es reichte von
der Diemel bis zum Deister; die Herrschaften Waldeck, Pyrmont und
Sternberg sind nur spätere Abzweigungen seines Besitzes, die Klöster
Marienmünster und Falkenhagen, deren edle Baulichkeiten uns noch heute
erfreuen, seine Gründungen. Wie das zuletzt genannte Stift und das
Schloß Sternberg, das auf waldiger Höhe unweit Lemgos das Begatal
überragt, wurde auch die Burg und die Stadt Schwalenberg (Abb. 120) von
dem Grafen Volkwin ~III.~ erbaut, der seinen Wohnsitz von der früheren
Burg Schwalenberg, später Oldenburg genannt, dorthin verlegte. Von dem
damaligen Schloßbau steht nur noch ein schmuckloser Flügel auf einem
Bergkegel am Fuße des Mörths; um diesen Hügel aber schmiegt sich noch
jetzt das Städtchen (800 Einwohner), dessen geschmackvoll ausgebautes
Rathaus von 1579, 1603 und 1909 eine Perle deutscher Holzarchitektur
ist (Abb. 121).

[Sidenote: Die Ziegler.]

Obgleich wir nunmehr an der Ostgrenze des Lipperlandes angelangt sind,
können wir es nicht verlassen, ohne eines für das ganze Fürstentum
höchst charakteristischen Gewerbes, der Ziegelei, zu gedenken. Dieser
Arbeitszweig ist, wie es scheint, nicht sehr alt, hat sich vielmehr
wohl erst nach dem Dreißigjährigen Kriege ausgebildet. Ungenügender
Verdienst in der Heimat veranlaßte damals viele Männer, als Grasmäher
und Torfstecher nach Holland und Friesland zu gehen. Im Jahre 1682 wird
aber neben dieser Auslandsarbeit auch das Ziegelstreichen erwähnt.
Auf die beweglichen Klagen der »gehorsamen Stände und Ritterschaft«
wegen der Leutenot in der Landwirtschaft erließ der Landesherr eine
Verordnung, in der es heißt: »wobei wir auch denenjenigen, welche sich
bishero zu gewisser Zeit des Auslaufens in fremde Länder angemaßet,
daselbst Ziegelarbeit sich zu bedienen, solche ihre bisherige
Gewohnheit, und zwar einem jeden bei Strafe 50 Goldfl. alles Ernstes
verbieten.« Aber Verbote und Plackereien halfen nicht viel. Die Zahl
der Ziegler wuchs, und zwar besonders 1842 nach dem Brande Hamburgs,
1846 nach der mehrfach erwähnten Leinenkrisis, die dem Gewerbe viele
ehemalige Weber zuführte, und 1871 nach dem Kriege. Jetzt dürfte ihre
Zahl etwa 15000 betragen, d. h. über 10% der gesamten Bevölkerung.

[Illustration: §. Abb. 122. Lippischer Hirtenjunge. (Zu Seite 122.)]

Die Ziegelmacherei ist Saisonarbeit. Sobald die ersten Lenzwinde wehen,
verlassen die sangesfrohen Scharen das Heimatland, kaum der Schule
entwachsene Knaben, rüstige Männer und bärtige Greise, um in allen
deutschen Gauen, ja selbst in Holland, Dänemark, Polen und Ungarn ihrem
Verdienst nachzugehen. Während der Arbeitsmonate lebt der Ziegler
äußerst einfach und mäßig. Erbsen und immer wieder Erbsen sind seine
tägliche Kost und dazu Wurst, Speck und Schinken aus dem heimischen
Vorrat. Denn das verdiente Bargeld muß der Gattin oder den alten Eltern
heimgebracht werden, die inzwischen mit Hilfe der Kinder mühselig den
Garten und das Stückchen Acker bestellt, für das Vieh, vor allem für
die zahlreichen Ziegen gesorgt und Haus und Hof in Ordnung gehalten
haben (Abb. 27 u. 122). Wehe dem, der sich zu unnützen Ausgaben hat
verleiten lassen und die erwarteten hundert Taler nicht abgeben kann!
Verachtung ist sein Lohn. Wie aber den wackeren Zieglern zumute ist,
wie schwer ihnen der Abschied von der schönen Heimat fällt, wie sie
sich auf die wohlverdiente Ruhe des Winters freuen, das erfahren
wir am besten aus den »Zieglerliedern«, den Gedichten, die Heinrich
Wienke in Brakelsiek bei Schieder, ein echter Ziegler und ein echter
Poet, nunmehr schon in vierter Auflage seinen Kameraden gewidmet hat
(Abb. 123). Da heißt es z. B. in dem »Abschiedstrost«:

    Reich' mir, lieb Weib, den Wanderstab,
    Er steht in jener Ecke,
    Und wenn ihn deine Hand mir gab,
    So reis' ich frisch und fröhlich ab,
    Du weißt, zu welchem Zwecke.

    »Zu welchem Zweck, das weiß ich ja,
    Doch, Schatz, ich kann dir's sagen,
    Es kränket meine Seel', fürwahr,
    Daß du für uns mußt alle Jahr
    Dich in der Ferne plagen.«

    O darum quäl' dich nicht so sehr,
    Bin ich's doch nicht alleine,
    Denn wandern müssen noch viel mehr.
    Gott führ' mich fröhlich wieder her,
    Und bleib' ich aus, dann weine.

[Illustration: Abb. 123. H. Wienke, Ziegler und Volksdichter in
Brakelsiek (Lippe). (Zu Seite 123.)]

[Sidenote: Im Nethegau.]

Aber auch wir werden von dem Land der roten Rose und damit von den
Weserbergen überhaupt, sowie von dem Teutoburger Walde Abschied
nehmen müssen. Die südlichen Teile unseres Hügellandes enthalten zwar
insbesondere im sogenannten Nethegau noch einige interessante Stätten,
wie z. B. die Edelsitze Rheder und Hinnenburg bei dem Städtchen Brakel
(3600 Einwohner) oder den hochgelegenen Flecken Dringenberg mit seiner
alten bischöflich paderbornischen Burg. Aber weder diese Orte noch das
freundliche Tal der Nethe selbst werden uns dauernd fesseln können. Wir
eilen wiederum der Weser zu und gelangen so zurück in die Gegenden,
von denen unsere Rundreise ihren Ausgang nahm. Sie ist vollendet. Wird
es die letzte Fahrt sein, die wir nach diesem lieblichen Landstriche
machen? Ich für mein Teil hoffe es nicht.

    Und tönen wieder die Gesänge
    Der Lerchen an des Himmels Blau,
    Dann lockt mich aus der dumpfen Enge
    Der liebe, alte Heimatgau:

    Das Wogen reicher Saatenfelder,
    Der fetten Wiesen üppig Grün,
    Das Quellenrauschen kühler Wälder,
    Der Hügel frisches Buchengrün,

    Des Stromes traulich klarer Spiegel,
    Des Fährmanns Hütte strohgedeckt,
    Des Dörfleins übermooste Ziegel
    In Apfelblüte fast versteckt;

    Es locken Mauern mich und Wälle
    Der weltentrückten kleinen Stadt,
    In schmalen Gäßchen manche Stelle,
    Die einst so gern mein Fuß betrat,

    Auch stolzer Burgen morsche Trümmer,
    Von Efeuranken überdeckt,
    Der Bergzug, der in blauem Schimmer
    Sich neblig in die Ferne streckt.

    Das alles lockt aus dumpfer Enge
    Mich in den lieben Heimatgau.
    Denn, horch! schon tönen die Gesänge
    Der Lerchen an des Himmels Blau.

[Illustration]




Literatur.


 A. Penck, Das Deutsche Reich (Länderkunde des Erdteils Europa,
 herausgegeben von A. Kirchhoff I, 1). Prag und Leipzig 1887.

 H. Guthe, Die Lande Braunschweig und Hannover, bearb. von A. Renner.
 Hannover 1888.

 J. Meyer, Die Provinz Hannover. Hannover 1888.

 E. Oehlmann, Landeskunde der Provinz Hannover und des Herzogtums
 Braunschweig. 3. Aufl. Breslau 1908.

 J. Wormstall, Landeskunde der Provinz Westfalen. 4. Aufl. Breslau 1907.

 J. B. Nordhoff, Altwestfalen. Münster 1898.

 L. Schücking und F. Freiligrath, Das malerische und romantische
 Westfalen. 4. Aufl. Paderborn 1898.

 H. Schwanold, Das Fürstentum Lippe. Detmold 1899.

 W. Wiegmann, Heimatkunde des Fürstentums Schaumburg-Lippe. Stadthagen
 1905.

 C. Heßler, Hessische Landes- und Volkskunde. Marburg 1904.

 H. Keller, Weser und Ems. Berlin 1901.

 E. Küster, Die deutschen Bundsandsteingebiete. Stuttgart 1881.

 M. Buesgen, Der deutsche Wald. Leipzig o. J.

 E. Wagner, Die Bevölkerungsdichte in Südhannover. Stuttgart 1903.

 W. Nedderich, Wirtschaftsgeographische Verhältnisse, Ansiedelungen und
 Bevölkerungsverteilung im ostfälischen Hügel- und Tieflande. Stuttgart
 1902.

 A. Meitzen, Der Boden u. die landw. Verhältnisse des preuß. Staates.
 Bd. ~V~. Berlin 1894.

 -- Siedelung und Agrarwesen der Westgermanen und Ostgermanen usw.
 Berlin 1895.

 Entwicklung und Tätigkeit des Landwirtschaftlichen Hauptvereins für
 das Fürstentum Osnabrück. Osnabrück 1896. (Aufsatz von C. B. Stüve.)

 Festschrift zur fünfzigjährigen Jubelfeier des Land- und
 Forstwirtschaftlichen Hauptvereins für den Reg.-Bez. Hannover.
 Hannover 1886.

 K. Rhamm, Dorf und Bauerschaft im altdeutschen Lande. Leipzig 1890.

 M. Sering, Die Vererbung des ländlichen Grundbesitzes. Bd. ~II~.
 Berlin 1900.

 H. Potthoff, Die Leinenleggen in der Grafschaft Ravensberg (15.
 Jahresbericht des historischen Vereins für die Grafschaft Ravensberg).
 Bielefeld 1901.

 ~Dr.~ Reese, Die geschichtliche Entwicklung der Bielefelder
 Leinenindustrie (11. Jahresbericht des hist. Ver. f. d. Grafsch.
 Ravensberg). Bielefeld 1897.

 A. Ebert, Geschichtliche Darstellung des Kohlenbergbaues im Fürstentum
 Calenberg (Zeitschr. d. hist. Ver. f. Niedersachsen). Hannover 1866.

 M. Staercke, Die lippischen Ziegler. Detmold 1901.

 Berichte der Handelskammern Göttingen, Hannover, Minden, Bielefeld und
 Osnabrück 1905 bis 1907.

 B. Uhl, Die Verkehrswege der Flußtäler um Münden. Hannover u. Leipzig
 1907.

 W. Peßler, Das altsächsische Bauernhaus in seiner geograph.
 Verbreitung. Braunschweig 1906.

 F. Jostes, Westfälisches Trachtenbuch. Bielefeld, Berlin und Leipzig
 1904.

 H. Jellinghaus, Zur Einteilung der niederdeutschen Mundarten. Kiel
 1874.

 C. Schuchhardt (vorher A. v. Oppermann), Atlas vorgeschichtlicher
 Befestigungen in Niedersachsen ~I~ bis ~VIII~. Hannover 1887 bis 1905.

 K. Rübel, Die Franken, ihr Eroberungs- und Siedelungssystem. Bielefeld
 u. Leipzig 1904.

 W. Lübke, Die mittelalterliche Kunst in Westfalen. Leipzig 1853.

 A. Kisa, Die Externsteine (Jahrb. d. Vereins v. Altertumsfreunden im
 Rheinl. Heft 94). Bonn 1893.

 A. Wurm, Osnabrück. 2. Aufl. Osnabrück 1906.

 H. E. und M. Marcard, Pyrmont und seine Umgebungen. Paderborn 1861.

 R. Francke, Geschichte der Stadt Carlshafen. 2. Aufl. Carlshafen 1899.

 Festschrift zur 650jährigen Jubelfeier Schwalenbergs. Hannover 1906.

 L. Puritz, Der hannoversche Tourist. 12. Aufl. Hannover 1907.

 E. Görges, Wegweiser durch das Weserbergland. 7. Aufl. Hameln 1902.

 H. Thorbecke, Der Teutoburger Wald. 10. Aufl. Detmold 1909.

 H. Aschenberg, Der Teutoburger Wald. Münster 1906.

Benutzt wurden noch die amtlichen Darstellungen der Kunst- und
Altertumsdenkmäler der verschiedenen Gebiete, soweit sie erschienen
sind, ferner eine große Zahl von Lokalführern und zahlreiche kleinere
Aufsätze in verschiedenen Zeitungen und Zeitschriften.




Verzeichnis der Abbildungen.


     Abb.                                                          Seite

       1. Das Hermannsdenkmal im Morgennebel                           2

       2. Das Verwerfungssystem entlang dem Egge-Gebirge zwischen
          Driburg und Willebadessen                                    6

       3. Die Keuperlandschaft bei Aerzen, südwestlich von Hameln      8

       4. Profil durch Weserkette und Bückeberge                       9

       5. Blick vom Deister über das Tal von Springe zum Saupark
          und Nesselberg                                              10

       6. Der Deister-Saupark-Sattel                                  10

       7. Das Längstal der Cenomanmergel bei Berlebeck im
          Teutoburger Walde                                           11

       8. Dünenlandschaft im Lippischen Walde                         12

       9. Südrand der Dünenbildungen am Teutoburger Walde             13

      10. Schematisches Profil des Osnings                            14

      11. Die Hebungslinien des Teutoburger Waldes                    14

      12. Der Teutoburger Wald bei Detmold                            15

      13. Kohlensäuresprudel bei Herste                               16

      14. Profil durch Falkenhagener Liasgraben und Köterberg         16

      15. Das Wiehengebirge als Schichtstufe auf dem Nordflügel
          des Osning-Sattels                                          17

      16. Buchenhochwald am Blümer Berg bei Münden                    20

      17. Eibenruine bei Freudental unweit Münden                     21

  §.  18. Der Meiler ist »holtrei«. Aus dem Solling                   22

  §.  19. Köhlerhütte im Vogler                                       23

  §.  20. Köhler im Solling auf dem brennenden Meiler                 24

  §.  21. Köhler im Solling beim Verpacken fertiger Kohlen            24

      22. Sattelmeierhof Nordhof bei Enger                            25

  §.  23. Fränkisches Gehöft in Niederscheden bei Münden              26

      24. Hof in Kalkriese bei Engter (Osnabrück)                     27

  §.  25. Diele in Sudenfeld, Kreis Iburg                             28

  §.  26. Gehöft in Linnenbecke bei Vlotho                            29

  §.  27. Diele eines lippischen Zieglerhauses in Heidelbeck          30

  §.  28. Gasthaus in Volksen bei Rinteln                             31

  §.  29. Motiv aus Exten bei Rinteln                                 32

      30. Bauernfamilie aus Meinsen bei Bückeburg. Älterer Typus      33

      31. Bauermädchen aus der Gegend von Nenndorf                    33

      32. Schulmädchen aus Eisbergen (Kreis Minden) auf dem
          Kirchgang                                                   34

  §.  33. Bauernmädchen aus Uffeln bei Vlotho                         35

      34. Bauersfrau aus Hahlen bei Minden                            36

      35. Bauer aus Hahlen bei Minden                                 36

      36. Münden und das Fuldatal                                     37

      37. Das Rathaus in Münden                                       38

  §.  38. Der Marktplatz in Münden                                    39

  §.  39. Die Vorstadt Blume in Münden                                39

      40. Bursfelde                                                   40

  §.  41. Klosterkirche in Bursfelde                                  41

  §.  42. Hugenotten aus Gewissenruh                                  42

      43. Carlshafen vom Diemeltal aus gesehen                        42

      44. Helmarshausen und die Krukenburg gegen den Solling          43

  §.  45. Basaltbruch am Hohen Hagen                                  44

  §.  46. Trendelburg an der Diemel                                   45

      47. Hirschfütterung im Reinhardswald                            45

      48. Das Rathaus in Einbeck                                      46

      49. Eickesches Haus in Einbeck                                  47

      50. Bremer Straße bei Beverungen                                48

  §.  51. Zwei Fährleute, Vater und Sohn, aus Wehrden                 48

  §.  52.  Fürstenberg                                                49

  §.  53.  Corvey                                                     50

      54. Eingang zur Abtei Corvey                                    50

      55. Höxter, vom Felsenkeller aus gesehen                        51

  §.  56. Schloß  Bevern                                              52

      57. Schichtung der Muschelkalk-Formation bei Bodenwerder        53

      58. Polle                                                       54

      59. Die Steinmühle                                              54

      60. Bodenwerder                                                 55

      61. Schloß  Hehlen                                              56

      62. Straße in Eschershausen                                     57

      63. Adam und Eva am Ith                                         58

  §.  64. Am Rotenstein bei Eschershausen                             59

  §.  65. Lauenstein                                                  60

      66. Bückeburg                                                   61

      67. Saukörnung am Kleinen Deister bei Springe                   62

      68. Die lutherische Kirche in Bückeburg                         63

      69. Das neue Rathaus in Bückeburg                               64

      70. Hameln gegen den Süntel                                     65

      71. Das Rattenfängerhaus in Hameln                              66

  §.  72. Schloß Hämelschenburg bei Hameln                            67

      73. Kapelle beim Armenhaus Wangelist (Hameln)                   68

      74. Rinteln gegen den Taubenberg                                69

  §.  75. Blick von der Bückeburger Chaussee in das Tal von Rinteln   70

  §.  76. Dankerser Mühle bei Rinteln                                 71

      77. Vlotho gegen den Amthausberg und das Wiehengebirge          72

  §.  78. Exten bei Rinteln                                           73

  §.  79. Schloß Varenholz                                            75

      80. Möllenbeck gegen die Weserkette (Papenbrink, Lange Wand,
          Luhdener Klippe)                                            77

      81. Süntelbuche auf der Schafweide bei Hülsede                  78

  §.  82. Der Hohenstein gegen den Süntel                             79

  §.  83. Turm der Schaumburg gegen die Paschenburg                   80

  §.  84. Die Arensburg                                               81

  §.  85. Die Weserkette bei Rinteln (Lange Wand, Luhdener Klippe)    82

  §.  86. Porta Westfalica von Süden                                  83

      87. Das Kaiser Wilhelm-Denkmal an der Porta Westfalica          84

      88. Minden                                                      85

      89. Inneres des Doms zu Minden                                  86

  §.  90. Bergkirchen auf dem Wiehengebirge                           87

      91. Königl. Kurhaus in Bad Oeynhausen                           88

      92. Osnabrück vom Gertrudenberge aus gesehen                    89

      93. Der Markt in Osnabrück                                      90

  §.  94. Tecklenburg                                                 91

      95. Schloß Iburg                                                92

      96. Burg Ravensberg im Jahre 1839                               93

      97. Burg Ravensberg                                             93

      98. Straße in Halle i. W.                                       94

      99. Kette des Teutoburger Waldes bei Halle mit Blick auf den
          Ravensberg                                                  95

     100. Idyll aus Amshausen bei Halle i. W.                         96

     101. Blick auf Bielefeld                                         97

     102. Burg Sparenberg (Bielefeld) vom Johannisberg aus gesehen    98

     103. Haus in der Oberntorstraße in Bielefeld                     99

     104. Rathaus und Theater in Bielefeld                           100

     105. Grabmal Wittekinds in der Kirche zu Enger                  101

     106. Waldchaussee von Detmold zum Jagdschloß Lopshorn           102

     107. Donoper Teich bei Detmold                                  103

  §. 108. Berlebeck                                                  104

     109. Detmold gegen das Hermannsdenkmal                          105

  §. 110. Das Fürstliche Schloß in Detmold                           106

  §. 111. Donopbrunnen in Detmold                                    107

     112. Das Hermannsdenkmal                                        109

  §. 113. Die Externsteine                                           110

  §. 114. Die Kreuzabnahme, Hochrelief an den Externsteinen          111

     115. Lemgo                                                      113

  §. 116. Marktplatz in Lemgo                                        115

  §. 117. Erker mit Laube am Rathaus in Lemgo                        117

  §. 118. Fürstliches Schloß im Pyrmont                              118

  §. 119. Inneres der Kreuzkirche in Lügde                           119

     120. Schwalenberg                                               110

  §. 121. Das Rathaus in Schwalenberg                                121

  §. 122. Lippischer Hirtenjunge                                     122

     123. F. Wienke, Ziegler und Volksdichter in Brakelsiek (Lippe)  123

Die mit §. gekennzeichneten Abbildungen sind photographische Aufnahmen
des Verfassers.

[Illustration]




Register.


  Aa 115.

  Aale 75.

  Adam und Eva 58 (Abb. 63). 86.

  Adelebsen 75. 76.

  Aerzen 8 (Abb. 3).

  Alfeld 35.

  Altenbeken 11. 22. 119.

  Altenteil 41.

  Alte Weser 25.

  Altschieder 58.

  Amelith 33.

  Amelungsenburg 57.

  Amelunxborn 77.

  Amshausen 96 (Abb. 100).

  Amthausberg 100.

  Anerbe 40.

  Angrivarier 56.

  Ansiedlungsformen 36.

  Anthrazitkohle 108.

  Arensburg 81 (Abb. 84). 102.

  Arminius 56.

  Aue, Bückeburger 5. 93.

  Aue, Rodenberger 26. 91.


  Babilönie 58.

  Bad Eilsen s. Eilsen.

  Bad Oeynhausen s. Oeynhausen.

  Barenberg 10.

  Barenburg 89.

  Barntrup 121.

  Barsinghausen 9. 90.

  Basaltbruch 44 (Abb. 45).

  Bauernhof 25 (Abb. 22) bis 32 (Abb. 29). 38. 40. 43. 45.

  Bauerschaften 43.

  Beberbeck 73.

  Bega 26. 119. 120. 122.

  Bennigsen 4.

  Bennigserburg 58. 90.

  Bentberg 18.

  Bergkirchen 87 (Abb. 90). 107.

  Besitzverhältnisse 35.

  Berlebeck 10. 11 (Abb. 7). 104 (Abb. 108). 116.

  Bethel 115.

  Bever 79.

  Beverbach 78. 82.

  Bevergern 5. 10. 112.

  Bevern 52 (Abb. 56). 82.

  Beverungen 79.

  Bevölkerung 33 (Abb. 30) bis 36 (Abb. 35).

  Bielefeld 10. 14. 15. 97 (Abb. 101) bis 100 (Abb. 104). 112. 114. 115.

  Bielefeld, Paß von 112.

  Bielstein 8. 12.

  Bifurkation 26.

  Bismarcksäule 103.

  Blankenau 79.

  Blankenrode 10.

  Blomberg 121.

  Blöße, Große 76.

  Bloße Zelle 11. 88.

  Blume 39 (Abb. 39).

  Blümer Berg 20 (Abb. 16). 68.

  Blutbach 102.

  Bodenfelde 34. 35. 70.

  Bodenwerder 7. 18. 53 (Abb. 57). 55 (Abb. 60). 78. 82. 83.

  Bölhorst 104.

  Bonenburg 7.

  Borgentreich 7.

  Borgholzhausen 10. 112. 114.

  Borgholzhausen, Paß von 112.

  Bornstapel 120.

  Brackwede 14. 115.

  Brakel 7. 18. 124.

  Brakelsiek 123.

  Bramburg (Berg) 12. 74.

  Bramburg (Ruine) 70.

  Bramsche 107.

  Bramwald 34. 68. 73.

  Braunkohle s. Kohlen.

  Braunschweig 62.

  Breitenstein 82.

  Bremer Böcke 96.

  Bremer Straße 48 (Abb. 50).

  Brevörde 83.

  Brinke 90.

  Brochterbecker Schlucht 112.

  Brukterer 56.

  Brunkensen 88.

  Brunsberg 80.

  Buche 31.

  Bückeberg 5. 9. 13. 91. 92.

  Bückeburg 9. 61 (Abb. 66). 63 (Abb. 68). 64 (Abb. 69). 93. 94.

  Bückeburger Aue 5. 93.

  Bückeburger Tracht 54. 55.

  Büffel 55.

  Bullen 96.

  Buke 11.

  Bükefaß 33.

  Bünde 108.

  Burgberg 82.

  Burgen 57.

  Bursfelde 40 (Abb. 40). 41 (Abb. 41). 70.

  Bursfelder Kongregation 70.


  Carlshafen 25. 26. 35. 42 (Abb. 43). 68. 70. 72. 75. 76.

  Chatten 56.

  Cherusker 56.

  Coppenbrügge 8. 18. 86. 87.

  Corvey 50 (Abb. 53 u. 54). 59. 62. 80.


  Dachtelfeld 102.

  Dampfschiffahrt 67.

  Dankerser Mühle 71 (Abb. 76).

  Dassel 62. 76.

  Deister 4. 5. 9. 10. 13. 19. 90. 92.

  Deister, Kleiner 90.

  Deisterpforte 90.

  Delliehausen 75.

  Delligsen 87.

  Desenberg 11.

  Detmold 10. 15 (Abb. 12). 59. 102 (Abb. 106). 103 (Abb. 107). 116.

  Diele 28 (Abb. 25). 30 (Abb. 27). 46.

  Dielmisser Felsen 8. 87.

  Diemel 26. 72. 74. 110.

  Diluviale Vereisung 12.

  Dissen 114.

  Dogger 8.

  Dohlensteinmühle 83.

  Dolmen 108.

  Donoper Teich 103 (Abb. 107). 116.

  Dörenberg 10. 108. 112.

  Dörenschlucht 112. 116.

  Dörenther Klippen 112.

  Dortmund-Ems-Kanal 112.

  Drakenberg 89.

  Dransberg 73.

  Dransfeld 73.

  Dransfelder Höhenland 5. 26. 73.

  Dreikaiserturm 112.

  Driburg 58. 119.

  Dringenberg 124.

  Duingen 87.

  Duinger Berg 18.

  Dünenlandschaft 12 (Abb. 8). 13 (Abb. 9).

  Durrbeke 22.

  Durilith 108.

  Dürre Holzminde 22.

  Dyas 7.


  Ebersberg 90.

  Ebersnacken 78.

  Egge-Gebirge 4. 5. 6 (Abb. 2). 11. 13. 20. 110. 119.

  Eibe 21 (Abb. 17). 28. 82.

  Eiche 31.

  Eichenberg 5.

  Eilsen 9. 93.

  Einbeck 8. 46 (Abb. 48). 47. (Abb. 49). 76.

  Einbeck-Markoldendorfer Becken 18.

  Einzelhof 43.

  Eisbergen 33. 34.

  Eiszeit (Vereisung) 12.

  Eißen 11.

  Elfas 5. 7. 18. 77.

  Else 26. 107.

  Elze 18. 89.

  Emmer 26. 82. 84. 94. 119.

  Emmertal 120. 121.

  Enger 39. 101 (Abb. 105). 115.

  Engern 57. 59.

  Erder 25. 99. 100.

  Eresburg 59.

  Erichsburg 76.

  Esch 43.

  Eschershausen 8. 57 (Abb. 62). 59. 86. 87.

  Espolde 76.

  Esse 72.

  Everstein 62. 82.

  Exten 32 (Abb. 29). 73 (Abb. 78). 100.

  Exter 26. 100.

  Externsteine 10. 110 (Abb. 113). 111 (Abb. 114). 116. 118.


  Fahrenberg 11.

  Falkenburg 116.

  Falkenhagen 17. 122.

  Feldrom 11.

  Fischbeck 99.

  Flurzwang 38.

  Forst, Domäne 24. 82.

  Forstbach 24. 77. 78.

  Forstkultur 30.

  Fort George 98.

  Fränkisches Haus 44.

  Fredelsloh 76.

  Freden 87.

  Freden, Großer 112.

  Friesat 55.

  Friewohle 76.

  Friller Tracht 55.

  Fulda 22. 37 (Abb. 36).

  Fürstenberg 49 (Abb. 52). 75. 79. 80.


  Gahrenberg 11. 73.

  Garnwindelstein 87.

  Gehöft s. Bauernhof.

  Gehrdener Berg 10.

  Geologie 5 ff.

  George, Fort 98.

  Georgs-Marien-Bergwerks- und Hüttenverein 108.

  Georgsmarienhütte 7. 108.

  Germanen 56.

  Gertrudenberg 110.

  Geschichte 56 ff.

  Gesmold 26.

  Gewissenruh 44. 70.

  Glene 86. 88.

  Gohfeld-Mennighüffen 106.

  Gottestreu 70.

  Gottsbüren 74.

  Grevenalveshagen 92.

  Grohnde 82. 83.

  Große Blöße 75.

  Großer Hünenring 116.

  Großer Freden 112.

  Groß-Freden 18.

  Großer Sohl 88.

  Grotenburg 10. 15 (Abb. 12).

  Grubenhagen 76.

  Grubenhagener Berge 5.

  Grünenplan 11. 84. 89.


  Hageltürme 64.

  Hagen, Hoher 12. 44 (Abb. 45). 73.

  Hagenohsen 84.

  Hahlen 25. 36.

  Halle 50. 94 (Abb. 98). 112. 114.

  Hallermund 62. 90.

  Hamel, Fl. 26. 94.

  Hameler Loch 94.

  Hameln 8. 12. 25. 35. 58. 65 (Abb. 70) bis 68 (Abb. 73). 94. 98. 99.

  Hämelschenburg 67 (Abb. 72). 98.

  Hammerslust 8.

  Hannover, Prov. 62.

  Hardegsen 76.

  Harrl 9. 93. 94.

  Hartröhren 26.

  Hase 26. 106. 107.

  Hasselburg 18.

  Hastenbeck 84.

  Hausberge 25. 104.

  Hausformen 44.

  Hausindustrie 106.

  Hedemünden 24.

  Hehlen 56 (Abb. 61). 83.

  Heimberg 11.

  Heinrichshagen 78.

  Heisterberg 19.

  Heisterburg 58. 90.

  Helmarshausen 43 (Abb. 44). 72.

  Hemeln 70.

  Hemmendorf 92.

  Herbram 11.

  Herford 59. 62. 106. 115.

  Herlingsburg 58.

  Hermannsborn 15.

  Hermannsdenkmal 2 (Abb. 1). 15 (Abb. 12). 105 (Abb. 109).
    109 (Abb. 112). 116.

  Herrmannsberg 8.

  Herste 15.

  Herstelle 24. 59. 68. 72. 78.

  Hessendorf 44.

  Hessen-Nassau 62.

  Hessischer Typus 55.

  Hessisch-Oldendorf 57. 99.

  Hetha 80.

  Heuerlinge 36.

  Hildesheim (Bistum) 62.

  Hille 46.

  Hils 5. 10. 12. 13. 18. 20. 26. 84. 87. 88.

  Hilwartshausen 70.

  Hinterhang 96.

  Hochmoore 75.

  Hof s. Bauernhof.

  Hohenbüchen 88.

  Hohenstein 8. 79 (Abb. 82). 102.

  Hoher Asch 120.

  Hoher Hagen 12. 44 (Abb. 45). 73.

  Holter Sattel 16.

  Holzindustrie 35.

  Holzkohle 33.

  Holzminde 75. 78.

  Holzminden 18. 81.

  Holzmühle 90.

  Homburg, Geb. 5. 7. 18. 76. 77.

  Homburg, Ort 62.

  Hooptal 77.

  Horn 10. 110. 118.

  Höxter 18. 51 (Abb. 55). 62. 80. 81. 103.

  Höxtersches Höhenland 5. 79. 119.

  Huckberg 110.

  Hugenotten 42 (Abb. 42).

  Hüggel 7. 108. 112.

  Hülsede 78 (Abb. 81).

  Humme 26. 84. 94.

  Hünenburg 10. 112.

  Hünenring 116.

  Hunte 26.

  Hüssenberg 11.


  Ibbenbüren 62. 108. 112.

  Ibbenbürener Bergplatte 7.

  Iburg b. Driburg 58. 119.

  Iburg b. Osnabrück 10. 91. 92 (Abb. 95). 112. 114.

  Iburg, Paß von 112.

  Idistavisus 57. 102.

  Idtberg 11.

  Ilme 75. 76.

  Inseln 25.

  Ith 7. 8. 12. 13. 18. 20. 58 (Abb. 63). 84. 86.


  Jakobsberg 103.

  Jakobsklippe 103.

  Johannaberg 116.

  Johannisberg 112.

  Jura 8.


  Kahnstein 8. 12. 18. 87.

  Kaierde 11. 35.

  Kaiser Wilhelm-Denkmal 84 (Abb. 87). 104.

  Kali 75.

  Kalkriese 27 (Abb. 24).

  Kammersteine 87.

  Kämpe 28. 43.

  Karlsschanze 58.

  Karlssteine 108.

  Kathrinhagen 92.

  Kaufunger Wald 4.

  Kelten 56.

  Kemnade 83.

  Kiffing 68.

  Kirchohsen 84.

  Kleine Porta 100.

  Kleiner Deister 5. 90.

  Kleiner Hünenring 116.

  Klima 19 ff.

  Klümpse 74.

  Klus 9.

  Klüt 8. 98.

  Kohlenbergbau 75. 90. 91. 92.

  Kohlenbrennerei 34.

  Kohlenmeiler 22 (Abb. 18). 24 (Abb. 20 u. 21).

  Kohlensandstein 108.

  Kohlensäuresprudel 16 (Abb. 13).

  Köhlerhütte 23 (Abb. 19).

  Königstunde 39.

  Königszinne 55 (Abb. 60). 78.

  Köterberg 8. 16 (Abb. 14). 20. 120.

  Kralle 55.

  Krebshagen 92.

  Kreideformation 9.

  Krukenburg 43 (Abb. 44). 72.

  Külf 18.


  Lachsfang 96.

  Lage 120.

  Landgrafenküche 89.

  Lange Wand 77 (Abb. 80). 82 (Abb. 85).

  Laten 38.

  Lauenförde 35. 79.

  Lauenstein 60 (Abb. 65). 87.

  Leggen (Bleichen) 114.

  Leibzucht 41.

  Leine 7. 26. 75.

  Leinenweberei 114.

  Lemgo 8. 113 (Abb. 115) bis 117 (Abb. 117). 121. 122.

  Lemgoer Mark 8. 120.

  Lenne 26. 83. 86.

  Lewenhagen 73.

  Lias 8.

  Lichtheupte 116.

  Lindhorster Typus 55.

  Linnenbecke 29 (Abb. 26).

  Lippe 62.

  Lippische Porta 100.

  Lippischer Wald 12 (Abb. 8). 111. 116.

  Lippisches Hügelland 5. 119.

  Lippoldsberg 70.

  Lippoldshöhle 88.

  Löhne 100. 108.

  Lübbecke 58. 59. 103. 106. 107.

  Lügde 59. 119 (Abb. 119). 120. 121.

  Luhdener Klippe 8. 77 (Abb. 80). 82 (Abb. 85). 103.


  Malm 8.

  Margaretenklus 104.

  Marienmünster 122.

  Markloh 59.

  Markoldendorf 8.

  Marsberg 59.

  Mast 98.

  Meier 38.

  Meinberg 15. 121.

  Meinsen 33.

  Meißner 4.

  Melle 108.

  Minden 55. 58. 59. 62. 85 (Abb. 88). 86 (Abb. 89). 104. 106.

  Möllenbeck 77 (Abb. 80). 101.

  Mönchstein 8. 87.

  Moosberg 75. 76.

  Mörth 120. 122.

  Münden 5. 24. 35. 37 (Abb. 36) bis 39 (Abb. 39). 63 ff.

  Mündener Stapelrecht 66. 72.

  Münder 19. 101.

  Mushaus 76.


  Nammer Klippe 103.

  Nenndorf 19. 55. 91. 101.

  Nesselberg 9. 10 (Abb. 5 u. 6). 18. 89.

  Nethe 26. 78. 119. 120.

  Nethegau 4. 123. 124.

  Neuenheerse 119.

  Neuenkirchen 17.

  Niedersächsisch-Plattdeutsch 60.

  Niederscheden 26 (Abb. 23).

  Niederschlagsverhältnisse 20.

  Nieme 68. 70. 73.

  Nienover 76.

  Northeim 62.


  Obensburg 18. 58. 84. 89.

  Obernkirchen 9. 91. 92.

  Oeynhausen 17. 88 (Abb. 91). 100. 107.

  Ohr 84.

  Ohrberg 84. 98.

  Ohsen 25. 82.

  Oldenburg 122.

  Oldendorf, Hessisch- 57. 99.

  Örlinghausen 9. 110. 116.

  Ortschaften 43.

  Osnabrück 58. 59. 89 (Abb. 92). 90 (Abb. 93). 108.

  Osnabrückisches Hügelland 5.

  Osnegge 110.

  Osning 5. 11. 12. 13. 14 (Abb. 10). 108. 110. 112.

  Osterkappeln 107.

  Osterwald, Dorf 89.

  Osterwald, Geb. 5. 9. 10. 18. 89.

  Ostfalen 57.


  Paderborn 58. 59.

  Paderborn (Bistum) 62.

  Paderborner Hochfläche 5.

  Papenbrink 77 (Abb. 80). 103.

  Papin, Dionysius 67.

  Paschenburg 80 (Abb. 83). 102.

  Piesberg 7. 16. 17. 108. 112.

  Plattdeutsch 60.

  Polle 17. 54 (Abb. 58). 82.

  Poppenstein 8.

  Porta Westfalica (Westfälische Pforte) 5. 8. 12. 25. 57. 83 (Abb. 86).
    84 (Abb. 87). 100. 103. 104.

  Porta, Kleine oder Lippische 100.

  Pottaschegewinnung 33.

  Preußen 62.

  Pyrmont 7. 17. 62. 118 (Abb. 118). 119. 120. 121. 122.


  Rattenfängerhaus 66 (Abb. 71). 98.

  Ravensberg 62. 93 (Abb. 96 u. 97). 95 (Abb. 99). 112. 114.

  Ravensbergisches Hügelland 5

  Rehme 25. 107.

  Reihendörfer 44.

  Reinhardswald 4. 5. 11. 18. 31. 45 (Abb. 47). 63. 68. 73. 74.

  Remte 94.

  Reuberg 88.

  Rinteln 69 (Abb. 74) bis 71 (Abb. 76). 91. 99. 100.

  Roden 62.

  Rodenberg 91.

  Rodenberger Aue 26. 91.

  Rosenthal 102.

  Rotenstein 59 (Abb. 64). 87.

  Rottmünde 75.

  Rühle 82. 83.

  Rulle 58.


  Saale 86.

  Sababurg 11. 73.

  Sachsen 57.

  Sachsenlager 58. 116.

  Sächsisches Haus 45.

  Salzhemmendorf 87.

  Salzuflen 17. 120.

  Sandebeck 12.

  Sandsteine 81. 91.

  Sattelmeierhöfe 39. 25 (Abb. 22).

  Saukörnung 62 (Abb. 67).

  Saupark 9. 10 (Abb. 5 u. 6). 13. 18. 90.

  Schafberg 108. 112.

  Schalksburg 104.

  Schauenstein 92.

  Schaumburg 59. 62. 80 (Abb. 83). 102.

  Schaumburg, Grafschaft 99.

  Schaumburger Tracht 56.

  Schaumburg-Lippe 62.

  Schecken 18. 84.

  Scheckenpaß 89.

  Schede 68.

  Schieder 58. 59. 122.

  Schierlaken 55.

  Schildesche 115.

  Schledehausen 108.

  Schwalenberg 62. 120 (Abb. 120). 121 (Abb. 121). 122.

  Schwalenberger Wald 8. 120.

  Schwaney 11.

  Schwöbber 98.

  Schwülme 26. 68. 70. 74. 75.

  Selter 8. 13. 18. 87.

  Sieburg 72.

  Siedelungsformen 38.

  Skidroburg 122.

  Solling 4. 5. 7. 12. 18. 20. 31. 34. 43 (Abb. 44). 74. 75. 76. 81.

  Sollinger Wald 18.

  Sooldorf 19.

  Sparenberg 98 (Abb. 101). 114.

  Spiegelberg 62.

  Springe 9. 18. 35 62 (Abb. 67). 90.

  Stadthagen 10. 92.

  Stadtoldendorf 7. 76.

  Stapelrecht, Mündener 66. 72.

  Staufenberg 11. 73.

  Steinbergen 103.

  Steinbrüche 108.

  Steingräber 108.

  Steinmühle 54 (Abb. 59). 83.

  Steinsalz 75.

  Stemberg 10.

  Stemmer Berg 10.

  Sternberg 62. 122.

  Sternberger Höhen 120.

  Süntel 5. 7. 9. 13. 20. 26. 59. 65 (Abb. 70). 79 (Abb. 82). 91. 92.
    101. 107.

  Süntelbuche 78 (Abb. 81). 101.

  Süntelturm 101.


  Tabakfabrikation 106.

  Tanzwerder 67.

  Taubenberg 69 (Abb. 74). 100. 120.

  Tecklenburg 62. 91 (Abb. 94). 112. 114.

  Temperaturverhältnisse 19 ff.

  Tertiär 11.

  Teufelskanzel 102.

  Teufelsküche 87.

  Teutoburg 57. 116.

  Teutoburger Wald 4. 9. 11 (Abb. 7). 13 (Abb. 9). 14 (Abb. 10). 13. 20.
    57. 95 (Abb. 99). 110. 111.

  Theotmalli 116.

  Thüster Berg 18.

  Tillyschanze 63.

  Tönniesberg 103.

  Tönsberg 10. 116.

  Totenberg 73.

  Totental 102.

  Trachten s. Volkstrachten.

  Treidelschiffahrt 98.

  Trendelburg 45 (Abb. 46). 74.

  Trias 7.

  Twielbiäke 26.


  Uffeln 35.

  Uslar 76.


  Varenholz 75. 101.

  Varusschlacht 111.

  Veckerhagen 68.

  Velmerstot 110. 119.

  Vinsebeck 15.

  Vlotho 17. 72 (Abb. 77). 100.

  Vogler 5. 7. 18. 34. 77. 78. 82. 83. 86.

  Voldagsen 87.

  Volksen 31 (Abb. 28).

  Volkstrachten 33 (Abb. 30) bis 36 (Abb. 35). 54.

  Völmerstot s. Velmerstot.

  Volpriehausen 75. 76.


  Wackelstein 87.

  Wald 27 ff.

  Waldeck 122.

  Waldeck-Pyrmont 62.

  Wallücke 107. 108.

  Wangelist 98 (Abb. 73).

  Warburg 11.

  Warburger Börde 5. 7. 11. 119.

  Wealdenkohle 91. 104.

  Wehrden 79.

  Weibeck 102.

  Weinbau 103.

  Weißer Stein 89.

  Wendhagen 92.

  Weper 5.

  Werra 22.

  Werre 7. 26. 107. 115. 119.

  Wertheim 35.

  Werther 114.

  Weser 22 ff. 63 ff. 75. 100. 107.

  Wesergebirge 13. 19.

  Weserkette 9 (Abb. 4). 77 (Abb. 80). 82 (Abb. 85). 102.

  Wesermühlen-Aktiengesellschaft 68. 96.

  Weserstein 67.

  Westerberg 110.

  Westfalen 57. 62.

  Westfälische Pforte s. Porta Westfalica.

  Westfälisch-Plattdeutsch 60.

  Wickensen 77.

  Wiehengebirge 5. 16. 17 (Abb. 15). 20. 72 (Abb. 77). 87 (Abb. 90). 91.
    104. 107.

  Wiem 46.

  Wienke 123.

  Willebadessen 58.

  Windfedern 45.

  Winterberg 8.

  Wispe 86. 88.

  Wittekind 58. 108. 115.

  Wittekindsberg 57. 107.

  Wittekindsburg 58.

  Wittekinds Grabmal 101 (Abb. 105). 115.

  Wittekindskapelle 104.

  Wittekindsquelle 104.


  Zappenburg 73.

  Zelle, Bloße 11. 88.

  Ziegelei 122. 123.

  Zwieselbach 26.

[Illustration]

[Illustration: KARTE DES WESERBERGLANDES.]




  +----------------------------------------------------------------+
  | Anmerkungen zur Transkription                                  |
  |                                                                |
  | Inkonsistenzen wurden beibehalten, wenn beide Schreibweisen    |
  | gebräuchlich waren, wie:                                       |
  |                                                                |
  | Amthaus -- Amtshaus                                            |
  | Ansiedelung -- Ansiedlung                                      |
  | Domes -- Doms                                                  |
  | Egge-Gebirge -- Eggegebirge                                    |
  | Eisenbahn-Knotenpunkt -- Eisenbahnknotenpunkt                  |
  | Gebietes -- Gebiets                                            |
  | Gesteines -- Gesteins                                          |
  | Linnenbecke -- Linnenbeke                                      |
  | Neocom -- Neokom                                               |
  | Osning-Achse -- Osningachse                                    |
  | Umschlagplätzen -- Umschlagsplatz                              |
  | Weser-Mühlen-Aktien-Gesellschaft                               |
  |     -- Wesermühlen-Aktiengesellschaft                          |
  | Wesergebietes -- Wesergebiets                                  |
  |                                                                |
  | Interpunktion wurde ohne Erwähnung korrigiert.                 |
  | Im Text wurden folgende Änderungen vorgenommen:                |
  |                                                                |
  | S. 8 »Mönchsstein« in »Mönchstein« geändert.                   |
  | S. 20 »unserm« in »unserem« geändert.                          |
  | S. 26 »Neihe« in »Nethe« geändert.                             |
  | S. 42 »auf dem Familiennamen« in »auf den Familiennamen«       |
  |       geändert.                                                |
  | S. 47 »Baulüberlieferungen« in »Bauüberlieferungen« geändert.  |
  | S. 54 »ausstorben« in »ausgestorben« geändert.                 |
  | S. 59 »selbstständig« in » selbständig« geändert.              |
  | S. 60 »gewesen sein« in »gewesen zu sein« geändert.            |
  | S. 84 »Seite 18« in »auf Seite 18« geändert.                   |
  | S. 86 »Tagesbau« in »Tagebau« geändert.                        |
  | S. 94 »Bückeburges Schlosses« in »Bückeburger Schlosses«       |
  |       geändert.                                                |
  | S. 100 »Durchbruchtal« in »Durchbruchstal« geändert.           |
  | S. 108 »Kohlesandstein« in »Kohlensandstein« geändert.         |
  | S. 112 »Rava« in »Ravenna« geändert.                           |
  | S. 130 »Mönchsstein« in »Mönchstein« geändert.                 |
  | S. 130 »Rosental« in »Rosenthal« geändert.                     |
  | S. 131 »Walllücke« in »Wallücke« geändert.                     |
  +----------------------------------------------------------------+

*** END OF THE PROJECT GUTENBERG EBOOK DAS WESERBERGLAND UND DER
TEUTOBURGER WALD ***

Updated editions will replace the previous one--the old editions will
be renamed.

Creating the works from print editions not protected by U.S. copyright
law means that no one owns a United States copyright in these works,
so the Foundation (and you!) can copy and distribute it in the
United States without permission and without paying copyright
royalties. Special rules, set forth in the General Terms of Use part
of this license, apply to copying and distributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works to protect the PROJECT GUTENBERG-tm
concept and trademark. Project Gutenberg is a registered trademark,
and may not be used if you charge for an eBook, except by following
the terms of the trademark license, including paying royalties for use
of the Project Gutenberg trademark. If you do not charge anything for
copies of this eBook, complying with the trademark license is very
easy. You may use this eBook for nearly any purpose such as creation
of derivative works, reports, performances and research. Project
Gutenberg eBooks may be modified and printed and given away--you may
do practically ANYTHING in the United States with eBooks not protected
by U.S. copyright law. Redistribution is subject to the trademark
license, especially commercial redistribution.

START: FULL LICENSE

THE FULL PROJECT GUTENBERG LICENSE
PLEASE READ THIS BEFORE YOU DISTRIBUTE OR USE THIS WORK

To protect the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting the free
distribution of electronic works, by using or distributing this work
(or any other work associated in any way with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg"), you agree to comply with all the terms of the Full
Project Gutenberg-tm License available with this file or online at
www.gutenberg.org/license.

Section 1. General Terms of Use and Redistributing Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works

1.A. By reading or using any part of this Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic work, you indicate that you have read, understand, agree to
and accept all the terms of this license and intellectual property
(trademark/copyright) agreement. If you do not agree to abide by all
the terms of this agreement, you must cease using and return or
destroy all copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in your
possession. If you paid a fee for obtaining a copy of or access to a
Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work and you do not agree to be bound
by the terms of this agreement, you may obtain a refund from the
person or entity to whom you paid the fee as set forth in paragraph
1.E.8.

1.B. "Project Gutenberg" is a registered trademark. It may only be
used on or associated in any way with an electronic work by people who
agree to be bound by the terms of this agreement. There are a few
things that you can do with most Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
even without complying with the full terms of this agreement. See
paragraph 1.C below. There are a lot of things you can do with Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic works if you follow the terms of this
agreement and help preserve free future access to Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works. See paragraph 1.E below.

1.C. The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation ("the
Foundation" or PGLAF), owns a compilation copyright in the collection
of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works. Nearly all the individual
works in the collection are in the public domain in the United
States. If an individual work is unprotected by copyright law in the
United States and you are located in the United States, we do not
claim a right to prevent you from copying, distributing, performing,
displaying or creating derivative works based on the work as long as
all references to Project Gutenberg are removed. Of course, we hope
that you will support the Project Gutenberg-tm mission of promoting
free access to electronic works by freely sharing Project Gutenberg-tm
works in compliance with the terms of this agreement for keeping the
Project Gutenberg-tm name associated with the work. You can easily
comply with the terms of this agreement by keeping this work in the
same format with its attached full Project Gutenberg-tm License when
you share it without charge with others.

1.D. The copyright laws of the place where you are located also govern
what you can do with this work. Copyright laws in most countries are
in a constant state of change. If you are outside the United States,
check the laws of your country in addition to the terms of this
agreement before downloading, copying, displaying, performing,
distributing or creating derivative works based on this work or any
other Project Gutenberg-tm work. The Foundation makes no
representations concerning the copyright status of any work in any
country other than the United States.

1.E. Unless you have removed all references to Project Gutenberg:

1.E.1. The following sentence, with active links to, or other
immediate access to, the full Project Gutenberg-tm License must appear
prominently whenever any copy of a Project Gutenberg-tm work (any work
on which the phrase "Project Gutenberg" appears, or with which the
phrase "Project Gutenberg" is associated) is accessed, displayed,
performed, viewed, copied or distributed:

  This eBook is for the use of anyone anywhere in the United States and
  most other parts of the world at no cost and with almost no
  restrictions whatsoever. You may copy it, give it away or re-use it
  under the terms of the Project Gutenberg License included with this
  eBook or online at www.gutenberg.org. If you are not located in the
  United States, you will have to check the laws of the country where
  you are located before using this eBook.

1.E.2. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is
derived from texts not protected by U.S. copyright law (does not
contain a notice indicating that it is posted with permission of the
copyright holder), the work can be copied and distributed to anyone in
the United States without paying any fees or charges. If you are
redistributing or providing access to a work with the phrase "Project
Gutenberg" associated with or appearing on the work, you must comply
either with the requirements of paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 or
obtain permission for the use of the work and the Project Gutenberg-tm
trademark as set forth in paragraphs 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.3. If an individual Project Gutenberg-tm electronic work is posted
with the permission of the copyright holder, your use and distribution
must comply with both paragraphs 1.E.1 through 1.E.7 and any
additional terms imposed by the copyright holder. Additional terms
will be linked to the Project Gutenberg-tm License for all works
posted with the permission of the copyright holder found at the
beginning of this work.

1.E.4. Do not unlink or detach or remove the full Project Gutenberg-tm
License terms from this work, or any files containing a part of this
work or any other work associated with Project Gutenberg-tm.

1.E.5. Do not copy, display, perform, distribute or redistribute this
electronic work, or any part of this electronic work, without
prominently displaying the sentence set forth in paragraph 1.E.1 with
active links or immediate access to the full terms of the Project
Gutenberg-tm License.

1.E.6. You may convert to and distribute this work in any binary,
compressed, marked up, nonproprietary or proprietary form, including
any word processing or hypertext form. However, if you provide access
to or distribute copies of a Project Gutenberg-tm work in a format
other than "Plain Vanilla ASCII" or other format used in the official
version posted on the official Project Gutenberg-tm website
(www.gutenberg.org), you must, at no additional cost, fee or expense
to the user, provide a copy, a means of exporting a copy, or a means
of obtaining a copy upon request, of the work in its original "Plain
Vanilla ASCII" or other form. Any alternate format must include the
full Project Gutenberg-tm License as specified in paragraph 1.E.1.

1.E.7. Do not charge a fee for access to, viewing, displaying,
performing, copying or distributing any Project Gutenberg-tm works
unless you comply with paragraph 1.E.8 or 1.E.9.

1.E.8. You may charge a reasonable fee for copies of or providing
access to or distributing Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works
provided that:

* You pay a royalty fee of 20% of the gross profits you derive from
  the use of Project Gutenberg-tm works calculated using the method
  you already use to calculate your applicable taxes. The fee is owed
  to the owner of the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark, but he has
  agreed to donate royalties under this paragraph to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation. Royalty payments must be paid
  within 60 days following each date on which you prepare (or are
  legally required to prepare) your periodic tax returns. Royalty
  payments should be clearly marked as such and sent to the Project
  Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation at the address specified in
  Section 4, "Information about donations to the Project Gutenberg
  Literary Archive Foundation."

* You provide a full refund of any money paid by a user who notifies
  you in writing (or by e-mail) within 30 days of receipt that s/he
  does not agree to the terms of the full Project Gutenberg-tm
  License. You must require such a user to return or destroy all
  copies of the works possessed in a physical medium and discontinue
  all use of and all access to other copies of Project Gutenberg-tm
  works.

* You provide, in accordance with paragraph 1.F.3, a full refund of
  any money paid for a work or a replacement copy, if a defect in the
  electronic work is discovered and reported to you within 90 days of
  receipt of the work.

* You comply with all other terms of this agreement for free
  distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm works.

1.E.9. If you wish to charge a fee or distribute a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work or group of works on different terms than
are set forth in this agreement, you must obtain permission in writing
from the Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the manager of
the Project Gutenberg-tm trademark. Contact the Foundation as set
forth in Section 3 below.

1.F.

1.F.1. Project Gutenberg volunteers and employees expend considerable
effort to identify, do copyright research on, transcribe and proofread
works not protected by U.S. copyright law in creating the Project
Gutenberg-tm collection. Despite these efforts, Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, and the medium on which they may be stored, may
contain "Defects," such as, but not limited to, incomplete, inaccurate
or corrupt data, transcription errors, a copyright or other
intellectual property infringement, a defective or damaged disk or
other medium, a computer virus, or computer codes that damage or
cannot be read by your equipment.

1.F.2. LIMITED WARRANTY, DISCLAIMER OF DAMAGES - Except for the "Right
of Replacement or Refund" described in paragraph 1.F.3, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation, the owner of the Project
Gutenberg-tm trademark, and any other party distributing a Project
Gutenberg-tm electronic work under this agreement, disclaim all
liability to you for damages, costs and expenses, including legal
fees. YOU AGREE THAT YOU HAVE NO REMEDIES FOR NEGLIGENCE, STRICT
LIABILITY, BREACH OF WARRANTY OR BREACH OF CONTRACT EXCEPT THOSE
PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH 1.F.3. YOU AGREE THAT THE FOUNDATION, THE
TRADEMARK OWNER, AND ANY DISTRIBUTOR UNDER THIS AGREEMENT WILL NOT BE
LIABLE TO YOU FOR ACTUAL, DIRECT, INDIRECT, CONSEQUENTIAL, PUNITIVE OR
INCIDENTAL DAMAGES EVEN IF YOU GIVE NOTICE OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH
DAMAGE.

1.F.3. LIMITED RIGHT OF REPLACEMENT OR REFUND - If you discover a
defect in this electronic work within 90 days of receiving it, you can
receive a refund of the money (if any) you paid for it by sending a
written explanation to the person you received the work from. If you
received the work on a physical medium, you must return the medium
with your written explanation. The person or entity that provided you
with the defective work may elect to provide a replacement copy in
lieu of a refund. If you received the work electronically, the person
or entity providing it to you may choose to give you a second
opportunity to receive the work electronically in lieu of a refund. If
the second copy is also defective, you may demand a refund in writing
without further opportunities to fix the problem.

1.F.4. Except for the limited right of replacement or refund set forth
in paragraph 1.F.3, this work is provided to you 'AS-IS', WITH NO
OTHER WARRANTIES OF ANY KIND, EXPRESS OR IMPLIED, INCLUDING BUT NOT
LIMITED TO WARRANTIES OF MERCHANTABILITY OR FITNESS FOR ANY PURPOSE.

1.F.5. Some states do not allow disclaimers of certain implied
warranties or the exclusion or limitation of certain types of
damages. If any disclaimer or limitation set forth in this agreement
violates the law of the state applicable to this agreement, the
agreement shall be interpreted to make the maximum disclaimer or
limitation permitted by the applicable state law. The invalidity or
unenforceability of any provision of this agreement shall not void the
remaining provisions.

1.F.6. INDEMNITY - You agree to indemnify and hold the Foundation, the
trademark owner, any agent or employee of the Foundation, anyone
providing copies of Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works in
accordance with this agreement, and any volunteers associated with the
production, promotion and distribution of Project Gutenberg-tm
electronic works, harmless from all liability, costs and expenses,
including legal fees, that arise directly or indirectly from any of
the following which you do or cause to occur: (a) distribution of this
or any Project Gutenberg-tm work, (b) alteration, modification, or
additions or deletions to any Project Gutenberg-tm work, and (c) any
Defect you cause.

Section 2. Information about the Mission of Project Gutenberg-tm

Project Gutenberg-tm is synonymous with the free distribution of
electronic works in formats readable by the widest variety of
computers including obsolete, old, middle-aged and new computers. It
exists because of the efforts of hundreds of volunteers and donations
from people in all walks of life.

Volunteers and financial support to provide volunteers with the
assistance they need are critical to reaching Project Gutenberg-tm's
goals and ensuring that the Project Gutenberg-tm collection will
remain freely available for generations to come. In 2001, the Project
Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation was created to provide a secure
and permanent future for Project Gutenberg-tm and future
generations. To learn more about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation and how your efforts and donations can help, see
Sections 3 and 4 and the Foundation information page at
www.gutenberg.org

Section 3. Information about the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation

The Project Gutenberg Literary Archive Foundation is a non-profit
501(c)(3) educational corporation organized under the laws of the
state of Mississippi and granted tax exempt status by the Internal
Revenue Service. The Foundation's EIN or federal tax identification
number is 64-6221541. Contributions to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation are tax deductible to the full extent permitted by
U.S. federal laws and your state's laws.

The Foundation's business office is located at 809 North 1500 West,
Salt Lake City, UT 84116, (801) 596-1887. Email contact links and up
to date contact information can be found at the Foundation's website
and official page at www.gutenberg.org/contact

Section 4. Information about Donations to the Project Gutenberg
Literary Archive Foundation

Project Gutenberg-tm depends upon and cannot survive without
widespread public support and donations to carry out its mission of
increasing the number of public domain and licensed works that can be
freely distributed in machine-readable form accessible by the widest
array of equipment including outdated equipment. Many small donations
($1 to $5,000) are particularly important to maintaining tax exempt
status with the IRS.

The Foundation is committed to complying with the laws regulating
charities and charitable donations in all 50 states of the United
States. Compliance requirements are not uniform and it takes a
considerable effort, much paperwork and many fees to meet and keep up
with these requirements. We do not solicit donations in locations
where we have not received written confirmation of compliance. To SEND
DONATIONS or determine the status of compliance for any particular
state visit www.gutenberg.org/donate

While we cannot and do not solicit contributions from states where we
have not met the solicitation requirements, we know of no prohibition
against accepting unsolicited donations from donors in such states who
approach us with offers to donate.

International donations are gratefully accepted, but we cannot make
any statements concerning tax treatment of donations received from
outside the United States. U.S. laws alone swamp our small staff.

Please check the Project Gutenberg web pages for current donation
methods and addresses. Donations are accepted in a number of other
ways including checks, online payments and credit card donations. To
donate, please visit: www.gutenberg.org/donate

Section 5. General Information About Project Gutenberg-tm electronic works

Professor Michael S. Hart was the originator of the Project
Gutenberg-tm concept of a library of electronic works that could be
freely shared with anyone. For forty years, he produced and
distributed Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks with only a loose network of
volunteer support.

Project Gutenberg-tm eBooks are often created from several printed
editions, all of which are confirmed as not protected by copyright in
the U.S. unless a copyright notice is included. Thus, we do not
necessarily keep eBooks in compliance with any particular paper
edition.

Most people start at our website which has the main PG search
facility: www.gutenberg.org

This website includes information about Project Gutenberg-tm,
including how to make donations to the Project Gutenberg Literary
Archive Foundation, how to help produce our new eBooks, and how to
subscribe to our email newsletter to hear about new eBooks.